Water
Water is
Water is life.
Bassin de rétention d'eau à Tamera (Portugal)
avec Sepp Holzer et Benrd Müller
Water is the most important thing.
The whole world is 70% water.
We, animals, everything-70% water.
Water is the key issue for the survival human kind on this planet.
Nature has provided enough water everywhere on earth;
but, a billion people do not have sufficient access to clean drinking water.
More and more regions lack the water to grow the food they need.
Centralized systems of artificial water management cannot solve this problem.
We need de-centralized systems of natural water management.
We are in Tamera Peace Research Center in southern Portugal, where a water retention landscape has been in development since summer 2007.
Bernd Muller is responsible for Tamera's ecological research work.
In 2007 the community of Tamera still had the question whether a site of this size threatened by desertification could provide food, water and energy for 300 people.
We visited Sepp Holzer and asked him this question and he brought us this gift the vision of a water landscape.
Sepp Holzer, an Austrian mountain farmer, is a well-known specialist and visionary for permaculture and landscape healing.
Water is always at the core of his work.
For me water is the most important capital.
Wherever it's possible, you should create retention spaces and collect the rain water and re-learn with the water how to maintain a balance.
This is the most important thing because once you've created the right hydrological balance,
70% of the work is done.
ou help rich vegetation to develop, diversity ecause nature can reveal itself and develop in the right way.
Traveling through the world I have not seen a single situation, nation or land in which the development of a water retention landscape would not give the first important healing impulses.
In many parts of the world, countries are not able to feed their population anymore.
They have been unable to maintain their natural wildlife for a long time.
As a consultant in many countries
Sepp Holzer sees the consequence of deforestation, monoculture, overgrazing and industrial agriculture.
All these factors destroy the natural water balance.
The soil is drying out.
Water is being lost and the retention space, the natural water storage system of the earth, is becoming dry and the flora and fauna disappear.
In the end the land will turn into desert or burn ecause it's so dry.
You can see these problems happening all over the world, bringing huge catastrophes.
And the heavy rains come anyway.
What happens then?
The water rushes down the slopes because the dry soil does not absorb the water.
When the soil is hotter than the falling rain it rejects the water.
Only when the soil is cooler, when the vegetation is giving shadow then it attracts the water and lets it seep in.
This is the construction site for a new water retention space in Tamera.
Wherever you work with soil you can read the signs of erosion.
Topsoil should actually form a thick, living layer everywhere on the ground which enables rainwater to filter in.
But, this layer has been eroded away.
Now the topsoil lies in layers many meters thick in the bottom of valleys or is found as mud in rivers.
The surface of fields and sites higher up is depleted and barren.
De-centralized water retention landscapes give the water time to filter back into the earth body.
People always have the same questions, always the same worries, where will all this water come from ?
in such dusty dry soil without streams or a river.
How can I build a lake here ?
People have simply lost the knowledge of how to use the catchment area and the rain, the blessing of the water in the right way.
When I use the catchment area, thereupon, the lake will fill very quickly.
How much water can change a landscape in a short time.
We can see here, comparing Tamera before the creation of Lake 1 and today.
Water retention landscapes can be built everywhere.
Anywhere on earth.
A water retention space must not be sealed with concrete or plastic.
It is enough to build a dam out of natural material at the narrowest point of a valley.
You dig a ditch until you reach an impermeable layer.
On that solid ground you apply layer after layer of fine material, like moist clay and drive on it and roll it to build the water barrier.
This water barrier is the core of the dam.
For the outside of the dam I take course material, it doesn't have to be dense and water-proof.
I will also have to compact it by driving on it and rolling it.
And like this, I build the whole dam, the water barrier in the core nd on the outside in a slope of 1 to 2, 1 meter up and 2 meters along, like this I build the two layers together, up to the top.
The water retention spaces have winding banks, shallow and deep zones, a diverse vegetation of water plants and are built aligned to the prevailing wind direction this way the water is always moving, is enriched with oxygen,
and thus is naturally purified.
The water in a water retention landscape stays fresh and alive by itself.
Since we created the first retention space, we can already keep much of the water from the winter rainfalls on the land.
In this way in can unfold its full healing capacity, the wildlife is responding and is returning and the vegetation is recovering.
We can plant fruit trees again, the forests recover and we can grow our food for people and for animals in the direct surroundings of the first retention space.
The water which used to run away and which is now stored here is at the same time also having an impact on the whole groundwater system.
In the first year, a spring developed below this lake which now gives water throughout the year.
Since we built this first dam, we no longer have such big variations with a lot of flowing water in winter when it's raining and droughts in the summer.
We have a more constant water situation throughout the year, which is of course a huge benefit for nature.
Nature shows you how this works, you just have to ask her, have to contact her, to communicate with her, then you will be fine anywhere on earth.
Ask nature, think with her and not against her.
Put yourself in her place and you get all the answers you need.
Make room in your head so that natural thinking has space to happen.
There has been abnormal mutant activity in the Tohoku area.
Did you find something out?
Nothing in particular.
It's jumping to conclusions to blame the twisted bridge and the strange occurrence in the river on mutants.
However, the U-Men's mutant detection device found a strong signal.
I can't understand that.
But I'm surprised.
Little Hisako becoming a member of the X-Men!
When I remembered the Sasaki Institute, Professor X was happy, too.
Charles was...
Will Professor X be joining you here as well?
No. He left the investigation to us.
-l see.
-What exactly is this Sasaki Academy?
We were never as big as the Xavier Institute, but we took in the mutant children from the area temporarily.
So, are you also a mutant?
-ln that case, why?
I wanted to do something for the children who were snubbed and couldn't go to school, just because they were mutants.
But... I suppose there were limits to what I could do alone.
So you shut it down?
Yes. Now I use the facility for medical and mutant research.
You know, Dr. Sasaki, I... I was really good friends with a kid in school.
Good friends?
Yeah. I think that kid was a little younger than me.
It was a boy, but... I can't remember him no matter how hard I try.
Dr. Sasaki, do you remember him?
Back then I had so many children here. I really don't remember.
Doctor!
It's almost time for the meeting.
These are the members of my research team. From the left, this is Koichi Kaga,
Jun Sanada, and Riko Nirasaki.
And these are the X-Men.
I've heard about what you've done. It's an honor to meet you.
-That's everyone?
Go ahead.
The weather appears to be clearing.
It might be a good time to go check on the Blackbird.
I'm sorry to trouble you, but could I borrow some tools?
-l'll go, too.
-l'm coming, too.
-Scott.
You talk to Hisako and Emma.
The research facility is in the back of this house.
The main equipment is underground.
A boy...
Younger than me...
Hisako.
You used to go to an ordinary school, right?
Yeah. I used to come to the Academy after my regular school let out.
Maybe that boy was a friend of yours at school?
-Maybe...
-By the way, Yui.
Aren't you an acquaintance of Professor X?
Yes. It was more than 15 years ago, but I did meet him once.
More than 15 years ago?
But we were never close.
It was such a long time ago, I don't really remember.
I have to go to a meeting, so please make yourselves at home.
If you need anything, you can reach me on this intercom.
I feel like Dr. Sasaki's changed.
Changed?
Yeah. She used to be kinder and warmer, I think.
She still seems kind, at least to me.
That's true, but...
Yui Sasaki is lying.
She said she hasn't seen Professor X in 15 years.
But she has seen him since then.
Did you read her mind?
It's because of things like that that people hate mutants.
No. I didn't use telepathy.
This is a woman's intuition, right?
A woman's intuition?
When we mentioned the Professor, she called him "Charles."
Even though they weren't that close.
Some people use first names even with people they're not friendly with.
But she had asked you if Professor X was planning on coming.
Yui Sasaki is involved with Professor X on a much deeper level.
A deeper level...
-All right, let's pull it out!
-That's impossible.
Storm!
Could you melt all this ice?
That's also impossible. Look at this snow.
I wonder if you could even call it snow.
At first glance, it seems like snow, but...
It doesn't melt. It's not even cold.
It seems more like a mineral.
So in Japan they have diamond or ruby snow?
Of course not.
It's as ifjust this place was suddenly changed.
At any rate, there's nothing we can do like this.
I'll contact Charles and have him send a spare Blackbird.
Yui Sasaki?
Yes, I thought I'd let you know, just in case.
Understood. ln any event, I'll send you the backup jet at once.
-It's been a while.
-Yui.
I wasn't expecting you to contact me.
From the sound of it, you've already heard a report about me.
I hear you've shut down the Academy.
Let me just state my business. I want to continue my research here in peace.
Are you saying the X-Men are in the way?
I'll help if needed. But I want them out of here as soon as the investigation is over.
would something be disturbed if they stay too long?
It may be the key to solving the string of mutant occurrences around your lab.
I have nothing to do with it.
I'm not so sure about that. When I sent my mind to Tohoku,
I saw you and a boy.
I couldn't see his face, but you overlapped with him.
Does that boy have anything to do with you?
Why did he enter my mind?
Answer me, Yui.
That boy is probably Takeo.
Takeo?
He's my son. Mine...
And yours.
Our son?
You're telling me I have a son?
So then that was...
My son entered my consciousness.
That is incorrect.
If you say you saw him, then you just happened to look in my mind.
But I'm certain I met that boy.
You said you couldn't see his face. That's natural.
Because Takeo is already gone.
Do you mean our son is dead?
Someday I'll tell you everything.
But for now, please stop meddling in my affairs.
Staying here is pointless.
In the meantime, let's go back to the Sasaki house.
An avalanche?
Doesn't seem like it.
is a mountain monster making snowmen or...
What on earth is that?
It seems that snowman has business with us.
So let's go say hello!
-What's that?
-Storm.
There's one here, too.
Greetings, ladies and gentlemen of the X-Men.
How do you like Japan?
It's not bad. The food is good and the scenery's nice.
Then you'll have no regrets when I kill you here!
Sorry, but I haven't seen any Kabuki yet.
Some kind of hedgehog monster?
Beast!
Did you pulverize him?
There was no resistance.
You are pretty tough.
So that was the aim of the attack just now.
The greetings are finished. Let's meet again.
I see. He can liquefy his body.
That's why he offered no resistance.
This is no time for analysis!
Let's get out of here!
Jun?
I'm going to take my shot in my room.
Make sure the X-Men don't see you.
-Be careful.
-l understand.
Hisako?
is something wrong with your right hand?
The bruise on my hand is hurting.
Bruise?
It used to be bigger.
-Do you remember an injury or a burn?
Mom and Dad also say they don't remember it, so I thought it was just a birthmark.
It suddenly started hurting when I got here.
-Has it ever hurt you like this before?
That's strange, I wonder if something irritated it.
-l'm going to ask Dr. Sasaki for an ointment.
-Hey!
-She told us to use the intercom, remember?
-It's all right. It's not as if she's going outside.
This is a good opportunity. I need to talk to you.
Talk?
blackbird auto-piIot engaged. Launch preparations complete.
You want me to let you read my mind?
-What for?
To remove your hesitation.
My hesitation?
I heard you couldn't fight the berserk mutant at the U-Men base and almost lost your life.
is it because of Jean?
The Professor proved I had nothing to do with Jean's death.
So what is making you suffer?
Hisako also asked me. "Help him," she said.
It's none of her business.
She's worried about you in her own way.
And I also don't want a leader who's so hesitant.
At this rate, it may impede our work as X-Men.
Face your heart.
I'm sure Jean would wish for that, too.
-l don't like this.
Yui Sasaki said she introduced us to everyone in the mansion.
But I can still smell someone else in there.
Indeed. She doesn't seem to want us there.
Yui Sasaki's presence at the center of the mutant phenomena and the appearance of the U-Men seems a bit too much for coincidence.
Seems we'd better keep an eye on Yui Sasaki.
That's why I asked Scott and Emma to stay.
Scott. The X-Men are a light for mutants.
I want to become that light.
And I want to continue shining a light on the future for human and mutant children.
I'm begging you, Scott. kill me.
You know I couId never do thatI
What did you do to Jean's heart?
I love you, Scott...
Jean!
Now you die, too.
Dr. Sasaki?
-Feeling better?
The shadow you saw behind Jean, it's natural that you'd think it was me.
I was attacked by myself. What on earth was that?
That must have been your subconscious, the part of your mind where you can't forgive yourself for not saving Jean.
I... tried to escape my inability to save Jean by blaming you for her death.
You're right, the one person I can't forgive is myself.
Now that I know you had nothing to do with Jean's death, what should I do?
One year ago, if I'd been there when Jean went berserk, I might have been able to save her.
And you, as well.
Listen to me, Scott.
Aren't you the one who taught Hisako that an X-Man's most important quality is his heart?
You need a stronger heart than anyone else.
Don't let Jean's will go to waste.
I want to become that light. And I...
I want to continue shining a light on the future for human and mutant children.
So now you want to coach me, just like Hisako?
The beast that suddenly appeared in the lab turns out to have an unexpected identity.
Amid the confusion, Emma becomes suspicious of Yui Sasaki's assistant Jun.
meanwhile, danger approaches Professor X as he flies to Tohoku from New York on the blackbird.
A new facet of the case is revealed.
Next time on X-Men.: Lost
♪ Ole, ole, ole, ole... ♪
Get in the car!
I'm the man whose money you took.
He'll get done, sooner or later.
I made a call.
There's one thing nobody can escape from, it don't matter how big a master criminal you are.
The VAT man.
Well done on bringing us the money.
Welcome to Morocco.
For your own sake, I suggest you answer these questions truthfully.
Why are you on this boat?
That's... er...
That's all of us going on a fishing trip.
I remember that day... happy times.
You are putting a bag in the car.
What was it?
Probably fishing gear.
Bax?
Tell me about this, please.
Where did you learn how to do this?
That's... that's just lads on holiday, innit?
You know, things get a bit out of control.
You all OK?
They... shaved me.
And they bust my new glasses.
Said Morocco, didn't they?
Yeah, I know that.
Did they show you the pictures?
What pictures?
What do you say to 'em Rick?
Nothing. Obviously. Don't tell them anything, all right.
Not until we get some kind of legal representation.
Someone from the embassy - Amnesty or someone.
How you gonna get in touch with them?
Who are they anyway?
They're some kind of militia or something, aren't they?
They knew we had that money. They picked us off.
They're probably using the money for some extremist movement.
So now we're funding terrorists.
Oh, great. This just gets better and better.
He was wearing a shirt, with a Marks and Spencer's label on.
I saw it sticking out.
My interrogator.
I mean, extremists...
They don't shop at MS, do they?
They might.
Shall we go and help him?
Best not to get involved.
You all right, mate?
Serious. It's a bird!
Uh! Argh!
I was just trying to see if you were OK.
I'm Quinn.
What sort of fag name is that?
Dunno. Ask my dad.
Named after my grandfather, I think.
I'm Mercedes. Hi.
- Your dad into cars then?
- Heard of the Count of Monte Cristo, dumb fuck?
Yeah... no... yeah - fuck, I dunno, I can't remember.
Can I just ask, what's with all the rough stuff?
It's what they do if you don't tell them what they want.
A bunch of COCKSUCKERS! Come on!
Do you have any idea how we might get in touch with someone from the British Government?
Yeah, it's easy.
It's the Foreign Office.
What is this place exactly?
It's where they bring people to question... ..when they don't want anyone to know they're doing it.
A week ago, I was standing in line, holding a tuna baguette, queuing up for easyJet.
"Dear God, please help me see danger coming my way,
"and forgive the body count I will be sending your way."
"Never pick up a dead man's gun."
"I...
"..heart...
Bin Laden."
We should go en masse and demand to speak to whoever's in charge and make them understand they can't just keep us here.
There's laws and protocols...
You think they'll care about that?
They still have to abide by them.
Says who?
Woody, this is our government.
Governments can't just hold us indefinitely for no reason.
Course they can!
They do it all the time.
You remember those plane spotters in Greece?
They said they were spies. And what about Guantanamo?
Nobody even knew who was in there.
Get off!
It takes two of ya?
How did you end up here then, love?
I was in Kabul, "love".
You in the army then?
No, I went there because I like the opera.
Didn't like what I saw, so I went AWOL.
Took a long fucking walk.
Posted some things on the web.
Things I thought people should see.
There are no secrets. Only hidden truths.
Nah. Just bitching about the food and the way they treat people.
Now they think I'm bloody Wikileaks. Dickheads.
How long do they usually keep people in here for?
As long as they want.
This place don't exist.
Therefore, you don't exist.
What did you all do anyway?
Fellas, can I... have a word?
This could be a trick. She could be working for them.
You not seen her face?
They kicked her head in.
She's trying to scare us and then befriend us, you know.
Get us to confess everything.
You got a point.
Oi, wuss-bags.
Just ignore her.
Keep walking.
Keep walking...
What, you not talking to me now?
I ain't the enemy.
Anyway, if I wanted info out of you, I'd just....
..beat it out of you.
Get off me, you lunatic woman!
Ever had a cauliflower ear, Quinn?
Or a wet willy?
You know what Churchill said?
Fuck off!
"If you're going through hell, keep going".
Tough it out, guys!
You can get through this.
You got each other for a start.
I'm the one all on her lonesome.
Don't see me walking around with the clown's frown.
She's got a point you know.
We've really need to stay positive.
Good idea, Woody.
Tell you what, why don't we see if they can organise basket weaving classes or something?
Put our time to good use.
Only trying to help, knobhead.
Well, you're not.
Saying "cheer up, it may never happen" doesn't cut it.
So, what, do you think it's somehow harder for you, Quinn?
I don't think anything, Bax.
Because I'm stuck in an illegal prison in the middle of the Sahara fucking desert.
And why am I here?
Because you persuaded me that a weekend away would be "a laugh".
I persuaded you?
You called me.
I've never called you, Baxter.
I've never called you because I cannot bear your incessant moaning and complaining.
Oh, right, great - thanks.
That's nice.
Great time to get that out in the open.
You told me you came because Rick persuaded you.
Yup.
Blame Rick.
Yeah, waiting for that one.
Shove it up your arse, Quinn.
You shove it up yours.
Nice toughing it out guys.
Oi, Quinnbo, you know there's no "I" in team, don't you?
But there's a "U" in "fuck you".
Stop it!
Get off!
Get off me!
No, please, I haven't done anything.
Please don't, please.
Woods...!
Get your hands off him!
Rick!
Quinn!
Baxter!
Bax, please...
Please, don't.
Let go!
Where are you taking him?
Leave him alone!
BAX!
Get your hands off him, you slags!
You bastards!
I watched the door all night to see if he'd come out.
Yeah, me too.
Shit, no...
Let's not think the worst.
I think there's more grub on the side.
Just help yourself.
We've been worried sick.
You've been gone all night.
What happened?
I dunno... weird.
They asked me a bunch more questions and suddenly it was all, you know, tea and toast.
You should get some.
Come, please.
Is it all right if I bring my tea, chief?
Sit.
Fortunately for you... ..we're not actually interested in what you did over the last few days.
All we wanted to know was who you were financing.
We weren't financing anyone.
We were just trying to get home.
With five million euros?
We have at our disposal DNA databases, forensic analysis, satellite imaging technology.
If that doesn't give us what we need, we employ enhanced interrogation techniques.
If we want to find out the truth, we do.
And now, we have.
We made a mistake.
It happens.
You can go.
Just sign these and we'll get you to the airport and on a flight.
Does that mean that we can...?
Please don't ask if you can keep the money.
Do you want us to do anything for you, back home?
Little candle-lit vigil?
Coloured rubber wrist bands - "Free Mercedes".
Mrs Peters. 101 Bridge Road, Crawley.
It's my mum.
Just let her know I'm all right.
Don't mention this, eh?
You take care of yourself.
Did you really think we were going to get out of there?
Two nights in.
Nah... thought that was it.
What went through your mind?
Well, first of all, my kids...
Carmen, and then just like, stupid stuff, like...
I thought I'd never get to see United play again.
I kept thinking of my kids.
Kept seeing their little faces.
Then I thought about Nina....
I started to think about all the things they'd find out about me, you know, when I was dead.
And what if they stopped loving me?
I wouldn't be there to tell them that that's not what I'm like.
Be honest, kid, you were worried about her finding your porno collection.
Nah, I don't know.
Things that might be misinterpreted.
You know, e-mails, receipts.
Yeah, I didn't think of that.
I wonder what people would really make of all this back home?
They might wonder why four grown men went on holiday together, saying they were going to Spain and actually ending up in Morocco.
If anyone so much as mentions "bad luck", they're walking.
Be a long walk back, pal, we've been driving for nearly an hour.
Haven't seen so much as a camel.
He's gone.
He's not coming back, is he?
Two stay, two go and get help.
Shouldn't we all go?
Or stay?
We'll double our chances if we split.
Halve them you mean.
Who wants to stay?
I'll go.
You two stay here, if the driver comes back, just all stay with the car, all right?
Do you believe in destiny, Bax?
So shut up.
Fate then?
Rick, please.
No destiny, no fate, no karma, no spells, no curses.
This is just a series of misunderstandings, OK?
Could have happened to anybody.
No more, no less.
Who's...?
Get in.
You are about to be shot, get in!
Bax, get in.
Woods!
Slow down, slow down.
- We had some disturbing intel.
- Well, if it's bad news can you just lie to me?
I'd like to know what's going on, please.
A covert department of the CIA, the Special Activities Division has activated a kill contract on you.
Sorry?
Evidently, you've intersected a line of narco-finance and...
Now this might be because of the sun and this whole desert, shot at scenario thing but I'm just finding it a little hard to concentrate.
Would you mind talking to me as if I'm five years old?
Your man in Majorca...
..has operated successfully for so long because he gives huge kickbacks to the American security services.
He's paying the CIA to protect him?
Narco-finance is a major revenue stream
- for American black ops.
- Like a five-year-old, please.
Dirty tricks.
Security activities they don't want people to know about.
Drugs deals have been financing dodgy US foreign policy for years.
Not really new news.
Why would they want to kill us?
One of you tipped off the authorities in the UK.
A contact inside Customs and Excise.
Your man here retaliated by telling the Special Activities Division you were about to blow their op wide open.
So now they have to take you out.
No, this... this is crazy.
I mean...
Why can't you just tell them, all right, that we're not the people that they think we are?
This goes higher than us.
This kind of thing brings down governments.
Iran Contra anyone?
Which is why removing you is an easy piece of damage limitation.
They can't just shoot four blokes who just happened to go on holiday together.
Under the aegis of "the global war on terror", they can shoot anyone they like.
And do.
That's who shot at us?
The CIA?
They'd have tasked local contractors.
So nothing can be linked back to them.
You got lucky...
But this isn't going to go away.
OK, let's get practical, then.
So what are the options?
Well, there must be something?
Right...
Right - there may be a solution but we have to act now.
Like, this minute.
Your presence here is getting a little itchy for us.
Excuse us for the inconvenience!
We may be able to get you out.
Take you to another country.
New identities.
Then what?
Then I'm afraid you're on your own.
How long would this be for?
Maybe for ever.
- We can never go home?
- It's the only offer on the table.
No, no, no, that's...
That's not an option.
I'm going home and...
If you go back, you'll be putting your families at risk as well.
That is a guarantee.
OK, let me just see if this is even logistically possible.
Stand up.
Get up.
We can do it.
We have a scrambled phone link.
You can each of you make one phone call home but you must not, under any circumstances, tell them where you are and what is happening.
Amy...
Yeah, I know, I'm sorry that I haven't rung.
Listen to me for a second, love.
Nina...
Just stop, just let me talk, darling, OK?
There's no easy way of saying this, OK, so I'm just going to say it straight out.
Wait, wait, wait -
I don't know who to phone.
Well, I do, I want to speak to my kids, but I don't know which one to choose.
If I've only got one call, which one do I call?
You can't make me choose.
I need you to phone my folks,
I want you to tell them that I'm fine and everything's OK, that I'm just going to go travelling for a little bit.
Rachel, are the girls with you?
Where are they?
Shit...
I want you to tell the girls that I love them both very much...
I don't know how long.
I know, I'm sorry.
Just please, please...
Don't let them think that I've abandoned them...
..because that is not what's happened.
I've met someone.
Oh, Amy...
Please, just tell the kids, OK, that it's not because of them,
I'm sorry Nina.
I'm really sorry.
Dad, it's me.
Yeah, no, I know, I thought I'd be back by now as well.
No, no, everything's fine.
It's just...
I think I'm going to stay out here a little longer.
Well, what happened to your satellite dish?
I can't hear you Rachel, say that again.
Take care?
Yeah, OK.
Go back to the shop where you bought it from, right, and ask someone there to help you, they'll help you.
Well, it's just because I don't know when I'm going to be back, Dad.
Fuck...
No, no, you're right, I'm sorry, I know I shouldn't swear.
Dad, listen to me, OK?
You've been brilliant, Dad.
Yeah, just take care.
I love you, Dad.
I know you all think it's my fault, don't you?
You think it's my fault because I phoned the VAT man.
It's nobody's fault, Rick.
I don't know, the universe conspiring against us or something.
And has been since we set foot in Alvo's villa.
A fly saved my life.
Out in the desert.
If it hadn't been for that fly, I'd have had my head blown off.
And the weird thing was, we'd met before.
We'd... ..bonded.
Four hours now.
How far are we going?
Any idea where we're going yet?
Is that a don't know, or won't say?
Bax?
What you going to call yourself?
Your name.
We can't use our own names right?
I'm gonna be Floyd.
That's what I'm gonna call myself.
Floyd...
Floyd Carter.
You can't call yourself that.
It's a black name.
Is it?
It's like calling yourself...
Everton or Tyrell, or something.
Needs to be something ordinary...
Tony.
Tony Smith.
My name's Tony...
Smith.
Why can't I be Tony Smith?
You call yourself whatever you like, mate.
Sir Tony Smith if you want, mate.
We should call ourselves names that mean something.
You know, like the native Americans do.
I'll be Running Scared.
I'll be...
Mr Dances With Wolves.
No, I mean something...
Something with hope in it.
You know, like...
If I was a girl, I'd call myself... ..well, Hope.
You could be Bob Hope.
New hope.
New house.
Aaron... no, Adam.
Adam Newhouse.
James...
Kirk.
Jamie....
Jamie Kirk, then.
Blake...
Lin...
Hee...
Ha...
Hatch.
Blake Hatch.
Tony Smith, Adam Newhouse, Jamie Kirk and... ..Blake Hatch.
Welcome to your new fucking lives.
Where are we?
South Africa.
We're on the other side of the world.
Do they speak English here?
I think so.
What's it like?
This will all sort out, won't it?
Eh?
A week from now, we'll be in a pub in London, we'll be laughing about this.
Some rand to get you through the first few weeks.
A driving licence form and some other ID stuff you'll need to fill in.
How do we get in touch with you?
You don't.
Right, OK.
- How do we keep in touch?
- You won't be able to.
It's too dangerous.
Hang on a minute.
What happens if it's safe for us, if it becomes safe for us to go home, to break cover?
How will we know that?
As far as anyone else knows now, you don't exist.
That's your best chance of surviving.
If you want to stay alive, stay invisible.
The truth will come out though, won't it?
In the end.
OK, let's go.
Say your goodbyes.
Come on, move this thing along.
Come on, people.
This isn't a secure area.
Take care of yourselves.
Hey, we shouldn't be on our own.
Listen, I know I said some things... ..but you boys mean a lot to me, all right?
Quinn, Quinn, come on.
Guys, come on, we should stay together, yeah?
We're a team now.
We're a team, we're like a band of brothers.
Rick, Rick... all right, you'll be OK.
You'll be OK.
Right, boys...
Chin up.
At least we're still standing, eh?
You'll be all right, Bax.
You're smart.
I'm not that fucking smart.
What about if just me and him, we stick together?
- It'll be all right, won't it?
- Listen, nobody has to know.
- It's for your own good.
You'll be all right.
I can't do this Woody.
Yes, you can.
No, I can't!
You're strong, mate.
You're stronger than you think.
No, I'm not.
I'm not, Woods, I'm not strong.
I'm not strong at all.
Woods, let's not do it, yeah?
You and me, we'll stay together, yeah?
Woods...
Woody...
Woody, let me go with you, yeah?
Please, Woody.
Woody, let me come with you, please.
You've got to be a man about it.
I've got to look after myself.
I'm not your fucking boyfriend.
Woody, I don't want to be on my own!
Woody, please.
Woody!
Woody, mate.
Don't leave me, please.
Please, mate, don't leave me here.
WOODY!
I know every disgraced politician, every gem smuggler, every high-stakes gambler and gold digger that come through those doors.
Why you never go away?
You don't even leave Cape Town.
If you love her so much, why don't you marry her?
Yeah, why don't you marry me and take me to England?
Your name isn't Newhouse is it?
How dare you, and how dare you try and blackmail me!
Mortal Kombat!
Mortal KombatNis not about death
Nthe preservation of life
Liu Kang and few fightersNfrom the Earth Realm defeated Outworld sorcererNShang Tsung
According to the rulesNof Mortal Kombat their victory preserved earth'sNsafety for another generation
Our chosen onesNwere returned to earth only to enjoyNa brief period of peace
For someone from OutworldNhas a different point of view
emperor of Outworld
The earthNwas created in six days so shall it be destroyed
Nmankind will rest in peace!
This is not good
Somehow he's opened gatewaysNto your world
Our Mortal Kombat victoryNclosed those portals
What closes can open again
Mother
You're alive
Too bad you will die
Nyou will never rule this world
Nyour world becomes mine!
You will never win
Lord Rayden?
You hid behind themNyour entire life
Johnny!
or he dies
I'll take your generals Earth does not bendNto the will of tyrants
You would never letNone of your humans die
Trade me for Johnny Cage
Come bow at my feet
you will bow to me!
It has begun!
We can't let Kahn get away
We can't win here
We must go
Kahn opened the portal
Your planet and OutworldNhave begun to merge into one
Think of it as hell on earth
My mother resurrected
Your mother SindelNmay be the key
This can't be!
NWe won the tournament! The rules say earth is safeNfor another generation
Kahn has broken the rules
He resurrected Sindel to keepNthese portals open indefinitely
NKahn's spell will be broken your mother's soulNwill be at peace and his portals closed
How could the Elder GodsNallow this?
They do not know
Nor your world will perish
We have six daysNuntil annihilation
I beat Shang TsungNI can beat Kahn
You beat a great sorcerer but you're no match for Kahn
Nit's me
Enough!
You are far from ready hunting
I am telling you thisNfor your own good
Kahn knows I have no powersNin Outworld
NI will lose my powers on earth
Ntogether
We are the only hope
We couldn't even save Johnny
What do these do?
you canNgo anywhere on earth in hours
The inner winds propel you it'll beNlike you're not moving
Sonya I'll take youNto your partner Jax
Nbut I'm not losing anybody else you are vulnerable
Nyou can do much
What about us?
You two will travelNto the Hopi mesa
Nbut now you need help
Go deep into the night Seek the counsel of Nightwolf
You will not find himNHe will find you
I will speak with the Elder GodsNand demand answers
NReady
Here we go
They are faster than I remember
I can't wait
This is amazing
It's the hot airNfrom earth's core
We harness its energy
Where are we?
The interchangeNRoll to your right
Hold on to me
the merger has begun Earth is under attack
It is glorious!
Did you make Rayden begNbefore destroying him?
Rayden is of no concern
You let him live?
He could not be stopped
I have no use for excuses
I have broken the sacred rulesNto keep the portals open
If the Elder GodsNlearn of our plot we shall bothNsuffer the consequences
I do not understand How can you fear the Elder Gods?
Nour power will be absolute
Until the sixth dayNhas passed we can take no chancesNwith Rayden and his mortals
Do not underestimateNthe power of the human spirit
if anything happens to me
I have lost everything
too
The missile!
You must go There will be others
I killed you
You killed my older brother
Why did you help us?
I helped her
Legend says the princessNis the key to stopping Kahn
You've been following usNWhy?
Kahn reprogrammed SmokeNto come after you in order to keep you apartNfrom Queen Sindel
How do we get to Nightwolf?
NSub-Zero
You must help usNif you want to stop Kahn
Let's hope you succeed
Get over here!
Take it!
Suckers!
I've got to find Kitana
Kahn wants you to go after her
Don't it's over
You alone are not readyNfor what's ahead
You'll take the same track backNand turn where I showed you
Don't worry about me
Is it like this everywhere?
the mergerNof the realms grows closer
More of the earthNwill be destroyed
I will meet youNat the temple of the Elder Gods
Jax!
Thought I was supposedNto be rescuing you
I couldn't wait
What have you doneNto yourself now?
Cybernetic strength-enhancers
It quadruplesNyour muscle capacity
You've got a confidence problem
These locks must beNon some remote-access mechanism
Everybody split The facility will be trashedNby an extermination squad
Nextermination squad?
too
I don't even know them
Damn it!
I can't free you
Stand backNLet's see what I'm made of
That's what I'm talking about
Wish I had these in high school
You'll wishNyou were in high school
Hurry!
What is that?
Death is the only way out Sonya BladeNShao-Kahn will be pleased
Shao what?
I'll take homeboy
I take it this ain't somethingNwe can talk about
Heads up!
Catch this!
Now what?
Cybernetic strength-enhancers!
Nice look but I'd lose the wall
I was just gettingNa feel for it
Watch out
You barbecued his ass
Look at this
Does this mean what I think?
Too bad I didn't get new legs
My squads have claimed thousandsNof innocent souls on earth
I will claim millions you'd be behind barsNin a zoo
Sheeva I would welcome them!
Silence!
What is your report?
Two of earth's best warriorsNhave been taken
Kabaal and Stryker
Did you make them begNbefore you destroyed them?
I thought if I let them live
I have no use for excuses!
Nthis will never happen again
It will never happen again
It is trueNthis will never happen again
I need a new general
You can die in dutyNor by my hand
Centaurs are knownNfor their hunting prowess
I will personallyNhunt down every human soul and spare no one!
Motaro can't be trusted
I proved myselfNas the protector of Sindel Your orders are mine to follow
The energies they wasteNwith their sniveling I would use to capture souls
You are all too impetuousNfor such important work
NQueen Sindel unless anyoneNhas a different point of view
huh?
It's my animality
Wouldn't you like to know?
So you're Rayden's prodigy
I've seen better
Don't sweat it too
Nyou know I won Mortal Kombat
Don't get cocky The tournament had rules anything goes
It was a mistake coming here
You think you're ready
Nwould Kitana have been captured?
Can you help me get her back? Maybe
Kitana is important Nyou've got to pass three tests
First one's courage
I don't have timeNfor these stupid games!
To test your courageNand find your animality you've got to enterNa dream state
How am I supposed to do that?
There's a slow wayNand a fast way
No time for the slow way
That's what I thought you'd say
Sweet dreams
Nbut you failed me
You are not the warriorNI thought you were
What if I fail everyone?
Your brother's soul is mine!
Fight from the inside
Nyour faith in yourself that can never be defeated
The fire inside you is killed
You lost Kitana
You are not a leader
Find that power inside you Feel your animality
You will fail!
I am Jade
I have searched the mesaNfor you
Of all the horrorsNdarkness holds to die alone
that is my worst fear
I'm not afraid
This is almostNtoo good to be true
The sameNcould be said about you
My heart belongs to another
I can't There's not much time left
Is this just another dream?
How can you beat Shao-KahnNwhen I am too much for you?
Nnow you laugh?
You are more pure and faithfulNthan I heard
You have passed the test
A test?
This was just another oneNof Nightwolf's tests?
We could have killed each other!
But we'll live
I will lead you to the templeNof the Elder Gods
I can't
Nit was only his second
I'm not ready
Not ready to save Kitana?
Because she's the key
I can take you to her
She's alive?
I cannot say
We must go
All your past betrayalsNI can forgive
Please accept this offering I do not want your death
You test my patience
You destroyed my family
You drove my motherNto kill herself
I am your enemy forever
Kill me now if you dare
Foolish child
A struggling worm on a hook lands a bigger catchNthan a dead one
no animals
Nature's dying
The merger of the realmsNis almost done
You keep talkingNabout mergers and realms but it don't mean squat to me
I can't explain it
We've only got a few days
Use your imagination
Use my imagination?
Nand I'm gonna split
You dragged me out the baseNwith some killers after us take meNhalfway around the world
Ntell me why
Nobody told meNwhy Johnny had to die
What is it with you?
Who the hell is Johnny?
I'm your partner Nwho can you trust?
Nobody but me
Nobody but you?
NI was there
I'm in the middle of nowhereNbecause of you!
I need to use the rest roomNI got no toilet tissue I got metal on my hands!
You wish
I told you these arms were goodNfor something
Thanks I owe you one
I don't know how much longerNI can take this
You look good in mud
You do
I got to find a river
We better roll
They don't use parachutes
I have comeNto the eternal palace because your sacred rulesNhave been broken
Shao-Kahn has invaded the earth
Nyou are granted three questions
Why was this treachery allowed?
We do not control man's destiny
Everyone can change their fate
You'll stand by and watchNthe ruination of earth?
You are correct Kitana is the keyNto closing Kahn's portals
If I reunite her with Sindel how can I be sure Kahn's portalsNwill stay closed?
Only when Shao-Kahn is destroyedNwill the future be safe
Do you believe the humansNare worth saving?
More than anything I know
Do you love them enoughNto sacrifice your immortality?
Nmailboxes Which temple's the Elder Gods'?
Keep moving
You know this dude?
Is that Jax?
Who is she?
this is Sonya Blade
Major Jackson Briggs
You've got incredible legsNfor kicking
Where Kitana?
She was kidnapped by Scorpion
You lost KitanaNand picked up her?
She helped me get here
Nwe got Kahn's squads on us
Can I make a suggestion?
Nlike staying alive
either
We're just gonna waitNfor this dude?
it's hopeless
Never give up hope
At least not so early
It's a new look
Who's she? Can she fightNas good as she looks?
Better because I was expectingNa team of fighters
Give us a breakNWe've been through hell
Nyou've been through nothing
Where's Kitana?
Kahn took herNIt's all my fault
This is not about blame
We're together in this like a family
What's with your arms?
Nand you're dissin' me already?
I mean no disrespect You have real skills Those arms aren't your strengthNThey're your weakness
Thanks for the tip
These thingsNare state of the art
Faith in yourselfNis all you need
I say that to all of you
I'll try to open a portalNto Outworld Follow me!
My powers are leaving me
NMoses parting the Red Sea?
Destroy everything!
Whenever you're ready
That was fun
They have taken the baitNand fallen into our trap
Proceed as planned I will await your arrivalNin Outworld
Nbut I'm freezing inside
Feels like I got microwaved
You never get used to that
Is that what I think it is?
The realms are merging
This will continue unlessNKahn's portals are closed
Time is against us
People in their carsNTorn between realms
It's like a nightmare
We have to stop this
Nwe must rescue Kitana
I know Kahn took KitanaNto his fortress
Hold up Kahn? You mean Mr Bad Attitude?
You want to check out his crib?
No way I ain't goingNon no suicide mission
Jax is right
That's probablyNwhat Kahn wants us to do
There is a secret passageway
I used it to escape
How could you believeNthe ruination of the temple would not jeopardize our plan?
It was necessaryNto convince the mortals their only hope lie in Outworld
You seem confident that SindelNwill capture them in your trap on my soul
All the millenniums of planningNwill be rewarded
You will be proud
Know this I will take your soul myselfNif you fail
I will rallyNthe extermination squads and prepare for victory
The mergerNwill soon be complete
All your friends will be dead
This must have been Edenia
The royal family's temple Kitana said I'd find it here
She's having a bad hair day
They must have followed us
but it may beNa blessing in disguise
We need SindelNto close Kahn's portals forever
I'll take care of herNI'll rescue Kitana
Something finally went rightNWe won
Who finished off Sindel?
NI surprised her from behind
Maybe she came in handyNafter all
You are witness to the dawningNof mankind's final day!
The two realms will be one!
Rayden and his mortalsNhave fallen for my trick and failed to stop us
Bring Rayden and his mortalsNto bow at my feet
Nthey can witness the birth of the greatest armyNin existence!
It's a trap Leave!
Up there!
The date's over
Only your love can reunite her body and soul
Kitana your love can break the holdNKahn has over your mother and close his portals to earth
I have prayed for the day when our love will bring us together again
I have never loved you
Nwhat reason was there to love?
I knew it could not be true
It cannot be
But it can and it is And you are powerless
Thunder God
It's over You fools You've been tricked
The legend was a lie
Kahn's portals stay open
Now the mergerNis nearly complete
How could you do this? It was so easy
Jade
That's it man
And what happens?
You take usNon a wild goose chase
I don't understand You were advisedNby the other gods
The gods must've lied to me
Forget your gods and immortals and all that junk!
The only ones we can trustNfrom here on out are humans not even Rayden
Nhe is mortal now like you All his powersNhave been sacrificed
That's even worse How do we stop Kahn now?
There's more to this than Kahn then KahnNhas a higher allegiance
Wait a second That tattooNI've seen it before
On a robot and a woman
They both tried to kill me
And both of themNworked for Kahn
This tattoo is a family crest bestowed only to my bloodline
It is a permanent mark that allows safe passageNthrough the portals for the bearerNand his passengers
Did the tattoos you sawNflee the fighter upon death?
Like a bat out of hell
Temporary passes The did not share my bloodline
But if it's your family crest too?
My father is an Elder God And only they can bestowNsuch a marking
Your dad's an Elder God?
Funny how you failedNto mention that before
If your father's an Elder God what does that make Kahn?
Shao-Kahn is my brother
It was not my fault I did everything you ordered
It was your jobNto lure them to an ambush
Nthen you failed me!
We could neverNhave stopped them alone
Listen to her
She speaks the truth We would've died trying
You
You are already dead!
And you will be soon
You will mount a defenseNaround my newest temple
Prepare for Rayden to makeNone last attack
You said RaydenNwas no longer to be feared
I am to be feared!
If you fail me I will feedNyour rotting corpse to the worms!
Your hallowed positionNatop the worm pile appears to be most tenuous
Now your failureNwill be my opportunity
you gotNone dysfunctional family
Nmy father decreed his heir to the family throneNmust be strong enough to kill his own brotherNin battle if necessary
I beat my brother but I could not kill him
Only one thing is certain Kahn must die
This time you'll kill him
So what do we do?
You will do your best
It is all that can be expected I will pray for you all
Listen to me Liu is our only hope
I want to fight Kahn but I may not be ready
You must believe in yourself We believe in you
My home
The TempleNof the Order of Light
Your family There's so little time left
Whatever time we have we must use well
Are we really ready to die here?
If we die we will die in battle Together
Prepare for final battle!
son the mergerNof realms will be complete you aloneNhave the power to end this
Stop! I do not want to remember youNthis weak!
It is not weak to value life!
Rayden
To rule all realmsNwith your family
They are my family
Then you shall die with the restNof your pathetic human race! Finish him!
You should have killed me when you had the chance brother
My brother died a long time ago anyway
I win brother
You cannot die
I am proud to die a mortal
Like you
This is the beginningNof the end!
Show them the way to oblivion!
Mr Ed is mine
I'll take my mother
Leftovers are fine with me
I'll make you eat that thing
I can't takeNtoo much more of this
Is that all you got?
Is that any wayNto treat your mother?
My mother's dead
As soon will be her daughter
Kahn
Pathetic and weak
Clearly Rayden has molded youNin his image
Without your weapons you are no match for Motaro
help!
I got everything I needNright here!
Get off her
Sonya
NI'm fine huh?
huh?
Whatever you are you will liveNto see the end of Kahn to give my mother's soul peace
Liu Kang You will fail!
I can feel
Now I done seen everything
Impressive You've come prepared
But not good enough
Kahn Just like the blood of a mortal
How can this be?
I warned youNthere would be consequences for breaking the sacred rules
But I did not expect this
Must I do everything for you?
The fate of the universe will be decided as it should be
In Mortal Kombat
Nnor mine!
and I will!
That was the longest weekNof my life
Jax Could've been worse
Could've been the last weekNof our lives
I guess that's right
What's up with that?
Was I dead?
It is only rightNthat Shinnok's son be allowed to take his placeNin the Eternal Palace
You've become one of us
Liu
You've all made me very proud
I will be watching you so stay out of trouble
And remember be there for one another
Subtitles ßy MühàmmáÐ Ü§mâñ
Previously on Siberia...
A tiger! A fucking tiger!
I couldn't believe it.
It was like something a seven year old would tell me...
"Oh, I saw a tiger in the woods..."
- Wondering what would do that to a tiger.
It's on fire... and it's green...
- What's on fire?
- The sky.
You know, there's something about Carolina.
I feel like I recognize her.
- Fire in the woods, man. - Got to get some water.
I told you this was a mistake!
That's all we had, man. That's all we had.
Does anyone recognize this?
We found Johnny's shirt.
And it was full of food from the shed.
I get what it looks like. I see that.
But I didn't steal the food, and I didn't burn down the shed.
Someone obviously doesn't like me, and they're trying to set me up.
People weren't taking too kindly me being at camp 'cause apparently I stole food from the shed and then burned it down.
Someone framed me.
They wrapped my shirt around some food, hid it in the woods.
I don't know who did it.
You know, frankly, I don't really care anymore, you know?
I don't really need them anyways.
You know, obviously, I can take care of myself.
Took them how long to build a fire?
I did it in five minutes in the dark.
Johnny's gonna just stay out in the woods.
And why shouldn't he?
After all the crap that he's pulled?
And if he's not, you got a better chance of winning.
And you can keep his bed.
I want to make it to the end, but I want to do it as a team, kind of like how Neeko's doing it, you know?
Can I tell you something?
You're a smart guy.
You know that Neeko is a professional athlete?
He plays game for living.
How about maybe he's playing this game that he's a very nice guy, everybody trusts him, just to win the game?
Have you ever thought about it?
I don't think you should trust him.
Can't trust anybody.
Guys?
I get up early, and as soon as I open the door,
I practically ran into this spear that's stuck in the ground.
It felt like a threat.
It says...
It means "get out."
It's just another thing to throw on the pile of what the hell's going on here.
It's a nice prop. Look at it.
It's not real. Nice scare tactic.
They're watching. I'm sure they're loving this.
Why is it in front of our cabin and not yours?
Who wants you guys to get out?
Well, this is here on purpose. That's for sure.
It's here on purpose. It's here for a reason.
You guys gonna be so gullible to fall for this, really?
Who else could've left that spear?
Besides Production, who could've done it?
We're the only people out here.
Aren't we?
- Are you okay?
I mean, aren't you still scared?
The spear this morning telling us to leave?
That doesn't scare you at all?
I think, at this point, it's just all mind games.
I miss home. I miss my family.
I even miss my stupid ex-boyfriend.
This place is-- it's getting to me.
I'm thinking about pushing the button.
I don't want you to go.
You know what I mean? I think-- I think we can win this.
We just need to--
But I don't need to stay.
I don't understand why I'm even staying.
I don't need the money that badly.
I do.
I've been a lone wolf for a while, you know?
I've been on my own for a while.
I'm probably, without knowing it, less lonely than I have been in a long time because I'm interacting with people more often than I have in many years.
Now I consider Daniel a friend.
He's a good kid.
If I had a son, I'd be proud if he was like Daniel.
- Just watching those two. - Mm-hmm.
I don't want to overstep my bounds, you know.
I don't know how she feels about me, and so I'm just kind of--
I'm taking it slow, but at the same time, it's really hard 'cause I really want to, you know, see where this is gonna go.
At the same time, I don't want to get hurt.
She knows you exist.
How would I really get her to? I don't know, like...
Get her to what?
Like me like me.
You can't get her to like you.
Either she does or she doesn't.
You know?
How beautiful is it?
This is so nice.
_
_
I'm being naughty.
It's beautiful in, though.
_
You must be hot.
- No good... _
- No one's here. - It's trouble.
No one's here. I'm not gonna tell anyone.
You want to come.
- Oh, yeah?
_
You'll thank me once you're in here.
It's beautiful.
_
Careful.
_
I'm gonna film us.
_
You promise you'll erase it?
_
- Promise me?
- I promise.
Annie? Wait, Annie.
You shouldn't be walking out here alone.
It's not safe.
_
Come on, it's not safe. Stop. Wait.
Don't be like this.
Be like what?
Look, I--
It's not the same thing for me, okay?
I'm not going back to a life or a job that I like or family or friends or even an ex-boyfriend, and I get that you're sad about that.
But you're forgetting about who's here for you right now, and you're turning your back on me.
I like her.
It's been a while since I've been with anybody, but I--
We get along so well.
I just feel like a dumbass now.
I mean, she's probably not gonna talk to me for the rest of the time, if she does stay.
- There you are. - How's it going?
Good.
I just wanted to talk to you.
Uh-huh?
Um, so, Victoria's gone.
Um, I'm just wondering what's going on with her bed.
Oh, it's-- well, it's free right now.
So no one would mind if I moved in?
Um... yeah, yeah.
I mean, I don't mind.
I don't know what the other girls other think, but it's good with me.
Awesome. All right, I'll go grab my things.
It's not that I didn't have fun with the boys.
I just feel like my time there is done.
It's served its purpose, and I want to--
I want to get to know the girls a bit better.
- I'm leaving.
You mean the show?
No, you idiot.
I'm gonna move into Victoria's old bed.
Wait. Why?
Because it's free.
I know, but I thought you liked it here with me.
You said we are great roommates.
Yes, we were, and thank you for letting me stay.
Just, I don't know. I want to be with the girls now.
Come on, Esther.
Don't you think we should team up?
We are both smarter than everyone else here.
We can win this thing-- together.
Ohh, I like your style. I will think about it.
But hold on. Hold on. Hold on.
I was just thinking that we could have something...
That we could get romantic a little bit?
Don't laugh.
Really? I don't do romance.
Look, we're playing a game.
I'm playing a game-- for money.
I don't do romance, and I'm not playing a dating game.
Fuck you, bitch!
You're not going anywhere.
I was just kidding, Esther.
I'm just kidding. Esther.
Don't you fucking touch me again.
Come on! I'm just-
- I was just kidding!
I think I was in shock.
I-I don't know.
It happened so quickly.
But he grabbed me here, pushed me up against the bunk, and then he backed off.
Esther is a player. We all know that.
And I played with her, too.
So she was on the way out.
I just pushed her a little bit on the bed, just jokingly, like pretending that I'm like scaring her.
"You're gonna stay here," or something.
She just, like, freaked out.
She pushed me away.
She's like, "don't talk to me like that."
Stormed out, like mad.
And I was just telling her, "I'm joking.
You know me. I always joke around.
I was just joking with you."
I didn't get it, seriously.
She just freaked out, and it was just a pure joke.
What are you showing me?
It was right here.
Big huge carcass.
Guts hanging out and everything.
Look at what? The blood?
It could've been anything.
It could've been a bird. It could've been a deer.
Why would I make this up?
Why would I lie?
There was a huge-- there was a huge tiger there.
I guess they took it. The producers took it.
The producers?
I think she thinks that I could've been trying to scare her, play a sick joke on her.
I was kind of a bit shocked because I didn't think she saw me as that kind of person.
For all I know, Johnny took it.
Johnny took it?
He probably dragged it off into there and hid it or something.
Oh, now Johnny does everything?
Not only do we have to worry about the producers playing mind games with us, we got to worry about that guy.
Hopefully he's done us all a favor and gone and pushed the button to get out of here.
I don't think he's as bad as you think.
Why are you always defending him?
I'm telling you that guy's dangerous.
You need to watch yourself!
I'm kind of baffled where it's gone, you know, 'cause this thing was pretty big, you know.
It would've taken a lot of force or something pretty hefty to get it out of there, and there was no trail.
There was no kind of like a trail of where it could've been dragged to.
It's like it was almost picked up and gone.
Got some traps set up along this way somewhere.
I found some deer trails I scouted earlier.
Hope they catch something.
The first night in the woods by myself was pretty awesome, actually.
Had a nice little fire. Weather was nice.
You know, wrapped up.
It was nice being on my own.
It's what I wanted to do originally, too, is, you know, be by myself, take care of myself, do my own thing, and I got that, so pretty content.
What the hell did this, man?
This thing's...
I mean, it, obviously, it ripped the deer while it was standing here.
It was strong enough to rip it off-- rip the, like, rip its bone in half.
I'm trying to catch some food, but something got to it before me, it looks like.
I just came to try to convince you to come back.
Try to convince me to come back, to the camp?
Yeah, I don't think it's safe for you to be out here.
I think it's safer here than being back at camp where a bunch of people don't like me thanks to you, making those wild accusations.
Just, whatever happened,
I don't think it's safe for you to stay out here.
Well, you know what?
I really don't need you trying to be nice to me.
I'll be fine on my own, okay?
Y'all try taking care of yourselves, too, all right?
If that's how you want to be, then fine.
Nah, that's-- that's not good enough.
That ain't good enough.
Hey, Irene.
Whatcha doing?
Collecting some acorns.
- Oh.
If you mash them up, you can make like a paste and make a pancake out of it.
Is it-- does it taste good?
You want me to help?
Oh, sure. That'd be great. Yeah.
They're kind of scattered all over.
Daniel is a really, really nice, really sweet person, and he has such a gentle-- a very gentle spirit,
I guess you can say.
It's a Siberian squill.
I'm not really big on flowers.
Well, you know, they're pretty, but it's kind of odd, the whole idea of someone giving someone a flower 'cause it's like, "Oh, you know, I like you, so let me give you something that's dying."
It never really made sense to me.
Something more permanent would be nice, you know, even a rock would be better.
She's got so much complexity to her, you know?
I find out something new about her every day, it seems like, and it's a pretty big thing that I would've never expected out of her.
She's just-- she's amazing.
I can't find the path.
We're lost.
- We're not lost. - No, we're lost.
I don't know where we're going.
In the middle of the wood, very close to the river,
I found this really weird-looking tree.
I mean, it wasn't a tree. It was something different.
It had a face shape.
It had hair.
My name is Miljan.
It's really nice to meet you.
Ogdee?
This is my friend Ogdee.
We go way back, man.
He's so bad.
I spoke to it. We had a little conversation.
Ogdee is my old friend from high school.
- Esther. Esther. - What?
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
_
Out?
Where do you go all day, anyway?
I can't believe you got us so lost.
We're not lost.
Yes, we are. Where are we?
Do you know where we are?
We're in Siberia.
Not funny.
Oh, God! What is that?
I heard it. Come on.
There might be something out here. Come on.
Sorry. I'm going to get water. Where are you going?
Home-- where the hell is it?
That way.
Why is she being such a bitch?
Why are you here, by the way, alone?
That's suspicious.
Shut up, Miljan.
Guys, have you seen Carolina?
No. She hasn't come back.
You mean she's not back yet?
She's not back. I have no idea where she is.
I haven't seen her.
You do know she's out there with Johnny?
Yeah, tell me about it. I know.
Well, I don't know about you, but I feel like I should go and look for her.
I don't-- I don't feel comfortable with her with Johnny.
Before it gets too late, I think we should.
I'm game, yeah.
- You're gonna come with me?
Gentlemen.
I was in the woods.
Have you seen Carolina?
She's out there with Johnny.
Oh, she'll be fine, guys.
- Come on. - Are you serious?
Yes. They're probably having sex or something.
Oh, you're a funny guy.
Don't be naive. You didn't notice the chemistry they had?
Hey, guys, listen. I'm gonna look for her.
I don't know about you.
Just sitting here talking.
Hey, it's dark outside.
Get on the bed. Get onto the bed!
The bed?
The cab started shaking...
Ran outside, and the sky this just this odd color that I've never seen in my life, and I'm thinking it can't be the show doing this because that's way out of their powers and their control.
It's like-- it's like the sky's on fire.
It's like the sky's on fire.
The sky went from dark to light, and it looked like it was on fire, just like Victoria said.
If this is all part of the game, it's beyond me at this point.
I don't understand how they could pull it off.
I feel like I'm on another planet.
I feel like I walked into some kind of a dream or a nightmare, and nobody-- nobody has any answers.
I don't have an answer.
I could sit here all day long and just-- it's way above my pay scale.
- Is it moving?
- It just keeps moving.
Carolina never came back today, did she?
Yeah.
Where-- where are they?
She's still in the woods-- the forest.
Well, this can't stop us. We still have to find her.
We can't leave her out there.
We better go now.
We're just gonna go look for her-- me and Sam, Daniel, Miljan as well.
Oh, my God. Carolina?
Carolina. Are you okay?
Oh, my God. Carolina!
Then we see Carolina stumbling towards the girls' cabin, and the girls go rushing over to her.
Are you hurt somewhere?
- Look at all the blood.
She's bleeding.
Guys, don't, don't-- don't go to her.
Oh, my God, look at her arm. Look at her arm.
Carolina, what happened?
Carolina shows up, and she's battered and disoriented.
She couldn't even speak. She's trembling.
She doesn't remember.
What do you remember?
She didn't know what was going on.
She was saying she couldn't even, like, remember what she'd been doing out there.
She was just talking nonsense, and it was really jolting to see her come back like that.
_
You were with John?
What were you doing with Johnny?
Get her some water. Get her some help.
Carolina, were you with Johnny?
She said she was. What were you doing with Johnny?
_
_
She said the name "Johnny."
At that point, I just, you know, lost it.
Listen to me. Listen to me. Listen to me.
For what?
Here, just come here. Come here.
I want to say something to you.
- Listen to me!
It's important. You got to make sure.
You look at his hands.
His hands are a tell-tale sign, okay?
His hands will tell you if he did something.
Stay here with the girls. Stay here with the girls!
I'm not wasting any more time with this guy.
Everyone wants to keep him around, thinking,
"Oh, yeah, he'll turn around and be a good guy."
No, I don't think so.
I'm not gonna lay around waiting for him to come stab me in the back.
- She's been through a lot. - Yeah.
We're gonna look after you, okay?
We don't know where Johnny is.
Carolina sort of-- she couldn't say much, but she said that she was-- they were fighting-- her and Johnny were fighting.
And then, now she looks like this, so Johnny should be probably fearing for his life right now because Sam and Neeko went after him.
Let's just keep moving.
Move. Move.
_
The whole walking through the woods and hearing noises coming from places that, you know--
We stop and we look, and there's nothing there.
It's just this whole atmosphere that everything just feels like you're being watched, you know.
Whether, you know, whether you're in the woods or in the cabin, you always feel like something is watching you, and the past two nights,
I haven't slept very well, you know.
So I'm just-- you know, you're always looking over your shoulder.
You always think something's there, and, like, the whole thing with the sky now...
Well, he's obviously around here somewhere.
You keep saying "he," "he."
Look how thick the brush is here.
If there's somebody around here, we'd see them.
We hear other things.
All of a sudden, something goes flying.
I think we should be talking more in the sense of "what."
I'll go see if the water's boiled.
I don't want to die.
I didn't ever expect that that would be a possibility on this show, and every day that I'm here,
I feel like I'm an idiot for staying, that I am gonna end up like Tommy.
I don't deal well with-- Abuse is not something that...
I can handle right now.
I'm scared.
And Johnny was already on the outs with the group for stealing food.
I just-- How could he do that to her?
It didn't make sense.
She's such a nice lady.
Hey. What did you do?
- What did you do to Carolina?
I don't know what you're talking about.
What do you mean you don't know what I'm talking about?
- What'd you do to her?
- I didn't--
She's all cut up and shit.
I don't-
- I don't know. I...
I don't know. I just- - I kind of came to.
I was walking around, and...
I don't know. I was-
You saw her where?
You got to tell me what happened.
We were in the woods, and...
I don't really-- I don't really remember.
I get approached by Daniel, and basically started accusing me of hurting Carolina.
What did you to do her? !
The last thing she remembers is getting in a fight with you, so you can't come back here and tell me that you didn't touch her!
Then what happened to her?
That's not a very good answer right now, man.
I don't-- trust me.
Hey. You hear that?
At the camp.
You're such a scumbag.
So she just fell down and ended up that way?
I was in a complete haze. I had no recollection.
I was like blacked out, like I drank too much.
He doesn't look like he knows what's going on.
- Then what happened to her?
You were together, weren't you?
- You said that. - Shit!
Neeko! Neeko!
Guys, he doesn't know!
- Motherfucker! - Come on! Stop it!
- Stop! Stop it! - Come on!
Stop it! Neeko, stop it! He didn't do it!
Carolina starts screaming, "It's not him.
He didn't do it."
You said you don't remember.
You said you don't remember.
You're a dead man. You're a fucking dead man.
Listen. Listen. Hey, hey.
Calm down. Listen.
Talk to me.
Johnny doesn't know anything?
He doesn't remember anything.
It was just her and him in the forest.
I know that. I know that.
I saw it in his eyes, okay?
All I remember is I talked to her.
We were arguing.
And then I-I came here, and I started getting accused, and I don't even know what the fuck is going on.
If we caught him in the woods, he would've been dead.
When I saw that look in his eyes,
I just felt that I needed to take a step back.
Remember the way she came into camp?
He's got the same look on his face.
Does she remember anything?
Show us your hands.
Oh, yeah. I've seen that before.
What's that from?
Nothing's making sense here.
And just to be angry and become a bunch of animals--
We can't go killing each other.
We're still human beings.
I don't like things that I can't explain and that I don't have at least some sort of control over.
The sky changing color and looking like fire-- the producers, the show can't do that.
We're talking supernatural stuff now.
Regardless of everything else, that's real, and that scared the hell out of me.
It seems like everybody at camp was convinced that I was the person that hurt her.
I've never hit a woman in my life.
I don't know why I would.
I don't remember anything, but...
I can't say that I didn't 'cause I don't--
But I know in my heart I wouldn't do that.
I don't remember anything.
All I remember is that I was... with--
Went to get Johnny.
He was in the woods. I found him, and I...
It's all one big blur, like one big blackout.
I have all these marks on my body, and my shirt is broken, and I don't remember.
So you're telling me this is real.
It looks like it's native, handmade.
It looks like it's just a prop to me.
Well, if it's a prop, it's really well-made 'cause you see the barbs.
They're curved. That's exactly how it should look.
This is ox.
It's real ox.
And it's balanced for throwing.
It just looks perfect.
It's your choice to believe in it or not, but this is real, so...
I don't have to deal with lies in figuring out what is true, what is not.
I have to know the environment I'm in.
I have to know what's out there in order to protect myself and survive.
So, I found this symbol that is really strange.
It has four lines and little triangles on the ends.
Then I found another one and another one, and I realized it's a path.
I should follow them.
At the end, it was very close to the settlement.
I found the last one.
And I found this box. It was a metal box.
I opened it, and it was a book.
I didn't understand anything because it was in a different language.
I would assume it's Russian because it's cyrillic letters.
In the middle of me looking at it, somebody was watching at me.
It was a person. He's staring at me.
And he just disappeared in a second.
So there are people out there.
I was just gonna try and make things better, and, like, apologize, and just wanted to let her know that I didn't, you know,
I didn't want to screw anything up or make anything awkward for her.
I guess I was in a weird mood, and I just want to apologize because I don't want to make you feel uncomfortable or anything, because I'm really glad you're--
When I realized what Annie's real feelings were for me,
I just thought...
"I'm sort of open to love in any form right now."
So I kissed her.
Which I kind of surprised myself at, to be honest.
Don't worry about it.
Can I have a seat?
I'm okay. You?
I wanted to go check on her to see how she was doing 'cause I knew she had scratches and stuff on her, and she was sure freaked out like I was.
Do you remember anything from last night?
No. I don't remember a thing.
I don't remember anything either.
But I know you didn't hurt me.
I would never hurt you.
♪ people in life, they will come and go ♪
♪ like the boats sailing by my door ♪
♪ you can be the ocean, you can be the shore ♪
♪ this mystery wind, she will always blow ♪
♪ don't worry, don't worry, dear, no more ♪
♪ and now your message in a bottle ♪
♪ is being tumbled in the beach flies ♪
♪ you can be the lilies in the fields ♪
♪ I'll be the fool ♪
♪ but don't worry, don't worry, dear, no more ♪
♪ trouble in life, it will come and go ♪
Can I ask you something, though?
Why'd you set me up?
With the shed and the food?
She couldn't even look me in the eye.
And I was like, "Well..."
I was like, "It tells me all I need to know,"
so I was like-- got the hell out of there.
Stop, please. Johnny, wait for me.
- Give me a break. Oh, my God. - Hey.
I know that. I know that.
- Johnny. - I know that.
She said, like, this slogan.
Like, "I know that. I know that from somewhere."
And then it just-- the light bulb went off.
Yeah, that's like your slogan.
She's that actress from that show that--
I'm like, "That's how I know you."
I didn't want to do that.
I didn't want-
- I asked them.
You didn't want to do what?
I didn't want to burn it down. I didn't want to set you up.
They told me to.
Who's they?
The producers.
So you're-- you're helping the show?
You're...
A...
Bitch.
- Did you... just swear? - That's right.
Relay it just like that.
Relay this message to the ghost that you see.
You must blame her a lot for leaving you behind all alone.
So, you liked her that much?
Enough to swear at her?
If I happen to see her again, I'll relay it to her.
I'll tell her that you still like her a lot.
Don't twist things around in your head. It's an insult just like how it sounds.
- 'You're a bitch.'
She's a bad person.
A very bad person. That's what they all say when they miss someone very much.
No, that's not right.
If you're going to relay it to her like that... then just get lost, Ms.Tae.
But, it still makes me so happy to know that you believe me.
No, I don't believe you.
So, don't be happy.
I've been so lonely and scared all this time.
Meeting you was like a ray of sunshine.
You have no idea how reassuring it is to know that I have a place to escape to whenever I get scared.
That's not right either.
You're telling me that I'm your place of escape?
Go ahead and try knocking on my door. I will never open my door to you.
Please open it.
- No, I won't open.
- You're the only form of escape that I have. I'm just so scared.
Please open up for me.
Episode 3.
It's a designer brand.
What is this doing here?
Is there only one shoe?
I wonder if the lost and found department is still open.
Give it back.
- That was...
- I heard it, too.
I tripped on something up there.
Hi, Kang Woo. She said she fell down the stairs.
Can you try moving your foot?
It hurts a little.
I didn't see anything up there that you could've tripped on.
I'm positive that there was something up there.
The floor is slippery.
The floor is still waxy.
The cleaning team needs to re-clean the floors.
- Right now. Team Leader Kang Woo can take Deputy Ahn to the hospital.
Yes, I understand.
I guess we won't be able to go home together tonight.
I have to clean up around here, too. Please take her to the hospital safely.
Then, I'll see you at home.
Yes, I'll see you at home.
- Kang Woo and I live...
- Forget it. I'm not curious to know.
Deputy Ahn said that she has some files that she needs to get to the Vice President.
I think I need to go get them from her.
Go ahead. I can get myself home.
- Will you be alright?
That startled me.
Have I never driven this car before?
Here I thought I was going to go home like the rest of the normal people.
It's a shoe.
It's so pretty.
I want to go on dates with men wearing shoes like these.
I wonder if the other shoe is around.
Sear...ch.
Home.
Okay, I got it.
I figured it out.
I figured it out. You did good.
You did good.
President Joo!
Please open the door!
- Please open the door!
- I'm not opening it.
- Get lost.
- President Joo!
What is it that you're getting so worked up about?
Master.
This is huge!
What did you do with your other shoe?
And what's with the shoe in your hand?
The owner of this shoe is chasing after me.
The owner of this shoe... must be dead.
It seems that she died instantly at the moment of impact.
You think it was drunk driving?
She must've been pretty out of her mind... to drive with only one shoe on?
- Please pull your skirt down.
Mind your own business and go away.
Please stop what you're doing. If you continue, I will have you arrested.
I know you.
How could you have manhandled me like that?
Anyone would agree that your behavior looked very suspicious.
I need to buy something, but my manager isn't around right now.
When I looked down from my hospital room.
I noticed that the sunroof was left open so I came down here to get some money.
That round container in there...
I have my money in there.
My money! That's what I was trying to get.
- That's what you need?
- There's only 1,000 won in here. - Huh?
What is it that you need?
Two bottles of soju, one dried squid, and one dried cuttlefish.
Did I get it right?
You even had the squid grilled?
How very sensible of you.
If you can handle drinking two bottles of soju by yourself... why are you staying at the hospital?
Fine, I'm faking it.
I'm doing it because I was stuck in a jam, and I had no other choice.
Why? - Are you going to tell the reporters?
I understand that you were stuck in a jam.
Are you pitying me right now?
If you're pitying me because I was left at the altar, then don't do it.
Aren't you doing all this so that you could gain people's pity?
Just tell me what your number is. I'll send you the money for this.
No, forget it.
I hope that the soju will be a better remedy for you than your hospital stay.
Did he just refuse my offer to exchange numbers?
How nonsensical.
- Are you Choi Yoon Hee's husband?
Is that my wife?
I'm sorry, but she didn't make it.
Yoon Hee!
Are you sure that the woman who died is in there right now?
Yes. Should we go?
You.
Are you really going to go in there like that?
I don't have my other shoe.
It's actually rather cushy and comfortable because there are still some tissues left in there.
I'm not talking about your sense of action, but I'm talking about how you look.
Aren't you even embarrassed?
There was a time when I got so scared at the bathhouse that I just ran out of there and had to go home wearing a cardboard box.
So, something like this doesn't embarrass me at all.
You.
If the owner of that shoe isn't in there you're going to admit yourself in this hospital with that tissue box on your foot.
I really don't like coming here unless I absolutely have to.
Where are you saying the owner of that shoe is?
Now that you've seen with your own eyes, do you believe me?
Imagine how scared I am all the time? I'm telling you that ghosts really do exist. Doesn't that scare you?
No, I'm not scared.
What does it matter when I don't see them myself?
I don't use my imagination on useless stuff.
I'm telling you!
She chased after me like this!
- Don't do what?
- She appeared out of nowhere like this!
- Don't do that.
Okay, fine. I bet it's scary for you.
But when I hold onto you like this... I don't see them anymore.
Can you now understand why I'm always hanging onto you?
Joong Won doesn't let just anyone get close to him.
He's calculating the feasibility and the fit of the type of women that he wants to be with and he won't relegate himself to spend his time with anyone he doesn't deem worthy.
And just like anything else he does with his life and business... he's rather picky.
So, what you're telling me is... that you don't think that he's distancing himself away from women because of Hee Joo?
In other words, it means that he has yet to meet a woman who'll be beneficial to his business?
Since he has a calculator for a brain, I'm sure he'll make the right choice.
But there are those rare people who just can't be figured out with normal calculations.
It's not because of your money... or your good looks.
It's because I can see ghosts.
I'm not a candy girl who's out to seduce you.
Are you a Christian?
Sixth sense, or intuition. Are you telling me you have that?
Yes, it's unexpected, isn't it?
I thought you were some gold digger, but it's just your intuition?
If the reason why you stick yourself to me is because of those ghosts...
I mean, those beings... then what's the reason for those being hanging onto you like that?
They come to ask me to do things for them.
They're not like living people... who can formally explains their situations and asks you for your help.
They always show up out of nowhere to tell me what they want me to know and they keep coming around me until I do what they want me to do and torment me to the point where I can't even get any sleep.
What is it that the owner of that shoe wants from you?
She wants me to give this shoe to her husband.
She told me to tell him that she'll be watching over him.
That man probably is the shoe owner's husband, right?
He's one of the shop owners at Kingdom.
Then she must've lost her shoe when she came to see her husband.
This must be very special to him.
She's dead. I'm telling you, she's dead.
This truly is a miracle.
She took it upon herself and died.
The way her husband was smiling was even scarier than the ghost herself.
When I got so scared earlier and ran away... I forgot to take one of my shoes in my haste to run away from the ghost.
That's what it must've been like for her.
What do you think it was that she saw... when she left her shoe and ran away?
I don't use my imagination on useless things.
I have a feeling that she saw something that made her very angry and upset.
She's dead. I'm telling you, she's dead.
She took it upon herself and died.
If I told him that his dead wife was watching over him... then I bet he wouldn't be laughing like that, right?
Okay, good luck with that.
Go find out what injustice he did to her, and get revenge for her, too.
- Why would I?
- I can't go back there without you.
I'm scared of her. I don't know what other ghosts may come up to me.
- I need you. - Ah.
I'm your special shield, isn't that right?
You said that you can't see them when you're touching me, right?
You said you want to run to me and cling onto me when you're scared.
But by any chance... do they ever give you any useful information?
Like what the stock market is going to be like in the morning or where I can dig to find all the oil... or where are all the countless numbers of lost treasure chests buried at?
And if nothing else, do they tell you what the next lottery winning numbers will be?
Then, I don't need you.
Your intuition that only sees and hears useless things holds no value to me. Zero.
But, let me give you one piece of advice based on what I've seen and heard here.
Because you go around doing what you do, in other people's eyes... You're just a crazy woman walking around with that tissue box on your foot. Someone who doesn't even know how to be embarrassed.
Get your head on straight... and just worry about yourself.
President Joo... you know that I'm not crazy.
- You saw it for yourself and believe me.
- No. I'm only going to see what I want to see, and believe only in what I want to believe in.
I'm just going to see you as a crazy woman, and I'm not going to believe anything you say.
Do you know what's going to happen with the stocks tomorrow?
Can you even tell me what the winning lottery numbers are?
You can't even tell me anything.
Why don't you let me know some of these things before you ask me for my help?
2,000 won?
Again?
I did have the shoes.
It is sturdy.
Nice and cushy, too. They don't seem bad to wear.
What is this?
It fell apart.
It fell apart!
What do I do? All the tissues are falling out.
Tae Gong Shil.
Kang Woo.
I'm on my way home after dropping Deputy Ahn off at the hospital.
I was at the hospital, too.
Is she... okay?
I lost my shoe.
I look like a crazy person walking around like this, don't I?
Wearing a tissue box to protect your foot is a proof that you're a quick thinker.
Right?
I wore it because I had to. I'm not wearing it because I'm crazy.
But it's falling apart, and I don't know what to do. What do I do?
I think that tissue box is dead now after having completed its mission.
I think we need to call in some reinforcements.
I see a taxi heading this way. Why don't we share it?
My defense line is wounded, but I found myself some new reinforcements.
No, nothing.
You're diverting from your path.
Be quiet.
I shouldn't have seen those.
But... did she sprint home with the tissue box on her foot?
Where did she go?
You're diverting from your path.
I got it. I'm just going to go on my own.
Turn right.
What is this?
Right turn again?
Then it wasn't the right place earlier?
Your wife was driving with only one shoe on her foot. I thought she was drunk driving, but she wasn't.
- Is there a problem?
- No. I just thought that it was weird that she was driving while wearing only one shoe.
Kim.
Is he saying that something bad happened to my daughter which caused the accident?
Please calm down, Mother-in-law.
I'm sure she must've lost her other shoe somewhere.
Did you look for the shoe?
You didn't find it?
Thanks for bringing me back home.
If you're thankful, would it be okay for me to ask you something?
What is it?
The special person at Kingdom Enterprises that you spoke of the last time... is it President Joo Joong Won?
Is he also the reason why you started working at Kingdom?
I saw that he came all the way here to visit you the other day.
Do you two have a special relationship?
I wanted to know if it's okay for us to be coming home together like this.
We wouldn't be able to do that if you're his special woman.
I'm not that kind of a special woman.
To President Joo...
I'm just... a crazy woman.
Then, let's continue to go home together like this.
Thanks for everything today.
Who is that man?
He's the Team Leader of the security team at Kingdom Enterprises?
- And he lives in Room 404?
- Yeah.
Does that man... know about your mental state?
If he knew, I doubt he'd suggest going home together after work.
Gong Shil.
The reason you're like this... may be because you lack energy.
Why don't you get closer to that guy and charge up some of your energy?
My energy?
You see it all the time in period dramas.
When a righteous woman sleeps with a man she is said to have dirtied her energy, and kicked out of her household.
The fact that you see those things... could be a sign of weak energy.
Who knows? Maybe if you receive some of a man's energy, things might get better?
Maybe you're right?
I wonder if that man is special to me because he has really strong energy?
That man? Who would that be?
- There's just someone.
- Whoever it is, just let him give it to you.
Suck him of his energy, okay?
How am I to do that when he won't even let me touch him?
Let's suck on 404's energy for now.
Hurry up and go to sleep.
You have to get to work in the morning so that you can come home with him tomorrow.
I can't go to sleep. What if I fall too deep in sleep and have it taken from me like the last time?
Is... something in here right now?
Our summer revenue figures are doing great.
Kingdom is really climbing up.
Giant Mall will be opening soon. We need to come up with a plan of attack to make sure that they don't defeat us.
This store has the third highest revenue volume in this place.
The revenue in this shop isn't all that great.
Let's just keep going.
This store has the highest revenue volume.
- President Joo.
- Hello, thank you for all your hard work.
If there's anything that you ever need, please don't hesitate to ask me.
- But please keep up your great work. Thank you so much.
That poster was made when we thought Yi Ryung was going to marry the soccer player.
Do you think it's still okay to be hanging that up now that the wedding is off?
Look at how fierce it looks.
That poster is going to be a great piece of advertisement.
I don't think that Tae Yi Ryung is going to like this.
We've already paid her for the modeling fee.
Even if she doesn't like it... what can she do about it?
I like it.
She said this was the place.
The owner of this shop's wife died in an accident a few days ago.
This shop is our fourth highest revenue grossing store.
I think that Giant Mall has approached him about opening up a store at their mall but I doubt he'll make his move over there since he signed a contract with me.
I've seen something that makes it difficult for me to trust him.
Look into him some more.
Look into it.
That shop owner's wife... did you hear that she died last week?
I heard that he was so devoted to his wife.
That's too bad.
I've seen that couple, too.
I saw that couple here on a date... and they were planning on taking a hiking trip somewhere on their day off.
The husband seemed so kind.
The wife is extremely rich. She even opened up that shop for him, so of course he should be nice to her.
I heard that his mother-in-law is even richer.
I heard that she owns a few buildings in Gangnam. Then let's think about this.
Her one and only daughter is dead... and the only person she has left is her son-in-law. Then all her money will go to...
He's hit the jackpot.
- Awesome. - He's hit the mother load.
Anyways, he's a nice man who was really good to his wife.
So, I guess he deserves the money.
- Gong Shil.
- Gong Ri... If I'm the only person who says he's bad when everyone else thinks he's a good person... then no one would believe me, right?
Did you... did you see something again?
Gong Shil.
Let's stay here for a while and try to make a life here.
You have to do well so that you can continue to go home with that man.
And you can receive his energy, too.
I'm sorry, Gong Ri. I'm going to get going.
Bye.
I always feel like there's something lurking whenever Gong Shil stops by.
Is... someone there?
Go away.
- Go, go away.
- By any chance... is that woman your little sister?
Yes, she is.
Why do you ask?
It's just that I... want to become friends with her.
Let me help you clean this up.
Doesn't he have any sympathy?
How could he have hung these up when she had to be admitted in the hospital?
Let's go protest this right now.
- This is it?
- What in the world is this?
It's not bad.
Rather than getting pitied while dressed in hospital gowns... being seen dressed like this while kicking that ball seems to suit me better.
Are you really... okay with this?
Since we're already here... should we find out who the woman that ruined my wedding was?
Tae Gong Shil?
Is she someone you know?
No, it can't be her.
Um...
- Are you doing okay?
- Yes. I can't take a day off of work over a small injury like this.
Um...
You said you tripped on something when you fell down the stairs the other night?
By any chance... did you see this shoe when you fell the other night?
That's the same shoe that I picked up in the hallway that night.
Where did you picked it up from?
My Yoon Hee!
So... did you come from that way?
So, you fell down like this when the shoe came off?
She... told me that the shoe was found right here.
This is very close to her husband's shop.
That's where the shoe was?
Then that's just garbage.
And you're the cleaning crew. Throwing trash away in the trash can is part of your job.
You know that this isn't trash.
You know exactly what I'm trying to do here.
In my eyes... you're an employee at the risk of getting fired for your strange behaviors.
And for being lazy enough to sprawl yourself on the ground like this.
Those shoes.
Don't they look like the same pair of shoes as this one to you?
Right?
So what?
Even if I keep denying it and say that I don't want to know...
I can't just ignore it when I see it.
That's just how I am.
Again... again... again!
I just saw something that I shouldn't have seen.
Honey, do you have to go hiking with your wife again on your next day off?
I have to keep going with her so that no one will suspect me when she has an accident.
Does your wife like to go hiking?
Yeah, she likes it.
Since she has no idea that she's looking around for her death spot.
Yoon Hee.
Hear me out.
So, you're wearing those shoes out in the open now?
Your wife is dead.
I haven't been able to wear them... because I was afraid of getting caught wearing the same shoes.
But there's no risk of that happening now. Be careful.
Once that old lady is dead... who do you think is going to get all this?
She still looks perfectly healthy.
Who knows when she'll die? She's not doing so well since the death of her daughter.
It'll be soon enough.
We've got the luck on our side.
Giant Mall is eyeing all our high revenue grossing stores for their own.
We have to protect our stores.
You went around and met with everyone today.
My mouth feels like it's about to rip from all the smiling that I had to do.
But it was important for you to go see them since they produce all that revenue for us.
I don't know if my mouth feels like it's going to rip from all the useless things I've seen.
The woman that Tae Gong Shil went after earlier is the employee at the Dahlia shop.
I heard that the owner of that shop recently lost his wife and has sunken into despair.
It worries me that Ms.Tae may do something wrong.
Mother-in-law. What are you doing here?
You should be at home resting. Yoon Hee's no longer around to take care of you now.
So, I brought you some food for you to eat.
Mother. It's only the two of us now. We need to lean on each other.
Would you like to go hiking around the mountains just like how Yoon Hee and I used to go to together?
- That's...
- She wants me to give you this shoe. This belonged to your late wife.
This belonged... to my Yoon Hee?
She came here right before she got into that accident. She came here to see her husband... and she ended up seeing the awful things that her husband was doing.
She was so shocked and flustered that she lost her shoe along the way.
Ji Sung... What is she talking about?
You're saying that my wife came here?
No, she didn't. And that shoe didn't belong to my wife.
Don't lie.
I have no idea what she's talking about.
Mother-in-law... I already found Yoon Hee's shoe.
The police brought it to me and told me that they found it at the scene of the accident.
This is my wife's shoe.
No, it's not. That shoe belongs to another woman.
And that woman is in here right now.
What is it that you're after?
Why are you doing this to us? She told me that she would be watching over you.
She told me that she has to protect you. He's a bad man.
Look here. Why are you doing this to us?
It hasn't even been a week... since my wife died.
I wish I could follow her in her death.
I can't even follow her in her death because I have to go on living. So, why in the world are you doing this to us?
Could you still say the same thing if your wife was here watching over you right now?
If my wife was watching, then she'd know.
Just how much I loved her... and how I'm suffering without her right now.
She'd know all that.
That's a lie. - Those tears are a lie!
- Lady, what are you doing!
- Have you lost your mind?
- I saw everything! I saw you laughing at the hospital!
- And I can see that you're lying!
- You need to get out of here!
- Aren't you even sorry?
- Please leave! Ma'am! That man is a bad person!
- Your daughter wants to protect you!
- Get out of here!
Team Leader. The woman causing trouble at Dahlia shop is a member of the cleanup crew by the name of Tae Gong Shil.
Tae Gong Shil?
- That man is lying! He's a bad person! - What are you doing?
- You need to get out of here!
- Ma'am! Wait, that woman...
- He's a bad man!
- Please stop this!
- Let go of me! - It really was Tae Gong Shil.
The 'Big Sun' who everyone said was prettier and smarter than you?
I heard that she's gotten really weird, and I guess the rumor was true.
She's completely ruined.
- That grandmother is in danger! - This woman is crazy!
Excuse me. You're a security guard, right? Get this woman out of here.
Did you see what she did in there earlier?
Let's go, Mother.
Why are you sitting down there like some crazy person?
I said, get up.
Did you find the owner of that shoe?
Over there. I did find her.
But he's lying and telling everyone that the shoe doesn't belong to his wife.
it's not a lie.
This is my late wife's shoe.
That woman is talking some absurd and crazy gibberish!
Then we'll just see if this woman is crazy, or if you're the one lying.
This is the shoe that your wife was wearing when she died.
I picked it out of the trash after you threw it away at the hospital.
- The size of the shoes doesn't match.
- Oh my goodness, you're right.
Your shoe... doesn't match.
These... are a perfect match.
You're telling me that these are Yoon Hee's shoes?
Then... what was the shoe that you had?
- Bring that woman out here.
Oh my goodness, look at her shoe!
The shoe that you lied about to keep the truth hidden... is right over there.
You... deceived... both Yoon Hee and I?
She said she's going to continue to watch over you and see you again in your death.
Just like you did to her.
Do you think that my Yoon Hee... is watching right now?
The president of this place is pretty decent. To stick himself out there to take his employee's side like that.
That's how normally President Joo Joong Won behaves.
I'm Tae Yi Ryung! Let go of me.
I'm Tae Yi Ryung.
I was trying to defend myself because you grabbed me so suddenly. You did the same thing the last time. I guess you're always on guard.
Is this where you work?
Kang Woo?
Your name's Kang Woo?
I'm glad I ran into you.
- With what happened the other day... - I'm working so I have to get going.
- Someone you know?
- Did he just diss me?
- Master came and took care of everything.
- The president himself?
I'm positive that Ms.Tae is the master's secret girlfriend.
- I'm sure of what I saw.
- I guess you're right. But you don't think I grabbed her too hard earlier, do you?
I don't want to upset her.
You told me that you weren't going to believe anything and just going to ignore me. But I'm really grateful for the help you gave me.
There's no need for you to thank me. All I did was get my own revenge.
It wasn't just his own wife... but that man betrayed my Kingdom as well.
He went against his contract and signed a contract with Giant as well. The bastard.
All I did was get my revenge on him for his betrayal.
Was that why you watched over him at the hospital? Because of your own suspicions?
All I did was see something I shouldn't have because I went down the wrong path.
What is this?
I'm back at the hospital.
Let's just go home now, okay?
I went and retrieved it because I went down the wrong path and saw what he did.
Sometimes people find the most unexpected things along their path.
There are times when they find themselves in an unexpected place during their travels.
They think of it as unexpected luck, or even perhaps a sign of misfortune.
But they're not... all just coincidences.
You're telling me that it wasn't a coincidence that I got lost?
It was a right turn.
- Right turn.
- What is this? Another right turn?
Then that place earlier wasn't it?
Stop right there. Don't tell me any more useless things.
President Joo.
I've been giving it some thought.
And I think I've figured out a way to make myself very special to you.
You say you're going to make yourself special to me?
Are you going to tell me the winning lottery numbers?
Cha Hee Joo.
She's a very special person to you, isn't she?
I... can see Cha Hee Joo.
You told me that Hee Joo is around me?
So, if you continue to stay around me... then I guess you may get to see her again?
If I can see Cha Hee Joo again... then I'll become special to you, right?
If I see her again... I'll make sure to tell her.
See...
Hee Joo again?
Is there... anything that you realized after this incident?
What about me?
Even if the first thing you noticed about me was my money... it doesn't really matter to me.
Honey. All you need to do is make sure that you always keep your eyes on me.
Even though beauty fades over time, and perky breasts will come to sag... but my money will never dry up.
So... just remain loyal and faithful as you were to me in the beginning and don't look at anyone else.
That's enough to satisfy me.
I'll never... change the love I have for you.
I see only you.
If I see that you're turning away from me even in the least...
I won't show you any mercy. I will just get rid of you.
Here, why don't you drink this?
Our security team is going out to dinner tonight.
Why don't you come join us?
Dinner out?
Where you toast your drinks, and go sing at the karaoke bars?
Yes, of course.
I do want to go, but I...
If it's the security team, will Team Leader Kang Woo be there as well?
Yes. Gong Shil, let's go.
Let's go and receive some of that energy.
Gong Ri, you know I can't drink.
There's going to trouble if I lose grip on my mentality. You can skip the drinking, and just have snacks.
Sure. Then you're coming, okay?
I don't mean anything else by it, but I just want us to be friends.
I'm serious. Come on, let's go.
Let's go.
The atmosphere seems so much livelier with you here. What do you think of me, Gong Shil?
What do you think of my style?
Are you trying to flirt with her?
Settings like this depends heavily on the compatibility between the men and women here.
How about I take this opportunity to make you a frequent fliers card? If you come to three outings, you get a free meal.
If you come five times, you get a free night of drinking on us.
And if you come ten times... blind date?
Since Ms.Tae Gong Shil can't drink, how about a soda for you instead?
Here, why don't you have a soda?
Non-alcoholic.
- Everyone grab a drink, and cheers!
Hey, Gong Shil. You look tired.
Why don't you go relax over there?
Come on, get up.
Can you scoot over a little?
Here, lean back and relax.
I wonder if I'm just tired.
Why does my head hurt so badly?
I'm having a great time.
It's been a really long time since I've been out with other people like this.
Are you not feeling well?
- Could it be that you're drunk?
- I didn't have anything to drink. I'm too scared to drink. Because I become a whole different person when I get drunk.
Most other people gets that way when they're drunk.
But I really do... become a whole different person.
Cha Hee Joo.
What you said about you liking me because I come from a rich family... did you mean it?
Are you... hesitating right now?
That's pretty offensive. I just pretended to think about it so that you don't feel offended.
If I admit it right away... then it would only hurt you.
Joo Joong Won, are you angry?
I know that you'll stop being mad at me if I call out your name three times.
Joo Joong One.
Joo Joong Two.
Joo Joong Three.
It's not the least bit funny.
Even though you may not find it funny, you're no longer mad at me, right?
Bitch.
It's that woman.
I told him that I'd get him to meet her again.
That woman I reported to you about the last time does seem to have a special relationship with President Joo.
I will continue to watch her and see if she has anything to do with Cha Hee Joo.
And what else she may know.
Tae Gong Shil?
Why are you here?
How did you find out where I live?
You hitched a ride in my car, and came into my Kingdom and now you dare to ring the doorbell to my house?
Didn't I warn you? Did I not tell you to stop?
Joong Won.
Joong Won?
You've completely lost your mind.
- You're mad at me, aren't you?
I am mad at you. You're fired. Don't ever show yourself in front of me again.
Get lost.
Will you stop being mad at me if I call out your name three times?
Joo Joong One.
Joo Joong Two.
Joo Joong Three.
That's not the least bit funny.
You.
The bitch you hate.
♫ Are you listening to my heart?
♫
♫ Are you looking at my tears? ♫
♫ In this world there is only one...♫
You don't feel anything when I touch you like this.
Do you really think I'm an air-raid shelter made out of marble?
♫ Why are you always pulling away from me? ♫
♫ Please stay with me. ♫
You know that can't be.
♫ Please take my hand.♫
I, too, am not indifferent.
So do you feel just a tiny bit?
I always felt a little like that.
You tend to... touch me too randomly.
You didn't seem to think much about it, and I didn't say anything because I didn't want to be the weird person.
But it looks like you're starting to react like a normal person would, so I'll ask this of you.
When you use me as your secret hideout,
I would like it to be at a friendly level.
People staring at us like, "What do they think they're doing?" I don't like it.
This. Friendly.
And this. "What do they think they're doing?" Understand?
Actually, all that time, I just barged in just to survive not considering whether you liked it or not.
But now I think I should be careful.
Careful, careful.
Yes. Be careful.
Be careful of things like this, too.
I'll listen to your ghost stories, so don't go off on your own and end up like this.
This kind of concern is friendly.
If I get closer... "What do they think they're doing?"
Understand?
Now let's go, I'll take you.
It's okay, I'll just go on my own.
You had to go to the detention cell and even got hurt.
That much concern, I can give you.
But I need to be careful...
My radar just caught a strange thing.
So hold it. Use it.
You, again...
Are you being careful not to be seen with me in front of your Kang Candy?
I'm just being careful.
I have nothing to be careful about.
If we happen to bump into him, I'll explain to him that, we don't have a "What do they think they're doing?" kind of relationship, but we just happen to be a little friendly.
Don't worry and just come.
Do you know what an honour it is to have a friendly relationship with the President?
Even Kang Candy will take you more seriously.
Episode 8
CEO Joo Joong Won went to the police station for Tae Gong Shil.
And I'm positive Tae Gong Shil is in some way related to dead Cha Hee Joo.
I let it slip due to a personal feeling.
Cha Hee Joo was an orphan.
If that woman, too, doesn't have any parents, there's a possibility they met at some kind of orphanage.
I'll look into it.
Find out if that Tae Gong Shil woman has ever lived in or been to Europe.
Kang Woo, it seemed to me that your interested in her.
I will be.
Don't pretend to be strong. If it's hard, just say so.
When the heart is not being precise, the pain will give the answer.
Will it hurt?
I will... take care of it.
Mr. CEO.
I'm grateful for today.
And since you did go to the detention cell, make sure to eat tofu.
I don't eat such a thing.
I'll be going. Goodbye.
Tae Gong Shil, about your radar catching a strange thing earlier.
Is there something following you?
Oh, that?
It's nothing scary... but something that needs to be scolded.
So I think I just need to talk it out with it.
I'm not Candy, I'm a radar.
Pull yourself together!
Ever since I met Tae Gong Shil, I'm eating bitter anti-anxiety pills like vitamins.
Ah, it's bitter.
Also, since you did go to the detention cell, make sure to eat tofu, CEO.
Does this look like tofu...?
Even when I touch you like this, you don't feel anything, right?
The woman who asked just to sleep holding hands... now she's worrying about anything.
Ah, it's salty.
Now that the radar isn't picking up on any ghosts lately, do I have a lust ghost stuck to me now?
You touching here like this earlier, that's called sexual harassment.
It's the same thing as touching someone's butt in the subway.
Are you here again, Super Market Grandma?
How can I sleep if you stare at me like that? !
But since you're here... could you just scare me a little so I get back to my senses?
Stop, stop, please stop!
You can stop now, grandmother!
Stop, just stop!
CEO Joo,
I heard you had a trip to the police station after personally taking care of something that's not even profitable.
I was really surprised.
I, too, was quite shocked.
I don't have much to say since you did a good deed, but you seem to do things you normally wouldn't do now that you've put Bang Shil by your side.
Your father seems to know about it, too, and started asking me what kind of girl she is.
That's something to be more surprised about.
Are things about me being reported there, too?
It wasn't me! Last time I talked to him, all we did was talk about golf.
He must've heard about you because things about you are floating around recently.
You're his son, of course, he's interested in you.
It's the first time I've had his definite interest in over 34 years, which is so shocking that I'm on the verge of convulsing.
Your father is getting old, so he's probably gaining more interest in his kid.
Right, dear?
He's at an age where he likes to see grandchildren and all.
CEO Joo, this time make sure you REALLY succeed.
Maybe he'll have a grandchild through meaningless skinship.
Grandmother, I've already pulled myself together.
So come out of the garbage bins.
Don't do that with your eyes, Grandma!
Just come out-
Kang Woo.
Are you planning to go out for a run this late?
Yes, I'm going out for a short run.
Oh, we were supposed to come home from work together today...
I just came on my own, so I'm sorry.
Something unexpected came up, so...
Tae Gong Shil.
I think it'd be best to clean things up while I can.
When I said I liked you, it was a misunderstanding.
It was something I said as a joke to the kids, but you believed it as truth.
I couldn't say it wasn't true.
You even told me you were thankful, so I tried to go with it, but I can't anymore.
Ah, it was like that...
No wonder, I thought it was quite strange.
How embarrassing...
You should have told me early on that you didn't have feelings for me.
Because you gave me candy, and musical tickets, I guess I got too excited and went overboard.
You accepted the candy and the musical tickets, but you didn't like me, did you?
Someone I respect once said, "When your heart doesn't tell you the truth,"
"the pain will tell you the answer."
I don't think you... were hurt because of me.
If that's right, then... I don't have to be as sorry, right?
♫ How much more do I have to love you, for you to realize my feelings?
♫ How much time has to pass, for you to love me?
♫ I, who have too much tears, I, who is too dumb to tell you.
♫ My heart hurts...
It hurts more today than it did yesterday.
♫ Tomorrow comes...
You need to go get it!
I won't tolerate that!
Unnie! What's going on?
Help!
Over here!
Someone please help!
Over here!
Unnie!
Wake up!
Unnie, wake up.
This is already the third accident that has occurred at Kingdom Hotel's pool.
They said something pulled her leg from beneath the waters, but there was nothing that could have done that.
If it's not a water ghost, what could it be?
Are you sure it wasn't a prank pulled by a person?
It wasn't just one lifeguard who saw it - many did, and it wasn't a prank pulled by a person.
Because this rumor spread during the busiest time of the summer season, we might lose customers to Giant Hotel.
We can't let that happen.
I'll install my radar... at the pool.
Giant Mall building is taller than mine!
Secretary Kim!
Hi, "10 billion won" radar.
We need to run the radar.
You... were you harassed all night?
Your dark circles are about to bury deep into the ground!
The supermarket granny came, so I couldn't sleep all night.
Mr. CEO, do I...
look sick?
You... always look sick.
But today, more than usual... you look like a zombie.
He says that when he hasn't seen a zombie in real life.
Instead of a zombie, you said you have seen a water ghost, right?
A long time ago, when I went to the Han River with my sister to eat chicken...
I was enchanted by a water ghost, and I almost drowned to death!
Water ghost!
I never want to see a water ghost again.
Never, ever!
I really hate water ghosts!
I hate them so much!
They're too scary!
Hold it.
With water ghosts, it doesn't help to hold your hand.
Water ghosts.
She shudders at the thought of them.
I feel bad just sending her to catch them.
Mr. CEO gave this, saying you should visit on your day off.
Gift certificate to an all-inclusive package at Kingdom Hotel!
Isn't this place a really awesome place?
He included several gift cards, saying you should have a good time with your friends.
Earlier, he said I looked like a zombie...
Is he sending me there so I can get some rest?
Oh, I'm so happy!
I passed it along. She was really happy about it, and she says she'll go tomorrow.
I'll send her over there first, then later... I'll tell her to see the ghost.
If it's Kingdom Hotel, it will be really luxurious. What's the occasion?
I have more, so if you want to bring friends, do that..
- Then... should we ask Apt. 404?
- No...
Well, then let's just pack our suitcase.
Pack a lot of pretty clothes, since we can load them in my car.
Okay. Unnie, I'll take a lot of pretty pictures for you.
Gong Shil, I'm so happy.
Hey, Kingdom Hotel has a pool, right?
Let's pack our swimsuits as well.
Don't you get the chills, with rumors saying there's something in the pool?
There is no such thing!
It isn't like this is the Loch Ness. (Lake in Scotland where the Loch Ness Monster "lives")
You dared to ask me to come and see you?
I'm not a person you can easily meet, on a whim.
Thanks for coming in your busy schedule.
What is it that you wanted to ask me?
Please find out details on Tae Gong Shil, things that can't be found in official records.
If you find out through her friends, you'll know whether they have seen her dead parents, and what her relationship was like with her parents, right?
Why do you want to know about her family?
Do you want to marry her?
If I was going to marry her, I wouldn't be doing a background check like this.
I could just meet her family in person!
Oh, that's right.
Then... is this just part of your job?
Keeping your eyes on her?
If that's the case, then I'll help you. Let's talk while we eat something.
Are you going to help, only if I dine with you?
No, I don't mean that.
I'm just saying it's meal time, so I'll "let" you join me.
If that's the case, then you don't have to "let" me join you.
Call me after you've found out something.
I already made reservations...
Why is he playing so hard to get, when he's just a "salaryman"?
Secretary Kim, are you reporting to my father about me?
I met him last year, and after he went overseas, we've never talked on the phone.
Considering how he never showed interest in women with whom there were talks of marriage, it's strange that he would suddenly show interest in Tae Gong Shil.
I'm sure he's doing it out of love.
That... is even more ridiculous.
Did Tae Gong Shil leave?
Unnie, this place is awesome!
Get here quickly!
I'll pack my stuff and go when I'm done with work. You take a look around first.
Where are you going? Looks like it's somewhere nice.
You don't need to know.
I'm a career woman!
Why do I have to spy on Tae Gong Shil?
I got something like this.
Bring Kang Woo and come.
You want us to join on Tae sisters' trip?
I, with Gong Shil and Kang Woo... want to do this.
If they get together, I'll buy you food.
Should I report this to the Vice President?
Let's just go have fun. We have to.
Maybe it's because it's wide open, but this place doesn't seem scary.
They're doing fireworks today.
Fireworks can't happen during the day and I'm scared to go out at night.
It's a pie in the sky for me.
Mr. CEO?
I'm at the hotel lobby. This place is really nice.
Of course, it is. It's mine after all.
The painting next to you is also really expensive.
Mm, it does look expensive.
Oh, but how do you know where I am?
Because I'm behind you.
Mr. CEO!
- I followed you.
Did you come alone?
My sister hasn't come yet...
Let's go eat first.
He followed me?
You have it ready, right?
Yes. After dinnertime, the pool will be off limits to outsiders.
We can go after we eat dinner.
I'll tell you after we eat.
It looks like Master Joo is doing an event for that girl.
She's so lucky!
She'll get to watch the fireworks at the closed off pool.
Do you have anything you want to eat?
Tell me, I'll buy it all for you.
Are you going to buy me something good because I look out of energy?
Then, buy everything I want please.
It's been 15 years since Hee Joo died.
Every year, for remembering and helping the place where she grew up, thank you very much.
It's already been 15 years since Cha Hee Joo died.
After she died, I thought about ending my relationship with this place because it felt like I was paying for her life.
But thinking of Joong Won, I think I did well by continuing to come here.
It was here where Joo Goon met Cha Hee Joo for the first time, right?
Chief Kang Woo?
Why did he come here?
Secretary Kim, what are you doing?
Ah, yes. I'm going.
Tae Gong Ri, Tae Gong Shil...
Such sisters have never been at this orphanage.
You didn't even bring Kang Woo, so why are you still coming?
Chief Kang Woo has other business, and I don't ever drop out of something I decide to join.
You couldn't even bring money for gas.
Han Joo has small salary.
It's Kim Dong Soo. - Do you know him?
Oh!
It's the same!
Who is he?
He was the one who ran away with my money and disappeared.
It's my neck.
But... are you following him?
You can't. We have somewhere else we need to go. - Shut up!
Hold on tightly.
You can't have alcohol, so at least have this.
Now that you're resting at a nice place, your dark circles have gotten better.
But, by any chance... do you have any other clothes?
My sister's bringing all my clothes, but she's running a bit late...
If she's going to go in and out of the pool, she'll need a change of clothes...
Should I prepare it?
Hey, tonight President Joo is closing the pool and doing an event.
Wow, whoever girl it's for is so lucky.
It's our loss when we get jealous. - I wish I can go on a date with him just once.
Event?
For me possibly?
You're going to go to your room, right?
Meet me in two hours at the lobby.
We already ate. Is there something else?
There's something very important.
If by chance you get surprised, don't get too mad.
Mr. CEO rented the swimming pool, and the one that he wants to meet in two hours is me.
Then, he closed the pool because of me?
Don't let anyone else enter after I go in.
Have the prepared item sent to the guest room I told you about.
What... is this?
CEO Joo sent this.
It's so pretty!
It's pretty!
Then, what Mr. CEO said about an important matter...
Did you prepare this for me?
Yes. There's more.
Look.
♫ It's you
♫ Love that's like destiny
♫ Sad memories that were like shadows
Please go in. Mr. CEO has been waiting for you.
Is no one really allowed to go in because it's closed off?
Yes, he has ordered not to let anybody in except you two.
[Oh, okay.] I came here because a problem came up at the hotel's pool. I didn't come to play.
I'll return after figuring out what it is in the pool.
It won't take long.
Hello, 10 billion dollar radar. You're going to have to use your radar again.
You said you've seen a water ghost before, right?
Tae Gong Shil!
Tae Gong Shil, where are you going?
Wait a minute!
♫ When you brush by,
♫ My heart that once was cold
♫ Spreads with warmth
That could have been bad. I would have been so embarrassed.
It would have been a disaster if I went, dressed like that.
♫ I want to quietly approach
♫ And just lean on you
But then, why am I so upset?
♫ The distance doesn't get closer.
When your heart doesn't tell you the truth, your symptoms will give you the answer.
♫ It's okay if I can't touch you
♫ It's okay if I can't embrace you
♫ Lonely love, yes I love you as if you're my destiny.
♫ I can feel you
♫ La la la la la la la
Is there anything else you need?
Flowers, champagne, I'll prepare everything.
It seems she's mistaken about something.
Looks like she got kicked out after going in there in a fancy dress.
Looks like it's not an event.
You changed.
Yes, I thought it would be uncomfortable.
You looked pretty earlier. Let's go.
There isn't anything scary here.
There are people who are scarier than ghosts.
Right now, in their eyes, we look like "What do they think they're doing?".
It can't be that way.
I don't care what they think.
I'm looking at you, who is upset by what those people are saying.
Tae Gong Shil. You're upset, aren't you?
Running away dressed like that back there; you looked like Candy.
Think about it. You invite me here, buy me dinner, send me clothes.
Of course, I'd turn into Candy.
You should have just told me to use my radar. Why did you do that?
You said you were scared. I'm still your secret hideout.
Forcing you when you said you didn't want to.
I felt guilty.
So, it's like that.
I feel a little bit better now.
Let's go catch that water ghost.
It's okay now, Mr. CEO.
Let my hand go, if you can.
I don't care.
I think those people are expecting a Candy who has been abandoned by her lover, but I don't want to become that Candy.
Let's go.
I've asked Gong Shil's closest friends.
Her parents are her biological parents. They said they were all very close, too.
I even recorded it. Should I give it to you?
Send it to me. Thanks a lot.
Doing this, we really seem like spies. I've always wanted to be one.
Aren't you a singer?
I've done a movie, too, you know. Haven't you done any research on me?
You can find it all on the internet...
How long are you going to follow me?
Salary man, you don't have a car, right?
My car's outside. It takes anyone, if you can ride it, get on it.
I'm going to take the subway.
That guy, really!
Tae Yang, we've been sitting here like this for a while now.
Don't you see anything?
I don't see any.
Could it be in the water?
I'll go and look for it.
Wait for a while.
It might appear when it gets a little darker out.
Just like being scared before getting a needle, with a ghost, the moment they're about to pop out is scariest.
And I want to get it done before the fireworks start...
I should hurry and look.
Will you be alright?
Water ghosts are really scary.
If you get caught, they'll drag you down and won't let go.
You'll help me if I don't come up, won't you?
Forget it. Don't go.
Just go rest and watch the fireworks.
What about the water ghost?
Let's just take care of it, since the pool is empty.
I'll just have the water drained and the pool completely dried for a couple days.
You almost fell in!
There's an lady over there!
Oh, it's scary!
This must be his house.
Kim Dong Soon, you're dead today!
I'm going to get all my money back, and I'm going to kill you!
He's married.
Are you going to... k...ill...
Honey, did you hear about the latest gossip on Tae Yi Ryeong?
I don't like her.
It's not even like she's a good singer or anything.
I know, right? She was pretty when she was younger.
Now that she's gotten old, you can really tell she had plastic surgery.
Hasn't she lost almost all of her popularity?
Yeh, she's losing popularity to younger, more talented singers, like IU.
Her popularity isn't like what it was before.
Let's get off at the next stop.
Hello. I'm Tae Yi Reong.
Oh, it's Tae Ri Yeong.
For your information, I'm still very popular.
IU?
I... really... like you, Oppa.
Aigoo! What do I do?
I love you so much!
Please look over here.
Why did you do that?
I was having fun!
You are really..
terrible at singing.
Even so, I'm still pretty, right?
You're saying that again?
Yup. So, I've decided.
Let's date.
How can you refuse so quickly!
? You dog-mannered...
It's Tae Ri Yeong. Wow.
Oh really?
♫ When you brush my fingertips♫
♫ When you brush my fingertips ♫
♫ The warmth spreads to my chilled heart. ♫
♫ It's okay even if I'm not able to touch you.♫
♫ It's okay even if I can't hug you. ♫
♫ Lonely love ♫
♫ Yes I love you as I was destined to. ♫
♫ I can feel you. ♫
The water ghost is an older woman?
Ah, there she is.
Yes. -What is she doing?
She's fixing her make up.
Make up?
Who does a ghost want to show herself to after wearing make up?
Something seems really strange.
She's leaving.
If she's a water ghost, isn't she supposed to stay in the water?
Looks like she's not a water ghost.
She went over there!
What took so long?
That Ahjumma even took a shower,
She went to the sauna, and also knocked before going into the restroom.
Can there be such a polite ghost?
I don't think she knows she's dead.
She's going up there.
The ahjumma is sitting in the chair over there and dining.
She wasn't just staying at the pool?
She's wiping her mouth.
Looks like she's leaving.
To where again?
She's reading a magazine.
She just went into that room.
That room is the most expensive room at this hotel.
Is there a guest in that room?
No, that room is empty now.
In this expensive room, what is that Ahjumma doing?
She's sitting over there.
She's luxuriously drinking wine while looking out at the night scenery.
She acts like she's alive.
She's not acting like a ghost but like a human, so why did she do that at the pool?
She doesn't think she's dead, so while swimming, couldn't she just be pushing people out of her way?
Go, tell her "you died", and tell her to check out of this hotel.
Ahjumma.
I'm really sorry for saying this, but you can't stay here like this.
Did she understand?
She said she can stay here since she won a gift certificate.
This... she showed me something similar to the gift certificate you gave me.
She won a gift certificate to the hotel?
Mrs. Kang Gil Ja won the gift certificate to the royal suite room.
- Yeah, it is.
I especially remember her out of all the winners.
You're Mrs. Kang Gil Ja, right?
Come this way, please.
This is really nice!
I wish I could always live in a place like this!
I remember she was so happy during her stay here.
So if she was very passionate with this place, she wouldn't be able to forget about it even after she's dead.
Dead?
Mrs. Kang Gil Ja. She's dead.
I guess you have a misunderstanding, she's still alive.
You say she's alive? - Where is she?
I heard she's at the hospital.
This is my first, too. I'm not really sure.
Why is she not waking up if she's fine?
What do you mean fine?
How can you say that to a person that fainted at your birthday party!
You were the one that made a scene after getting drunk!
You have no say!
You were the one that always fought against her!
But why isn't she waking up?
Ahjumma, you can't stay here like this.
You have to go quickly. It's possible you could really die.
It looks like she doesn't want to go.
Before, her daughter's name, what was it?
Joo Yeon.
There's a response.
Lee Joo Yeon's mother, you can't keep on staying here.
Your family is waiting.
You have to go live.
That's a good choice.
It's not even weird seeing her do that anymore.
Okay, okay. - Okay? Okay.
Looks like she's understanding well.
Ahjumma said she'll go.
She just wants to see the fireworks tonight.
I'll go watch it with her at the pool.
She already changed her clothes!
We'll be going!
Even a ghost is all dressed up and enjoying it.
Don't lose.
Should I enjoy it since it's the last time?
She must be really excited!
It's been a while since I've seen fireworks, too.
It probably will be pretty.
Ahjumma.
Ahjumma, let's go together!
There are eyes.
Act like you're talking to me, and not the Ahjumma.
Shall we go?
It was such a good dream...
I guess...
I'll have to wake up now.
Daughter, are you okay?
Was it difficult?
Do you see me?
I'll listen to you so well from now on!
Mom, really, thank you!
Thank you!
Did Mrs. Kang Gil Ja like it?
She said she really liked it.
She said it was like a Midsummer Night's Dream.
She thought she had a dream that made her be in awe and feel dizzy.
It made her heart flutter, feel happy... and it apparently hurt her, too.
Because she liked seeing it from here so much.
♫ You make me crazy ♪
♫ You make me cry ♪
♫ When I'm reaching for you to the point of grasping you close at hand ♫
She left.
Since when?
I just have to trust you since I don't see it, right?
Fireworks are over.
I... woke someone up from a good dream.
"Tae Yi Ryeong Surprise Show in the Subway"?
I didn't know he was married.
You have a business trip to China scheduled.
How many days?
- One week.
One week is a bit long.
Do I have to tell her?
- Tae Yang already knows.
She seems fine even though she knows.
Tae Yang said this:
To me, Mr. CEO is like winning a gift certificate to a 5-star hotel.
It's huge luck... but I can't be there for a long time.
I have to get familiar with it not existing, if I want a normal life in the future.
The thing that Tae Yang said wasn't from herself... but it was Mrs. Kang Gil Ja's review on the hotel.
I was concerned about it for no reason.
Are you not feeling fine?
I'm very glad and relieved that she doesn't need me.
"When your heart doesn't tell the truth..."
"pain gives the answer."
That's what Tae Yang said.
So apparently she found an answer.
"When your heart doesn't tell the truth, pain gives the answer"...
I've heard that many times from someone.
Cha Hee Joo.
When your heart doesn't tell the truth, pain gives the answer.
Are you saying you learn when you get hit?
Since you like me more than I like you, it's fair for you to hurt more.
So are you telling me to get hurt if I want to like you?
Yeah. I want you to hurt a lot.
Where did you hear that from?
Did Hee Joo tell you?
I never saw Hee Joo.
Then how do you know the phrase that she used to say often?
I heard it from Kang Woo.
Bring me Kang Woo's résumé again.
Yes. Oh, by the way, Mr. CEO.
When I went to donate at Ms. Cha Hee Joo's orphanage...
I saw Chief Kang Woo.
I scouted Kang Woo because he was recommended for his fantastic résumé.
Who recommended you to him?
It was...
Was it my father?
Did you know?
He told me not to tell you, and I thought you wouldn't like him to interfere with your work, so I cut it off in the middle.
I considered both sides.
When you consider next time, don't divide it into two sides.
But be clear on either being on my side, or the other side.
You're the one that my father sent?
I received an order to be aware of your surroundings.
- He said that a person related to
Cha Hee Joo can come into contact with you.
It's because he said that Cha Hee Joo's surroundings are the main culprits, and he thinks that Cha Hee Joo is not a victim, but an accomplice.
Are his thoughts true?
Did you really not see the culprits?
You tell me honestly first.
Did you really give them my ransom?
Do you think that Hee Joo died, because I didn't give them the money?
If it's not that, then why are you worried about whether or not I saw the culprit's face?
Believe in what you want.
And you believe in what you also want to believe.
Tell him to come and explain to me, why he is suddenly concerned again after 15 years.
Oh, and also tell him that since he told me to believe what I want to believe,
I believed that the lost necklace wouldn't come out from him.
I dearly hope he's not searching for it, since I'm searching for it right now.
Tell him that.
I wonder what relations Kang Woo and Cha Hee Joo have.
Cha Hee Joo...
Cha Hee Joo was here.
She told me... about why she's a bad bitch.
I knew you would figure it out someday, since you can see Hee Joo.
That she's one of the main culprits.
Who did she say it was?
The other person that she planned the incident with?
She told me she can't tell me.
She said she has to protect that person.
"I want you to hurt a lot."
Don't go. Stay here.
I don't want her to see me like this.
Since you can see her, you stay beside me and protect me.
♫ You drive me crazy. ♫
♫ You make me cry.♫
♫ When I'm reaching for you to the point of grasping you close at hand, you are moving away like the wind .♫
Scott, hurry!
The entire fortress is about to explode, we need to clear the area!
For God's sake, who is this man?
How could he have possibly brought this on us?
Not a single reply in more than one hour...
Where are the others?
I believe them dead, my son.
They must have still been inside when that man...
Tie the strap around your leg...
I'm getting you out of here...
I'm getting you out...
That's war.
Nooo!
Wolf 004, escort. We return to base, from now you're alone.
Roger that, Wolf 004. Setting course to Daskasan.
Last week, Kepler's Inc. Defense Facility in Birmingham fell victim to yet another terrorist attack, perpetrated by the infamous cell known as "Philanthropy".
We have just entered the Nagorno region.
165 kilometers of air corridor before pullout.
Thank you guys. Keep us posted through the intercom.
Oh, it's almost time for our TV message...
Otacon's idea. It should be broadcasted... now!
Today, the terrorist group delivered the following message.
We live in an age in which the world has endured the threat of annihilation at the hands of nuclear weapons.
Governments relied on the theory of mutually assured destruction to deter an all-out nuclear war, but this strategy will inevitably fail.
Under no circumstances will we ever stand by while a nation builds Metal Gears or similar weapons.
We shall fight them always, until our annihilation, or theirs.
What we achieved in England turned out to be a critical blow.
According to our informants, all the major defence companies have ceased their activities and the scandal caused by the information we've made public has pushed several Governments to start over and redirect their ambitions.
As a matter of fact, up until about a month ago I though that we were through.
But one last... big problem has emerged.
And it is the very reason why we had to meet in such a hurry at that Russian airport.
We're about to launch you into the Daskasan region, between the borders of Armenia and Azerbaijan.
Your mission is to find and secure Senator Abraham Bishop,
In case you're wondering, the answer is yes, he is my father.
I believe I might have told you about his role in my "decision" to enter politics.
I'll find him, be sure of that!
Make no mistake, Snake. I feel nothing for my father.
There is nothing personal in this objective I'm assigning to you.
Nothing inside of me, with the exception of my DNA, still links me to that person.
Uhm... this sounds familiar.
Abraham Bishop is the only politician to have a strong relationship with the rest of '.
He's been here in Azerbaijan for many years now, but his role here is still unclear.
The most popular theory sees him as an advanced contact in the smuggling of war materials to America-friendly countries, like Georgia.
He must be brought back to the States to stand trial for the bribes he took, a charge Philanthropy is now capable of proving.
Once he's nailed, the only company left on Earth producing Metal Gears will have no one to hide behind.
It doesn't sound so dangerous.
It shouldn't sound so easy either.
The Daskasan region has been through some strange phenomena as of late.
Just what kind of phenomena?
The entire zone located between the borders of Armenia and Azerbaijan has always been hot.
Take the Karabakh zone in the South. It's been at the centre of a ten-year conflict.
But really strange things started to happen just this August.
The inhabitants of the region, who previously hid in their houses in fear of the guerrillas, all turned to the streets in a surge of joy.
Strange news spread through the population rapidly.
Celebration fires were lit just paces away from the corpses of those who were massacred only a few days before.
The combatants of the two opposite factions ceased all hostilities instantly, and went on to build a formidable defensive perimeter in a perfect circle of 30 kilometers around the plateau located right in the middle of Daskasan.
The Washington Post named them "The Overnight Nation".
After a few days of apparent calm, "in the name of Jubal", these people pushed on.
What's that typhoon in the middle of the map?
You'll... see soon enough.
70 kilometers of air corridor. Daskasan is within sight!
What the hell...
That is... quite an unprecedented atmospheric event, as well as being the reason behind the reconnaissance satellites becoming completely useless.
We've had no data, news or images from the operation area for more than two weeks now.
Due to this, we'll have to drop you quite far from the mission area.
This is to be an absolutely secret infiltration mission.
Weapons and equipment OSP. No backup. I know the routine well.
Only not this time.
You'll be armed: this is a regular war zone.
Leaving traces behind will not raise an issue.
And Snake, this time you'll not be alone.
You'll be establishing contact on the ground with two new members of Philanthropy.
The first is Pierre Leclerc, sniper, former member of the Foreign Legion, mercenary at present.
Uhm... not bad for moving through open areas. Who's the second?
Corporal Elizabeth Laeken, former Delta.
Another mercenary?
No. She's been de-listed due to disciplinary reasons.
You have all their folders in your backpack; there, you'll find all the details you need.
40 kilometers of air corridor. Time to go.
All right Snake. It's time.
This mission will last longer than any other you've faced so far.
You'll have to expect almost ten days of extreme conditions, against forces we can't predict.
If you succeed, Philanthropy will cease to exist.
We will have won our battle, and those dreadful weapons will only be a thing of the past.
You've been fighting for this all your life, Snake.
This time, you can finally put an end to it.
Snake, have you found Leclerc?
I'm looking for him. I'll keep you updated.
Private...
Wait, wait, wait...
Saved!
Pierre Leclerc at your service, Sir.
Yes, Snake?
Who-is-this-jackass?
Any problem?
No, really. I found him playing with a... a sort of a...
THING!
Thing?
One of those game machines!
Snake, do not worry. He IS one of the best snipers on the market.
He comes from a family of great tradition.
You may have heard of the legendary Leclerc, hero of World War II.
Pierre here is his nephew!
I'm not dragging this nutcase along!
Snake, there are no alternatives. You need Pierre.
Got a feeling I'll be missing my solo missions...
Where to, Big Chief?
Laeken should be here any minute now. I need you to find the guide that will lead us to Imeret.
Vitalij.
Characteristic traits?
Nasty, filthy, hairy. A local.
Well, look what we have here. Are you a racist or am I just turning your off?
Just relax, Big Chief!
Let's say I want to keep our conversation on a "hierarchical" level a little longer.
Now move your ass and find him. He's the only one here with a Russian name, or so they say.
You shouldn't have any problem.
You want the lady just for yourself, don't you?
What the hell has got into your head?
Nothing! I just thought this wasn't a good way to start a relationship.
You know, all that "you look for the nasty, filthy, and hairy dude. Leave the rest to me" attitude.
Later, Big Chief!
I'm gonna KILL him.
Bye, sister.
And say "Hi" to your next commander!
Elizabeth Laeken?
What was that stone for?
For reasons...
I hope you'll never discover.
Want to explain?
'course you don't...
Where did you find him?
I'd say right under our noses.
Remember that stall to the right of the house where we first met?
Well, that's where he was, staring at the wall.
Staring at the wall?
Yes. You've really got yourself a sensational team here, Big Chief.
Thank God for me!
She knows her stuff.
You haven't briefed me yet.
You're asking yourself whether I can be trusted or not, aren't you?
Well, Big Chief, you have read my profile...
Sure. And it doesn't match with what's in front of me.
Like it or not, we're going to be stuck here for ten days.
I can stand my ground.
Her name is Elizabeth, but they call her "Disgrace". I've read her profile too.
"Disgrace", uhm?
What has she done?
101st Airborne, Ranger course, six years in the Delta.
Four missions abroad.
I doubt she's been through any deep infiltration mission like this one.
She's stealth, not a pathfinder.
Anyway, she knows how to handle herself in a fight.
Although that wasn't always enough, it would seem...
Meaning what?
All of her commanding officers have bitten the bullet.
Fatal accidents, drowning, friendly fire...
The list is shocking.
Nine Officers.
She's been on leave for some years, but as a civilian she lived the life of a recluse.
No friends. And with that stain over her head, not a hint of a job, either.
I don't believe this sort of shit. But I do know you Americans tend to fall for easy explanations...
I won't let all of this become a burden for her. But she has to keep up.
According to the report, in her last missions she consciously risked her own life without just cause.
She was awarded the Silver Star, but her superiors wanted to get rid of the problem.
And here she is.
I don't need any erratic behaviour from her.
I'm sorry about her situation, but I've got reasons for completing this mission.
If I see her doing anything that might put us at risk, I'll bury her with my own hands.
Now go and get some rest, hero. We wake at 6. We make for Daskasan.
I read your profile.
I don't care about what happened. How you fight, that's what my opinion of you will be based on.
Try to keep this in mind, and stop acting as if you were on death row.
Being my commanding officer makes you feel uneasy, doesn't it?
I'll feel uneasy once you get killed for nothing, or when you act out of despair.
I don't know why you accepted this mission, but I guarantee you...
Nobody will come out of this a hero.
There are no medals for the war we are fighting, nor epitaphs. Only victims.
The objective is more important than any of us involved in it.
Your commanding officers might be dead, Elizabeth, but you have always accomplished your missions.
If that's the outcome this time around, I'll be happy just the same.
Ok, we make camp.
I'm gonna put up some sensors. With those, we'll know if anything tries to get near.
How many died?
A million, maybe more.
It has been one hundred years since now.
A story told by the elders, while the younger generation never seems to have time to learn.
What about the present Government?
You're a democracy.
Democracy is of no use when people are not kept informed.
We have fought for so many years against Azerbaijan in the name of the Karabakh region.
Since then, two other Governments have alternatively risen to power, but none of us really know where they want to go, or what is they do for our country.
And this new war, once again...
They're keeping something from us.
I don't believe Armenia will ever be the country we dream of so much.
The Karabakh region is full of oil...
Yes, that I know.
But Karabakh is far from here, down South.
Daskasan...
Daskasan doesn't count for anything.
Why do you keep saying you're afraid not to find anyone in Imeret?
It is not just war.
Something different is happening here, something on the mouth of many.
That is?
The fiend of Kalcabar.
To think I'd have laughed at myself before.
I am not superstitious.
I don't believe in anything my eyes can't see.
But my family is over there, my home...
And the stories I've heard...
Entire villages found empty at dawn, and then...
The people are found dead in the forest.
I still choose not to believe, but I can't think of nothing else.
We are in God's hands now...
"If God made the world, I would not want to be that God for the misery of the world would tear my heart to shreds."
Damn, you ARE cool, aren't you?
Seriously. With your dark attitude, the wild beard, the bandana...
You'd make a good videogame character.
No shit man!
A Nintendo platformer, I'd say!
Nah, forget it.
It's just a joke, you wouldn't get it.
You're so OLD, man!
Can't say I'm surprised she's already fallen for you...
She's some woman, isn't she?
And... have you seen her ASS?
This is not the place and DEFINITELY not the time...
We are professionals here! She and I are, at least...
Word of advice, Big Chief... live!
The boy. You don't dig him, do you?
He's unreliable.
He's one of the best, in his field...
He has no discipline.
You still have to see him in action.
He doesn't take anything seriously!
True... While WE can't take anything with a smile...
I envy him. He still has to grow up.
On the battlefield, either you grow up soon or you don't grow up at all!
We are professionals, the two of us.
Yeah, that we are...
Contact!
Covering 2-7-0.
Sensor's 100 meters away, we've only got a few seconds. Hurry!
How long did the sensor flash for?
About 3 seconds.
It covers a 50 meter sector. It couldn't have been that fast.
The sensor is calibrated on human-like thermic masses.
It must have slowed down!
At that speed it would have reached us by now.
Don't make any noise. Don't move, for any reason.
We'll wait 'till dawn, then we'll leave.
On your feet, you've slept enough.
Don't tell him anything. Prepare the boats, we're leaving.
Snake, everything OK?
Why did you switch your CODEC off last night?
Had a feeling it wasn't a good idea to keep it on. You saw it too, didn't you?
If you're talking about that... thing: yes, we received your thermal scans.
It left. I have no idea what it was.
Something strange is happening out there...
Agreed. Let's hope your father will be able to shed some light on it.
Here we are. Imeret is just beyond that hill.
You never mentioned a radio tower!
We'll pull up here.
My home...
My family...
Looks like the Senator isn't living in a village of peaceful shepherds, after all.
I was foolish to believe that was even possible.
OK. How do we proceed?
Getting in shouldn't be too hard, but we need to know whether or not the Senator is alive.
This place has seen violent conflict. He could be dead, maybe he dropped his transmitter...
Bishop, what do you think about this?
The bug planted on his transmitter is still responding.
There's a chance he might be hiding in the big structure at the centre of that complex.
By the way, do you have any lead about what this place is?
Your guess is good as mine...
GET DOWN!
Why did he just...
Sniper must be in the main building. There are probably more nearby.
The spotter is changing observation zone. They must think he was alone.
I can see another two soldiers on the lower levels.
There's gotta be more...
And I was just starting to think we'd be able to take the Senator without a fight...
Any idea who they are?
ArmsTech's private army, most likely.
They must be waiting for someone to come and pick them up along with the Senator.
Listen up: according to Bishop, the Senator's transmitter signal is coming from the complex, probably the main tower.
The only way to get there undetected is by going through the railway viaduct.
That will lead us towards the mountains. I need you to provide me with enemy intel.
Once I've found him, be ready to give me and the Senator some cover fire.
Not quite.
Look, Big Chief, if I were you I would start asking myself some questions:
Vitalij said he had been here a month ago. How could anyone have built that monstrosity in less than a month?
Seven days...
Vitalij was here less than seven days ago.
Why would he lie to us?
No idea. If he was mentally unstable, he certainly didn't show any sign of it before...
Look. None of us know what's going on, but now is not the time to figure it out.
Our main objective is in there. We get the Senator out, then we'll have time to go over the situation.
Who knows, maybe he'll have the answers we're looking for.
We might have been lured here on purpose!
By someone who just took a bullet in the forehead?
I've had enough of your analysis.
We don't have time right now to listen to your theories, so keep them to yourself. That's an order.
Snake! Do you copy?
We've got armed men approaching the complex.
I can see at least twenty, but if they're coming from other directions, there could be hundreds of them.
JUBAL!
Snake, there's nothing we can do to help you from here.
Damn...
Try to reach the railway! We'll meet up there.
Snake, behind you!
Harrison, I've spotted a Metal Gear!
It looked like a tactical unmanned model.
But it was... kinda ridden by a weird guy, some FOXHOUND-like freak.
I didn't have time to take pictures though, and I can't tell you much else at the moment.
Anyway, looks like ArmsTech is much stronger than we thought.
Snake, find my father as soon as possible! We need him to tell us what's going on!
Right. I'm going in.
Elizabeth?
Anyone!
Just like Vitalij said it would be. A war so long no one actually remembers how it started.
This is not just another border skirmish. We're not equipped for a situation like this.
The North side of the complex is quieter.
If we still want to get in, I'd say that's our only hope.
More are coming. It's now or never.
OK, what's your favourite strategy for infiltrating... "giant enemy towers"?
Like in the movies...
SEWAGE SYSTEM
Ok, security will be tighter from now on.
We go stealth.
Control, this is Moebius Three. They're flanking us, we can't hold our position much longer!
Abel, this is Control. Be ready to extract the Senator at any time.
Roger Control, heading for the Senator's room.
That's our man. Come on.
Time to move the old man.
Not again...
Man, we should just leave this fucking place.
Who cares about him?
We do!
Looks like the entire world's dying to protect you, Senator.
It doesn't matter. Take what you need and follow me, I'm getting you out of here.
And where would you be taking me, precisely?
To a safe place, so you can tell us what the hell is going on in this God forsaken region.
You don't look like a Government agent.
I wouldn't have expected anyone else to get involved in this.
Second wave of attack, coming from the eastern sector!
Fall back to the tower! Fall back to the tower!
We're gonna to get trapped inside!
Senator, we don't have much time. The only way we're going to survive is by getting out of here, now!
Drop it!
Go, go, go!
Here they are!
Bring him out!
Wait for my signal.
Wait! This is suicide!
Better to die sooner than later, Senator...
For die we must.
Stay close to me.
There's a breach in the outer wall.
It's our only chance.
Cover me.
Snake! Come on!
Senator, what was that complex?
Who were those people?
The complex is owned by ArmsTech Inc. along with everything in this region.
What's ArmsTech doing here?
Daskasan has been the neural centre of ArmsTech's activities for years now.
The Azeri Government is paid handsomely to turn a blind eye to all activities.
This is a deserted region, perfect for testing new weapons.
Like a Metal Gear?
How many others are there?
Where are they being assembled?
You'll find the answers you're looking for there, in Eldridge.
Eldridge?
Yes. That's where my work was taking place. That's were my life took an unexpected turn.
Follow me. There's something I'd like you to see.
This mission just got a hell of a lot more complicated, Big Chief!
The blitzkrieg by this "Overnight Nation" must have something to do with Eldridge.
There's more to these events than just Metal Gears.
Whatever's going on we'll find our answers under those dark clouds.
Wow, look at those fire works over there!
Scott, hurry! The entire fortress is about to explode, we have to... uhm... ehm... take my socks!
For God's sake who is this man?
I dunno who he is.
Check and see if he as a wallet on him...
Oh no that's just his throat.
Been a right while then, what...
We just ...
Oh nothing.
That's porn.
You couldn't have just thrown it to me?
God it's right in the face...
It fricken stings!
That's poooorn...
Ok, let's check this out...
Wait... this is a guy and a guy...
NOOOOO!
Hey Gary! What's this button do over here?
Don't press it... don't press it!
OH MY GOOOOOOD!
Oh, crap!
And tonight at 10, we'll show you just how cream can...
Acchhk...
Sorry, got a bug in my mouth.
And we'll be continuing on to our news coverage.
Hey Mom, quick question, my edible underwear, where...
Ah, nevermind, I think I found it. Mmm, strawberry, so good.
Just what kind of phenomena?
Ducks signed non-aggression pacts with China.
Plaid became the new fashion.
Snakes organized their own Union in protest of Snake Eater.
And butter was elected to the highest possible office available.
In other words, this shit is fucked up.
Yo, let's get this motherfucking Snake off of this motherfucking plane!
Da fuuuuck.
That is... Quite...
An...
Unprecedented atmospheric event.
As well as being the reason...
OK, fuck this.
There's a typhoon, it's messing shit up, you can't do shit, so... shut up.
And Snake...
You're really pretty cute!
What are you saying! ?
No, she's been delisted due to disciplinary reasons...
*Gasps* Sorry, I forgot my asthma inhaler.
Ok guys, you've been talking long enough...
Get the fuck out!
You've been wanting a movie all your life Snake.
This time... You can finally have one.
AWWGHHH MY EYES!
Won't you let me stand on your head? !
Let's roooooock!
Wanna get laid?
Uhm...
It's hooker time.
Row row row your boat, gently down the stream...
Come on Pierre!
Merrily, merrily, merrily, merrily, life is but a dream...
Elizabeth!
Row row row your boat, gently down the stream...
Merrily, merrily, merrily, merrily, life is but a dream.
Come on, Lizzy, come on!
We are in God's hands now.
Did you know that a pig's orgasm can last for over 30 minutes?
That's 30 whole minutes!
How could you do anything else all day?
No wonder they sleep so much.
Word of advice big chief...
Live!
Oh my God hottness, I wanna bang you!
Ok, how do we proceed?
Oh sorry I was distracted.
There's a girl with huge... objectives in the lower hand window.
To the mall!
THE MAAAAALL!
YEAHHHHH GET OVER 25% OFF!
I'm happy with my life insurance!
Snake, could you explain one thing to me?
Why are we standing in front of a window during wartime like this?
Uhm...
Not sure.
Giggidy!
*gasp* Oh my God guys, check it out, it's Santa Claus!
Are you Solid Snake?
You're on my naughty list this year.
You killed 17 people just last month. You're getting a lump of coal.
Don't worry Senator, I have super powers.
For I am... the Flash!
BROADSWOOOOORD!
Garugamesh!
Hey Big Chief, don't you think this is ending a lot like the Two Towers?
Naaaaaah!
Don't worry, Pierre.
It's not like they're gonna end on an upward panning shot...
Against ethereal music.
Ok, bye!
Get an ambulance.
Please leave the room, darling.
You know I like to bathe in private.
[Stuttering] Mark, I didn't mean to kill her.
Okay? Okay.
Take it easy! What are you trying to do, break my head?
Say it.
Yes, darling, completely.
You're wasting your time and my time and the department's time.
I left Margaret at home.
(Hugh) Margaret?
Is that you, Hugh?
Is, uh, is Mark there?
Sorry, Hugh. It's Tuesday. Club night.
I can always tell.
Comes right after Monday.
Monday, Mark works late.
Um, well, I'll... I'll get him at the club.
Mr. Caldwell, good to see you, sir.
Oh, yes, Charles. Thank you. I, uh,
I'm looking for Mr. Halperin.
Over there, sir.
The usual Tuesday night game, you know?
Mr. Lawrence is having quite a run with the dice.
Simply amazing. I've never...
Hugh, how are you?
It's been forever.
(Hugh) Fine, honey.
(Lawrence) Play it for $3,200, Mark, unless you want to resign at $1,600.
Hi, Hugh.
Hi, Mark.
Byron, I think your dice are about to turn cold.
The Army may have taught you bravery, Mark, but I'm not so sure about your judgment.
You still need doubles to win.
You see, Byron, sometimes a little boldness is exactly what's called for.
Uh, Mark, excuse me.
Could I talk to you for a second?
I just... I'd just like to see you for a second.
All right. Be back in a minute.
Don't go away, huh. What's the matter?
Nothing. I just want to talk to you for a minute.
Something wrong?
Danny, bring us a double Scotch, will you?
Yes, sir, Mr. Halperin. Right away.
Are you sure she's dead?
It just happened.
We were... we were fighting.
We were screaming at each other.
I was sure she was gonna see somebody tonight.
She came at me, and I must have grabbed her by the throat.
All right. Take it easy. Take it easy.
I didn't know what I was doing.
I just saw her face looking up at me
and then when I realized what I was doing,
I let her go.
And she just fell.
Calm down. Calm down.
Mark, you gotta tell me what to do.
Now, was there anyone else in the house when this happened?
No, she, uh, she left about 8:15, when I got home.
Did you call anyone?
Just your place.
Margaret told me you were here.
But you didn't say anything to her?
Or maybe I should call Fred.
He doesn't handle criminal cases, but he must know somebody...
Or maybe I should go to the police.
Mark, I didn't mean to kill her.
Hugh, you can't afford to do that.
Everyone knows the problems you and Janice were having.
Now, listen to me.
It's almost 10:00.
I want you to go in the other bar, there are more people in there.
At exactly 10:30, I want you to call your house.
I'll answer the phone.
You pretend it's Janice.
Make sure the bartender and anyone else in the bar overhears your conversation.
You want me to help you, don't you?
All right. Do as I say.
All right, Mark. Fine.
Janice, is that you?
Are you in a bar?
Yes, yes, that's right.
Now listen to me.
She's gone to bed early, she's not going to wait up for you.
Yes, yes, darling. Of course, you must be exhausted.
Get a good night's sleep, and I'll see you in the morning.
All right, you get a good night's sleep, and I'll see you in the morning, huh?
All right. Fine, Hugh. You're doing just fine.
Now listen to me.
You stay right there in the bar and don't move until the police contact you.
Yes. Yes, dear. Yes.
Yes, good night, darling.
Ah, she's been out all day shopping.
She's gettin' ready for bed now.
I guess it won't hurt to have another one.
(Margaret) Mark, is that you?
You're home early tonight, Mark.
I was a little tired.
Another one of your bleeding-heart friends get into print?
Did you win tonight, Mark, or is that a silly question?
Oddly enough, I did.
Wonderful. Yeah.
That means I won't have to write you a check this week.
That will be refreshing.
Won't it be?
Did I tell you I'm speaking at the Holcombe House tomorrow evening?
They've named me "Woman of the Year."
How much is that going to cost you?
Oh, don't be crude.
My, my, "Woman of the Year," that's quite an honor.
Playing queen bee to a motley assortment of junkies, pushers, and losers.
You know, I don't know how much money you've pumped into your assorted charities, Margaret, but it's a lot more than any $10 trophy they're going to hand you.
Not tonight, please.
Darling, if you're embarrassed by all your millions, why don't you just sign them over to me?
They wouldn't embarrass me in the least.
Money is a weapon, Mark, a tool to be used for good, if it's used properly.
Hmm. Properly?
That means handing it out like Halloween candy to a bunch of grifters who've never done a day's work in their lives?
'Cause nobody has ever given them a chance. Come on, Margaret.
Do you know what it's like to be an ex-convict trying to find honest work?
Margaret, please.
Please don't lecture me on ex-cons.
I wrote that book.
(Mark) Margaret.
(Margaret) What is it?
A man.
I just saw a man running from the Caldwell house.
All the lights are on over there.
I don't like the looks of that.
Uh, do you think the man could have been Hugh?
No, no, I left Hugh at the club.
There's no answer.
I think something's wrong.
Police headquarters.
Sgt. De Maio.
Sergeant, this is Deputy Commissioner Halperin.
Yes, sir. Yes, Commissioner.
Uh, I just saw a man, a strange man, running from a house on, uh... on Fairfax Drive.
I want you to dispatch a unit over there immediately.
Uh, the number is 1278 Fairfax Drive.
I dropped my cigar.
Is that it there, Lieutenant?
Under there.
I don't want to burn up the Commissioner's car.
I got it. I grabbed the wrong end.
Come here, you little rascal. Okay.
That looks okay.
Officer, do me a favor, huh?
Look under there and make sure nothing's burning.
(officer) All right, Lieutenant.
Uh, everything's okay, Lieutenant.
Positive. Look again.
Right, Lieutenant.
(Mark) What's missing?
(Duffy) Just her jewelry.
He never went near the paintings nor the silverware.
There's a vase out there worth a couple of thousand dollars.
He never touched that.
It's the same guy, all right.
All right, I want you to pick up every known burglar in the morning.
If you talked to them before, talk to them again.
If you need any extra men, let me know. Yes, sir.
Columbo, it's about time you showed up.
Yes sir. I'm sorry. It was my car.
The battery went dead.
Commissioner, your car is here now.
Tried to get my wife's car. She was at my sister-in-law's, so I called there...
It's a boring story.
Thank you very much for sending your car. I appreciate it.
It's quite all right.
Duffy will fill you in on what's happened.
It's the same man who's been hitting this area in the past few weeks.
The M.O.'s identical.
Well, maybe I better look around.
Good looking broad except for the marks around her neck.
Certainly is.
(Columbo) What do you figure happened?
Looks like she was getting ready to hit the sack.
Probably heard the guy down here, came down to see what was goin' on.
Could've just called us, but she's gotta make like a hero, right?
How long has she been dead?
Not too long.
She talked to her husband on the phone about an hour ago.
Yeah, an hour ago.
Okay. It's all yours.
Find anything yet?
(Randall) Just a few smudges on this jewelry box.
But everything else looks pretty clean.
Sergeant, did you dust these handles yet?
(Randall) Not yet, Lieutenant.
Well, let me know if you find anything.
I think you're wasting your time, Lieutenant.
This is the fourth time
I've been in this neighborhood in two weeks.
Now this guy's good. Wears gloves.
Never leaves me a print.
Well, let me know if you find anything.
Right away, sir.
(Mark) We will provide protection for all our citizens, not just those in the inner city or in the so-called problem areas.
Now, the brutal murder, last night, of Janice Caldwell is a scathing indictment of the police department's failure, of our failure, to cope with crime on the most fundamental levels.
The taxpayers of this great city are entitled to the safety of their own homes and I mean to guarantee that safety.
(bartender) What's the matter, Artie?
Don't you believe in law and order?
That guy gives me a pain.
(bartender) I'll turn it off.
I thought we were going shopping.
I told you I have to wait for somebody here.
Well, he'd better hurry up because you're not spending any afternoon in this place.
And you know I hate this place.
But I like it.
Did you get the tickets yet?
What tickets?
"What tickets?" I told you, we're going to the roller derby tonight.
Hey, are you crazy?
I'm not going to any roller derby.
A month...
You've been out a whole month and you haven't taken me anyplace.
You think you can hang around this place again with your old pals from prison.
What's left of them.
Guess again, Artie.
This is my place of business.
You don't have to come in here!
So, don't come in here!
We're goin' out.
That's what you think!
I've been waiting for you for over an hour now.
I got hung up.
I got the stuff at my joint from the other night.
(Sharkey) Are you kiddin'?
I wouldn't touch any of it.
Not after what happened last night.
Killin' that woman?
That wasn't me.
Come on, you've been hittin' that neighborhood pretty good.
The other joints, sure.
But the one last night, that wasn't me.
Okay, have it your way.
But I can't handle your goods.
Not with the kind of heat I'll be getting.
I should've known better than to deal with a punk like you.
Johnny Romano, Carlos Vera, they were men.
Yeah, but they're dead.
It's tougher on the outside now.
You know, you spent so much time up in that prison, you don't know how it is any more.
You all through?
Come on, let's get those tickets.
I wanna sit real close.
Come on, let's go. Come on. Come on.
Come on. Come on. Let's go.
Come on. You can walk faster.
Will you shut up?
Commissioner, specifically what steps are you taking to offset this rash of crime in the Bel Air area?
Well, I've ordered a double shift on all squad cars, sunset-to-sunrise helicopter patrol.
As a matter of fact, I plan to be in that chopper myself tonight to get a firsthand look at this operation.
We're going to get this man, and we're gonna get him soon.
Whoever he is, wherever he is, he's not going to be able to escape detection indefinitely.
Now, last night he made his first mistake.
My wife and I were in our bedroom when he ran from the Caldwell house.
Well, he's gonna make other mistakes.
When he does, we'll get him, and we'll hit him with a first-degree-murder charge that will stick.
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
Now, If you'll excuse me...
Does that mean your wife can identify this man as well as yourself?
Sir, sir, can your wife identify this man?
You startled me.
I tore my...
On the cactus, I...
It was very clumsy of me.
No, no, it was my fault, ma'am. I frightened you.
L... I know you, don't I?
Yes, ma'am, you do.
L... I was afraid you'd remember.
It was at the chief inspector's dinner last year at the hotel.
I was a little drunk. Lt. Columbo.
Oh, isn't it perfectly awful?
Janice Caldwell had so much to give.
I'm sure she'd have found her way.
That's what I wanted to ask you about.
You being close friends and all.
Several people have told me that she and her husband were, um...
Well, that is, that she...
Well, they were having problems.
Was she seeing other men?
Is that what you wanted to know?
Uh, yes, ma'am.
Surely that can't make any difference now.
Probably not, but I'd appreciate it if you could give me a few names.
I'm sorry. I never pried into Janice's personal affairs.
Once, last year, I, I did try talking to her.
She became very defensive, almost violent.
Then she was seeing other men?
Young men, I believe. Men I didn't know.
Thank you, ma'am. You've been very helpful.
Uh, Mrs. Halperin, one other thing.
Last night, the burglar...
Your husband gave us a description.
He saw him running from the Caldwell house.
Yes, from our bedroom window.
Now, I understand you were also in the bedroom.
So, I would like to check your description with his.
Oh, I... I didn't see him.
By the time I got to the terrace, he had gone.
You weren't at the window?
Well, I was in bed, and then I went to the window.
Thank you, ma'am.
Uh, one other thing, Mrs. Halperin.
The Caldwell house? It's on the next block, is it?
Yes. Right across the street. Number 1278.
Yeah, I know the address. I was there this morning.
I, I was just trying to visualize the proximity.
Excuse me, sir. A police officer to see you.
The same one who was here this morning when you were out.
Yes. Uh, would you ask him to come in, please?
Excuse me, sir. I hate to trouble you at this time.
Lt. Columbo.
Yes, Lieutenant.
My maid said you were here earlier.
L... I'm sorry, I had to make arrangements...
I hate to bother you like this.
Like a cup of coffee, Lieutenant?
(Hugh) I'm afraid I've been drinking too much coffee today, but I didn't sleep very well last night.
Is there, uh...
Something wrong, Lieutenant?
Wrong? No, sir.
Couple of things I want to clear up just to satisfy myself.
Satisfy yourself, how?
The way your wife died, Mr. Caldwell.
Couple of small things. Probably don't mean anything.
I spoke to your maid, Mrs. Um...
Fernandez.
She's a nice lady.
I guess she worked very long hours yesterday.
It must have been a big cleaning day.
Well, I really wouldn't know.
Apparently, your wife was out shopping all day.
Mrs. Fernandez left here at, uh...
Oh, it was after 8:00, Lieutenant.
And my wife and I arrived home about the same time.
Your wife was downstairs?
Right. In the living room, having a drink.
Mrs. Fernandez says she was wearing a red dress.
Yes, I believe it was.
And then you went out? 9:00.
Was your wife still wearing the red dress?
Yes, Lieutenant.
Look, we had a couple of drinks. I left.
Now, she didn't get ready for bed until I called her around 10:30.
At the club?
They found you at the bar when the police finally located you.
That's right, Lieutenant.
Look, Janice apparently went upstairs to change.
She put on her nightgown, heard a noise, came down, and surprised this burglar.
I should think the facts would speak for themselves.
It's very strange.
See, there's one thing that's very strange.
And what's that, Lieutenant?
Mrs. Fernandez dusted the whole house.
Wax, polish, everything.
Including the bedroom.
Now, the fingerprint people, they checked the handle on the closet door.
Your wife's prints weren't on it.
What I can't figure out is how did she open the door and take out the nightgown without leaving any prints?
That's very simple, Lieutenant.
You see, my wife was in the habit of folding her nightgown every morning when she got up and putting it under her pillow.
Don't you see?
She had no reason to go to the closet.
Yes. Yes. I see.
That would explain it. Yes, it certainly would.
No, not at all, Lieutenant.
Excuse me, sir? Sir?
Ma'am? Excuse me, ma'am!
You got some jumpers for a battery?
Listen, there's a gas station up ahead.
Would you drive me over there?
Columbo?
Excuse me, sir. I didn't mean to barge in.
I looked for your secretary.
I guess she's powdering her nose or something.
May I, uh...
I would've been here earlier, but my car broke down again.
I had some more trouble. They're telling me it's the generator...
If you don't mind, Lieutenant, I'm in something of a hurry.
I'm making real progress. So, I thought...
Finish your report?
Well, finish the report and I'll read it.
Right now, I've gotta get home and get something to eat.
I'm on that chopper patrol tonight.
I understand, sir.
Just take a minute. I know you're in a hurry.
Before I actually fill out the report, if I could just double-check that description that you had...
It was hardly a description.
I barely got a glimpse of him.
You did say, uh, dark sweater.
(Mark) That's right.
Dark pants.
And some kind of cap.
And a dark cap.
Dark cap.
That's it, then. Just dark?
It was night, Lieutenant.
And I was a long way away.
Uh, that's too bad.
That's what your wife said.
You spoke to my wife, did you?
I thought you left.
What was that you said?
I say, you spoke to my wife.
Yes, there's nothing wrong?
No. Certainly not.
No, you know, you see, it was just that on the basis of the news conference this morning,
I thought that she also saw the burglar.
That's ridiculous.
He was gone by the time she got to the terrace.
Yes, sir. That's what she said.
But you certainly gave that impression, so I thought...
Look, Lieutenant, if you don't mind,
I've got to go now, my limousine is waiting.
There are a couple of other things...
Give my secretary a call in the morning,
I'll try to find some time for you.
Oh, Mark, you frightened me.
What are you doing home so early?
Oh, I thought I'd get an early supper.
Please leave the room, darling.
You know I like to bathe in private.
Come on, Margaret. Don't be so coy.
You know, you wear those bubbles like a suit of armor.
Come on, Mark. I'll only be a minute.
Have I told you recently, darling, that our marriage has been a constant joy to me?
Huh? Have I?
No, you haven't.
Well, it has.
I think the first thing that appealed to me about you, Margaret, was your... your generosity, that sweet open-handed quality of yours.
Although sometimes your... your judgment's not so good.
You know that, don't you?
[Laughing] What are you saying?
Well, $4.5 million and you're willing to hand it out to anybody who has a sad story and a rumpled suit.
It's my money, Mark. My inheritance.
Wrong, darling.
My inheritance.
Where's Margaret?
She's at home.
A closed casket, huh?
Couldn't bear to look her in the face.
Mark, I don't know how to thank you.
If it hadn't been for you last night...
You'd be facing a murder charge.
If there's anything I can ever do for you...
There is, my friend.
If you gentlemen want to finish paying your respects to the loved one, we will be closing up until 8:30.
I left Margaret at home.
She's lying on the tile floor near the front door.
She's dead.
Good Lord, Mark.
[Whispering] Quiet.
She drowned in the bathtub.
Only, the police are never gonna know that.
They're gonna think the notorious Bel Air Burglar killed her.
And you must see to that.
I can't get involved.
You are involved, my friend.
This is the quid pro quo.
You killed your wife and I protected you.
Now you protect me or I'll see to it that you go to jail for the rest of your life.
Yes, perfectly.
Now, I left some clothes in a pile by the front door.
Here's what I want you to do.
This is Chopper One. This is Chopper One.
Baker Seven, do you read me? Over.
(patrolman) This is Baker Seven.
We see you, Chopper One.
Okay, we're heading east.
A little early in the evening for this burglar, isn't it, Commissioner?
You never know, Pete.
Clocks don't mean a thing in an empty house, you know.
Yeah, except last night the house wasn't empty.
That's my house down there.
And I saw someone lurking near my wife's car.
He' s disappeared.
Circle around here, Pete, will you?
My God, Margaret. Hover over the pool.
I'm gonna try to get out.
Help me! Quick!
Please, for God's sake!
Get an ambulance for God's sake.
Margaret. Margaret.
My God, Margaret.
She's gone, sir.
She's gonna be all right. Get an ambulance!
Margaret.
Lieutenant, I just heard. Terrible.
The Commissioner, how's he holding up?
They got him in the kitchen.
They're putting some dry clothes on him now.
It's not too bad, I tell you.
The burglar, huh?
Yeah. It's funny, though. Very funny.
There's no sign that he forced his way into the house.
As near as we can figure it, he was laying for her, out in the back by the car.
(Randall) Lieutenant!
Excuse me, Columbo.
Lt. Duffy, sir. Yes, sir.
(Doyle) Just keep circling around.
He's got to be around here somewhere.
Yeah, well, keep looking.
(Columbo) What happened, Doc?
See for yourself, Columbo. She drowned.
In a pool?
Guy tossed her in a pool?
Wonder why she didn't swim?
Probably couldn't swim.
Well, maybe she passed out, Lieutenant.
He didn't hit her first?
No marks? No struggle?
There might've been a struggle. She gotta tear on her sleeve.
(officer) Hey, Doyle?
No, that happened this afternoon.
She tore it on a cactus bush. I was there when it happened.
(officer) This guy just pulled up out front.
(Al) I've come to see Ms. Halperin.
(officer) What about?
Well, she was supposed to come to our meeting tonight and get an award, that's all.
The way things look around here,
I'd like to get out of here.
What did you say? A meeting?
She was supposed to get an award?
Yeah, Holcombe House.
Gonna have dinner at 8:00.
And she was gonna make a little speech and pick up her trophy.
I called her house when she didn't show.
Line was always busy, so I came over.
She was supposed to have dinner with you at 8:00 and make a speech?
That's where she was going when the guy jumped her.
Where were you at 7:30?
I was at the place, setting' up.
Relax, huh. You're making me nervous.
You can prove it, right?
Prove it?
Yeah. I can prove it.
I'll bet you can.
All right, Doyle.
Take this gentleman's name and let him go.
Don't talk to me about manpower allocations!
Now, this man killed my wife and I want him!
Now, you get three units over here and get them over fast.
You're gonna answer to me in the morning.
Excuse me, Commissioner,
I just want to tell you how badly I feel.
And if there's anything that I can do...
No, no, thank you.
Mark, I want you to take those pills...
I want you to take the pills that I gave you...
All right, I'll take the pills.
Terribly shocking.
The man is obviously insane.
I mean, to come back here and do this...
Particularly after the news broadcast when you told them about the increased patrols...
It was the news broadcast that killed her.
I don't follow, sir.
You mentioned it this afternoon, that stupid slip of the tongue that I made when I said that Margaret and I were in our bedroom when the man ran from the Caldwell house.
He must have thought she could identify him.
That's the reason he came back.
Not to steal anything but to silence her.
Yes, that is a possibility.
The tragedy is, she never saw him.
She couldn't identify him.
You mustn't blame yourself, sir.
He threw her in the pool.
She drowned before I could reach her.
He threw her in the pool?
Are you sure of that, sir?
Of course, I'm sure of it. I was a witness.
Pete Hayley and I were in the helicopter and we saw the whole thing.
Then you had the light on?
L... I thought I saw something.
It was kind of a gut feeling, I suppose.
I told him to go back and to hover over the patio area.
I switched on the lights, and there he was.
The same man holding Margaret in his arms.
Are you sure it was the same man?
Well, assumedly...
Yes, he was wearing the same clothes.
You must have a lot of those.
Gut feelings.
Well, you had a gut feeling last night.
I don't know what you're talking about.
What do you mean?
When you asked for me to report to the Caldwell house.
I found out you asked for me when you first called in.
What I mean, sir, is that the burglar had never harmed anybody before, yet from your bedroom window when you called in, you asked for me.
I was just trying to figure out how you knew that the woman was already dead.
I didn't.
Didn't know, obviously.
Well, I... I did have some kind of a feeling.
I sensed something was wrong.
Well, the lights were on, for one thing.
The man running from the house, the fact that Janice was there alone, I...
You're a policeman, I don't have to explain these things.
Yes, I know exactly what you feel.
I've had that feeling many times.
You know something is wrong, you just can't get a handle on it.
All right, sir.
I'm going to look around the house if it's all right with you.
Columbo.
Yeah, go ahead.
What's the matter, Columbo?
You think he's hiding in the tub there?
(Columbo) Just checkin'.
(Columbo) Clean and dry.
Clean and dry.
Let me ask you somethin'.
How do you figure this guy?
I mean, to me, a burglar is like a hungry alley cat.
He sneaks around after dark, but if he hears something', he runs.
Haven't you ever heard of future shock?
The world's going to hell with itself.
Believe me, Columbo. Times have changed.
But still.
But still, you know what bothers me about the murder last night?
You mean the Caldwell woman?
I, uh, I looked at her body.
Right away I saw on her finger the biggest diamond ring I ever saw in my life.
Now, I gotta ask myself this question.
What kind of a burglar robs a house and leaves a ring like that on the victim's finger?
So that's what's been buggin' you?
You're something else.
Don't you think we thought of that?
It's a phony.
The ring was phony?
Solid glass. A piece of garbage.
A pro would have spotted it a mile away, and this guy's a pro.
Excuse me, one moment, will you?
Yeah, I guess that explains it.
See, here I am,
I've been batting my brains out trying to figure out about that ring and you guys had it all the time.
Glass.
Listen, Doc, do me a favor. Would you?
When you perform the autopsy, would you check something for me?
This woman apparently drowned in the swimming pool, so when you check her lungs, see if there's any evidence of chlorine.
There won't be.
Chorine dissipates almost immediately in the human body.
Anyway, the fluids would be masked by the effects of pulmonary edema.
So, uh, does that mean that you couldn't tell if this woman drowned, say, in a bathtub...
Sure, if the bathtub were full of gin.
Well, check it anyway, would you?
It's part of the job.
(woman) Lt. Columbo, sir.
All right, send him in.
I hope I'm not disturbing you, sir.
No, it's all right. Come in.
This is none of my business.
Stop me if I'm out of line, but nobody expected you to be at your desk today.
I want to be here, Lieutenant.
I want to keep working, keep my mind off...
All right, let's see.
Uh, here's, ahem, here's Lieutenant Duffy's report.
There's no question, it's the Bel Air Burglar, all right.
It's too bad he got away last night without a trace.
Oh, and speaking of reports...
That's what I wanted to talk to you about.
I'm making terrific progress, but, you see, I don't think we should be looking for a burglar.
No, sir.
I think we should be looking for someone who made it seem like a burglary.
What are you talking about, Columbo?
Here, read Duffy's report.
It shows very clearly it's the same man we've been looking for.
I'm sure this is a very good report, sir, but there are a couple of things that don't add up.
Oh, for one thing, the fingerprints.
Come on, come on, Columbo, there were no fingerprints.
That's what I mean, sir.
You see, Mr. Caldwell left the house around 9:00.
He called his wife at 10:30 from the bar at the club.
This is what bothers me, sir.
If Mrs. Caldwell spoke to her husband on the phone, why didn't she leave any fingerprints on the phone?
Now that's strange, isn't it?
The maid spent the whole day cleaning, she dusted everything.
Including the phones.
The phone in the upstairs bedroom, that's absolutely clean.
The one downstairs has Mr. Caldwell's prints on it, but it doesn't have Mrs. Caldwell's prints.
All right, what are you implying?
That Caldwell never actually talked to his wife?
Did it ever occur to you that maybe the burglar used the phone after she did and then wiped it clean?
Occur to me that the burglar used the phone after and wiped it clean?
Well, because the burglar had to wear gloves.
You see, sir,
There were no prints of his anywhere in the house.
Now there's another thing that's very strange.
Is this bothering you?
The way this woman's body was dressed in that nightgown.
She didn't do that.
Somebody else dressed her in that nightgown.
Is that a fact, Lieutenant?
Or just some more of your fancy guesswork?
Well, you see, sir, she was wearing a pale blue nightgown which she got from her closet.
And you know something?
There were no prints on the handle of the closet door either.
I don't see what you're getting at.
Unless you're trying to tell me that Caldwell killed his wife and then faked the whole thing?
Oh, no, sir. No. I don't mean that at all.
No. You see,
Mrs. Caldwell, she had a habit whereby she would put her nightgown under the pillow every morning.
I saw a pink nightgown under the pillow.
So, of course, we know that Mrs. Caldwell would not have put on the blue nightgown.
Now, here's what's interesting.
Mr. Caldwell, he knew about the nightgown under the pillow.
So if he had dressed his wife's body, that would be the first place that he would have looked.
No, sir, we're looking for somebody else.
We're looking for somebody... somebody who tried to make a murder look like a burglary.
Like who, for instance?
Well, sir,
I don't like to speak badly of the dead, but, yesterday, your wife confirmed to me that Mrs. Caldwell was seeing other men.
And you think it was one of them?
Yes, sir. I think that's a possibility.
All right, now listen to me, Lieutenant, you're wasting your time and my time and the department's time and it's gonna stop.
look, Columbo, you must understand that no one, no one wants this man caught any more than I do.
Especially now.
But we are looking for a burglar, a man who killed one woman out of fear, who killed another to silence her.
You go on that basis and we're going to solve this case.
You don't think that
I have anything here?
Lieutenant, nobody can be right all the time.
Look for your burglar. There's the killer.
Excuse me, uh,
Mr. Wexler?
He's inside with a customer for the moment.
We can smoke here?
May I help you, sir?
No, thank you very much.
No, I am waiting for Mr. Wexler.
Mr. Wexler is servicing a client at the moment.
If there's anything I can do...
Oh, excuse me, ma'am. Do you happen to...
Do you sell watchbands?
I broke this a couple of weeks ago.
I've been carrying it with me.
This is a very good watch, only five years old.
Waterproof and shockproof.
Do you have something for that?
Seven jewels.
We have a large selection, sir, starting at $25.
No, I don't want a watch, just the band.
That is for just the band.
No kidding.
I think I'll do it some other time, thanks a lot.
Oh, uh, Mr. Wexler is free now, if you'd care to see him.
Mr. Wexler?
(Wexler) I'm Bruno Wexler, yes.
Lieutenant Columbo.
If you can spare a moment, it's about Mrs. Caldwell.
I believe she shopped here in your store.
Mrs. Caldwell was a valued client, yes.
Yes. That's what I understood, sir, from going through her papers.
Mostly receipts for jewelry that she bought here.
Of course, that was some time ago.
The most recent receipt that I found was dated six months ago, September.
Well, I would have to check back.
Um, of course, she came in here quite a few times since then, didn't she?
I mean, even though she didn't buy anything.
I've talked to a few people, friends, the maid...
Lieutenant, could you get to the point?
May I sit down?
This is the point, sir.
It's glass.
I can see that it's glass.
But this appraisal for $8,000 for a 3.6
- Carat, pear-shaped diamond ring with tapered baguettes in a four-prong setting.
This appraisal is for that ring, isn't it?
Well, I never would have charged Mrs. Caldwell $8,000 for a piece of glass.
But that is your work, isn't it?
I arranged with a friend to have this copied for Mrs. Caldwell so that her husband wouldn't realize that she had sold the original back to me.
As a matter of fact, she sold a lot of jewelry back to you.
The woman needed money.
Her husband had cut off her funds.
Then all the jewelry in her house was phony.
Almost all of it. Yes.
Why did she need the money?
Really, Lieutenant...
I understood she had a lot of boyfriends.
Well, Mrs. Caldwell was beautiful and charming for a woman of 36.
But she fancied that she was growing old very slowly.
In fact, hardly at all to judge by the young men from whom she found companionship.
That's a real honey.
You know, we don't get to see many of these around anymore.
Especially in this condition.
Well, I try to take good care of it.
I'm looking for a Mr. Shoup.
I'm Mr. Shoup.
Charlie Shoup.
My name is Columbo.
How many miles you got on it, Mr. Columbo?
20,000? 30,000 tops.
Oh, I got over 100,000 miles on this car.
That's pretty hard to believe.
Well, look, I don't care what the speedometer says,
I'm gonna make you an offer on a trade-in that you just won't be able to turn down.
Look, I just work here.
The stuff they pull up in the business office is none of my doing.
You got a beef?
Go see the boss.
Good-lookin' watch.
I'm here to talk about a Janice Caldwell.
Did she give you that watch?
Janice Caldwell was a friend of mine, Lieutenant.
Where were you Tuesday evening, Mr. Shoup, between 9:00 and midnight?
That was the night Janice was killed?
Tuesday evening.
I was right here until 9:30, that's when we close up.
As a matter of fact, Janice was supposed to pick me up.
When she didn't show up,
I gave her a call at her place, but there was no answer.
Figured I'd been stood up. So I...
There was no answer?
Around 9:30.
Well, like I said, I figured I'd been stood up.
So I went out with a little bookkeeper we got here, had a couple of drinks across the street, went back to my place.
You can substantiate that?
She's right inside, Lieutenant.
Ask for Shirley.
That won't be necessary. Thank you very much.
You've been very helpful.
I'll give you $80 for it in a trade.
Excuse me, Commissioner. I'm sorry to bother you at home...
It's all right. Come in, Lieutenant.
I know I was supposed to have the report at 6:00.
Let me tell you what happened.
My car let me down again.
They let me use another one.
Where is it, the report?
I sat down in front of the typewriter and nothing happened.
Look, Columbo, I'm a little bit tired.
If you've come in here to bombard me with more of your screwball ideas...
May I explain the problem, sir?
Just give me a moment.
You've had a lot of experience.
You happen to know this woman
Mrs. Caldwell. She was your neighbor.
I thought maybe you could help me out with this thing.
I'm trying to figure it out.
If you could just give me a moment.
All right. Come on.
You want a cognac?
No, thank you very much, sir. I want to keep my head clear.
This is complicated.
See whether or not you can help me with this.
Janice Caldwell died between 10:30 and 11:00.
Sometime after her husband spoke to her at 10:30 and sometime before you saw the burglar run out at 11:00.
That's why I can't start the report.
I get stuck in the beginning, the time of death.
What are you talking about, Columbo?
Janice Caldwell had a boyfriend.
She was supposed to meet him at 9:30.
That's an hour before she was supposed to have died.
She never showed up.
So she stood him up. So what?
Yeah, but the guy called her around 9:30, too, and there was no answer on the telephone.
I have to ask myself the question, why couldn't she answer the phone?
You know what I wrote down?
"Maybe she was dead already."
You follow my thinking?
Maybe she just didn't want to talk to the man.
Did that occur to you?
But she answered the phone later, when her husband called.
You see the contradiction.
If she didn't want to speak to her boyfriend at 9:30, why did she pick up the phone at 10:30?
But did she pick up the phone at 10:30?
Because her fingerprints were not on the telephone.
You see how confusing it gets.
That's why I keep going back to this.
"Maybe she was dead already."
'Cause if she's dead already, that explains everything.
That explains why she doesn't pick up her boyfriend.
That explains why she doesn't answer the phone.
And it explains why her fingerprints aren't on the phone.
Because if she was dead, her husband never spoke to her.
It was a fake call.
I specifically asked you this afternoon if you thought Caldwell had killed his wife.
And you said no, for what I thought was a very good reason.
Because he knew about the folded nightgown under the pillow.
I did say that, sir.
But in the light of these new developments, it occurred to me maybe he had an accomplice.
Listen, why couldn't he go out and hire somebody to run out of the house at 11:00, pretend to be a burglar.
Provide him with an alibi.
[Snickering] I see. I get it.
The next thing, I suppose, that you're gonna ask me to believe is this phantom accomplice, who never killed anybody in the first place, of course, comes back the next night to kill my wife.
Is that right? Is that the next step?
You know, Columbo, I really...
I really do admire your enthusiasm.
The force could use a 100 like you.
But this theory is a crock.
(Columbo) You think so, sir?
We are looking for a murderer who was a burglar, who panicked and killed two women.
Now, that's the theory we're gonna go on.
Is that clear?
That's an order.
Tomorrow morning, I want you to report to Lt. Duffy in the Robbery Division.
I want you to concentrate on his leads.
A little legwork and we'll have this man in a week,
The burglar?
Sir, in that connection,
I, uh, I spoke to a Mr. Wexler today...
Well, you're tired...
Not important.
Good night, sir.
(dispatcher) 194. 194.
Come in, 194.
This is 194.
Lieutenant, we have a message for you from the Medical Examiner's office.
Can you patch me through?
Stand by.
Doc, you wanted to talk to me?
(MacMurray) Columbo, I've got some bad news for you.
I checked Mrs. Halperin's lungs for traces of chlorine.
Just as I thought, no trace at all.
But I did find something that might interest you.
Trihydric alcohol glycerol and palmitic acid.
Say that again, Doc.
Soap, Lieutenant. Soap.
Find out what happened to Frankie Vale. Yes, sir.
Tell that probation guy
I want to see him by this afternoon. Yes, sir.
(Columbo) Lieutenant Duffy.
Oh, Columbo.
I'm having some problems.
Thought you would.
I spoke to the Commissioner last night.
He suggested that I report to you and maybe we could work together.
Well, it's nice to hear you have a little faith in us.
Come on inside, Columbo.
I thought maybe you could give me a line on some of the guys that you spoke to.
You know, the most likely suspects.
But I'll tell you something, you won't find him in there.
Columbo, these guys are like old friends.
Very placid and predictable types.
Now, what we're looking for is a younger guy, a guy with a violent temper.
Let me ask you something.
Leave out the last two murders.
Just concentrate on the first three robberies.
If you had your choice, which of these guys would you pick?
That's easy. The guy on top. Artie Jessup.
Artie's always my first choice when he's out on the streets, which isn't too often.
Take a look for yourself.
In and out of the joint since he was 20 years old.
That's almost 30 years of state hospitality, give or take a few vacations on the outside.
You know, I think old Artie prefers prison life.
He's very nervous out here with us civilians.
What about the M. O?
Fits a lot of guys, including Artie.
We've already talked to him. We can't hold him.
Columbo, you said forget about the murders, right?
Artie has an alibi for both nights.
Mr. Jessup?
I stopped by your place.
Your wife told me you were here.
You got Scotch?
You like Scotch?
She wishes.
Give him some Scotch.
Thought maybe you could help me.
Suppose I wanted a few dollars for that.
Where did you find it, in a box of Cracker Jacks?
It's not real.
Come on, pal, what is this, some kind of hustle?
I must be getting old.
I'm not from Robbery.
I'm from Homicide.
I'm investigating the killing of those two women in Bel Air.
You're not going to hang that one on me.
No way! No way!
You wanna book me, go ahead, book me!
You had nothin' to do with it.
Then what are you here for?
I had nothing to do with it.
You wanna know what I am here for?
I don't wanna sit down.
Go ahead.
You had nothing to do with it.
Now, the guys down at the Robbery detail they can't identify the burglar that committed those two murders.
That's what I'm here for.
You haven't heard anything?
Do you know I'm afraid of Siamese cats?
One meow and I'm out of the door with my pockets empty.
Oh, look, Lieutenant, that guy who killed those women, he scares me.
I mean, he really scares me.
Look, I'm a professional, we both know that, right?
Otherwise you wouldn't be down here.
That guy what killed those women, he gives guys like me a bad name.
Look, Lieutenant, if I knew who that guy was, you think I wouldn't have called you guys a long time ago?
Would you rob a thing like this?
They'd laugh me off the cellblock.
All right, listen to me, Artie.
I got a problem. You can help me.
I think I know who killed those two women.
But I can't prove it.
(man) Hey, Artie, it's your old lady.
She says, get your tail home, you're taking her shopping'.
Tell that bag to go...
Tell her I'll be home in a little while.
You know who killed those women?
Come on, Hugh, make sense. Who wants money?
The man. The burglar.
The one who's been robbing all the houses around here.
Mark, he's dead serious.
He's ready to go to the police if I don't pay him.
But how does he know you killed Janice?
(Hugh) I don't know. I don't know.
The point is that he knows.
I should've called the police the moment it happened.
You did call the police, my friend.
How much does he want?
Said he'd tell me later today.
When are you supposed to meet him?
Uh, 4:30.
A bar at Fifth and Wall.
All right, meet him.
I'll be waiting nearby.
Find out what he wants, and we'll decide how to... how to deal with him.
All right, no violence.
Why, Hugh,
I'm no more violent than you are.
The cops are trying to pin those robberies on me.
But, you see, I didn't pull that job in your joint.
But I figure you know that already, don't you?
Don't hand me that.
I figure you killed your old lady and tried to pin it on me.
Well, I got news for you, pal, nobody makes Artie Jessup a patsy, you got it?
It's gonna cost you.
You still haven't given me proof.
I don't need any proof.
All I gotta do is go to cops and confess to those first three robberies and, you know what, all of a sudden, they look into the other two where the women were killed.
Now, what do you think?
I think they got you.
Hey, I don't mind one way or the other.
Bein' on the outside isn't all that great.
All my buddies are back there, so going back on a burglary rap,
I won't mind that a bit. Now, come on.
What's it going to be, pal?
Do I go to the cops, or do we work something out?
He wants $5,000 in small bills. Old money.
Nothing larger than a $50.
$5,000, is that all?
The man has no imagination.
When do you meet him?
Tomorrow afternoon, here.
Same time?
Right. Now, Mark, he's dead serious.
He says he knows your department has him under suspicion for those other robberies, but that they can't prove anything.
He's not a stupid man.
All right, now, I want you to get the money from the bank.
I want you to be here tomorrow at the same time.
Mark, we can't start paying him.
He's just gonna want more.
Just leave him to me.
You keep your mouth shut and don't admit to anything.
Oh, Columbo. What are you doing here?
Oh, good morning, sir.
Lt. Duffy is out on call. I'm using his office.
What's the matter with your office?
Well, I was going through these file folders.
These are the prime suspects in the robberies and Duffy didn't want the folders out of his office.
I wanna tell you something.
I'm doing it just exactly the way you suggested.
I'm concentrating my efforts on the robbery aspects of this crime, and you're right.
I think the answer lies right in here somewhere.
Good.
Okay, well, maybe I'll take a glance at these myself again.
I didn't get a very good look at that man the night he ran from the Caldwell house.
Still you never know, do you?
That's a good thought.
Sometimes something just clicks into place.
Well, on the other hand,
I've been through these a dozen times.
I don't think they can help me any.
That's a good thought, too, sir.
No sense wasting your time on a dead end.
(Mark) You keep at it, though, huh?
If you come up with anything, let me know.
Do you, uh...
Under the table.
Gonna count it?
If it's short, you can always make it up in the next payment.
The next payment?
You said...
I said a lot of things, Mr. Caldwell.
One thing I forgot to tell you was that...
I'm a chronic liar.
(Duffy) Sure they're in there, sir?
Positive.
Caldwell is meeting him on my instructions.
Catch this man Jessup with the money, we'll have our killer.
(Duffy) Okay?
(policeman) Okay.
All right. Move.
(Artie) Take it easy.
(officer) You want it the hard way?
(Artie) Take it easy!
What are you trying to do, break my head?
(Mark) It's called blackmail, Jessup.
First you rob this man's house, you kill two women, then you've got the gall to try blackmail.
Get out! You don't have any proof.
We'll have it. As soon as we search your apartment.
Which we'll do right now.
Columbo, Duffy, come with me. We'll need one squad car.
Commissioner, we need a warrant before we can search that apartment.
We already got one. You want to check it?
Yes, sir, that's fine.
I think you're making a mistake.
I'll prove to you, I'm not.
All right, take this man down and book him.
Mr. Caldwell will give you his statement.
Commissioner, I believe you are making a mistake here, sir.
I don't believe Jessup killed either of these women, particularly your wife.
(Mark) Don't be ridiculous.
I saw it, he threw her in the pool.
There were other witnesses.
(Duffy) Could you bring the keys up, please?
Right away, huh?
(Duffy) He's on his way up, Commissioner.
Sir, I realize that your wife appeared to die in the pool.
Actually she died in the bathtub.
Right this way, please. Right this way.
Room 13.
It was the water in her lungs.
Commissioner.
The water in her lungs. There were traces of soap.
Duffy, check that bathroom. You, get the kitchen.
You see, sir, as soon as I saw the body,
I knew right away something was wrong.
You did, huh?
Check behind that stove, get under the sink there.
I knew something was wrong because of her outfit.
What she was wearing, the tear in her dress.
You see, I had asked myself the question.
Why does a woman go to an important testimonial dinner knowing that her sleeve is torn?
Got a whole closet full of nice clothes.
The one thing that I knew, she was not on her way to the dinner when she was drowned.
So, now it follows, she must have been drowned earlier.
Now I find out about the soap.
That places it in the bathtub.
You see, a couple of hours before her body was dropped into the pool, somebody drowned her and somebody dressed her.
The Medical Examiner's report set the time of death at 7:30, Columbo.
But that was based on your eyewitness testimony.
Now, I spoke to him.
He said it could just as easily have happened a couple of hours earlier.
All right. Suppose she did die in the bathtub.
Jessup surprised and killed her.
He dressed the body and threw it in the pool to make it look accidental.
No, sir, that's not possible.
You see, the bathroom, the bathtub, the faucet itself, everything was bone dry.
Including the towels, not even slightly moist.
That was the first thing I checked, sir.
Now, she had to have drowned before 6:00 maybe even before 5:00, otherwise it wouldn't have been that dry.
Long before Jessup got there.
As a matter of fact, just about the time that you came home for supper.
I believe you killed your wife.
And I believe you either killed Janice Caldwell or you're covering up for it.
You just lost your badge, my friend.
Come on, come on, keep digging.
(Duffy) Yes, sir.
At first, I thought Mr. Caldwell was responsible, but that didn't work out because of the nightgown business.
And then the next night when your wife was killed, and you had that terrific alibi, it suddenly hit me.
You were in it together and you tried to blame Artie Jessup.
And the truth is that Jessup was nowhere near either house either night.
(Duffy) Commissioner.
He wasn't, huh?
All right, how do you explain these?
Janice Caldwell's jewels.
I can explain it.
You took them from the Caldwell house, you hid 'em, and today you planted 'em here to incriminate Mr. Jessup.
You're crazy, you can't prove anything like that.
Sgt. Randall?
(Randall) Here, sir.
Commissioner Halperin says he found these jewels under your mattress.
You're a liar.
Hey, I don't even live here.
I can verify that, sir.
He doesn't live here. I live here.
These are my shirts. That's my underwear.
My brother-in-law.
That's my nephew, my niece.
I haven't lived here long. Just moved in.
You see, the apartment was vacant for three weeks.
I just signed the lease.
You looked in the closet.
Those were my pajamas and my bathrobe.
The file folder, the... the report on the desk.
Yes, sir, I'll have to take responsibility for that.
You see, I persuaded Mr. Jessup to telephone Mr. Caldwell, knowing that Caldwell would contact you.
I was sure that once you knew the true identity of the burglar, you'd try and incriminate him.
So this morning, very early, just after I signed the lease,
I made up a new file folder on Mr. Jessup.
Everything was the same except this address.
Only one person, beside myself, knew this address.
That was you, sir.
I think once your friend, Mr. Caldwell, understands the situation, he'll fill in some missing pieces.
Papa and his daughter Edna
Soup
Spaggety
Mellon
4 Beers Cigarettes
The Flirty Mr. and Mrs. Stout
SKATING
"I'am having a skate party tonight. Won't you come?"
"You must come to my party and bring a friend."
"An Old Sweetheart"
"I want you to meet my friend, so do come."
"Sir Cecil will be at the party, Papa!"
"The Party"
Sir Cecil Seltzer, C.O.D.
THE END .: ENGsub by Korf (UIN#104538656) :.
Submission
O Allah, as I lie here wounded, my spirit broken
I hear in my head the judge's voice as he pronounces me guilty.
The sentence I've to serve is in your words:
"The woman and the man guilty of adultery or fornication flog each of them with a hundred stripes;
let no compassion move you in their case, in a matter prescribed by Allah, if ye believe in Allah and the Last Day;
and let a party of the believers witness their punishment"
Two years ago, on a sunny day, while on the souk my eyes were caught by those of Rahman, the most handsome man I have ever met.
After that day, I couldn't help but notice his presence whenever I went to the marketplace.
I was thrilled when I learned that his appearance on the bazaar was not a coincidence.
One day he suggested we meet in secret, and I said, 'Yes'.
As the months went by our relationship deepened.
What is more, out of our love a new life started to grow.
Our happiness did not go unnoticed and before long, envious eyes gave way to malicious tongues;
'Let's ignore these people', Rahman and I said to each other, 'and trust in Allah's mercy'.
Naive, young and in love perhaps, but we thought that your holiness was on our side.
Rahman and I shared affection, trust and a deep respect for each other, how could Allah disapprove?
When I was sixteen my father broke the news to me in the kitchen.
"You are going to marry Aziz;
he is from a virtuous family and he will take good care of you".
My wedding day was more of a celebration of my families than of mine.
Once in my marital home my husband approached me,
Ever since then I recoil from his touch,
I am repulsed by his smell, even if he has just had a bath.
Yet, O Allah I obey his command sanctioned by your words
I let him take me each time I push him away he quotes you:
"They ask thee concerning women's courses
Say: they are a hurt and a pollution
So keep away from women in their courses, and do not approach them until they are clean
But when they have purified themselves,
Ye may approach them in any manner, time or place ordained for you by Allah
For Allah loves those who turn to him constantly
And he loves those who keep themselves pure and clean."
O Allah, most high
You say that 'men are the protectors and maintainers of women, because, you have given the one more (strength) than the other'.
I feel, at least once a week the strength of my husband's fist on my face.
O Allah most high
Life with my husband is hard to bear, but I submit my will to you
My husband supports me from his means, therefore I am devoutly obedient, and I guard in my husband's absence what you would have me guard.
But my husband, maintainer and protector, fears disloyalty and ill conduct on my part;
he accuses me of being ungrateful to him;
He always finds a reason to doubt my loyalty to him
And after a series of threats and warnings he starts to beat me.
O Allah, most gracious, most merciful.
Just as you demand of the believing woman I lower my gaze, and guard my modesty.
I never display my beauty and ornaments; not even my face or hands.
I never strike with my feet in order to draw attention to my hidden ornaments, not even at parties.
I never go out of the house unless it is absolutely necessary;
and then only with my father's permission.
When I do go out I draw my veil over my bosom as you wish.
Once in a while I sin.
I fantasize about feeling the wind through my hair or the sun on my skin, perhaps on the beach.
I day-dream about an extended journey through the world, imagining all the places and people's out there.
Of course, I shall never see these places or meet many people because it is so important to guard my modesty in order to please you, O Allah.
So I cheerfully do as you say and cover my body from head to toe except while I am in the house and with family members only.
In general I am happy with my life.
However, things have changed since my father's brother, Hakim is staying with us.
He waits till I am alone at home and comes to my room.
Then he orders me to do things to him, touch him in places most intimate.
Since he is with us I took to the habit of wearing the veil inside in order to deter him.
That doesn't stop him though.
Twice now he unveiled me, ripped my inner garments and raped me.
When I told my mother she said she would take it up with my father.
But my father ordered her - and me - not to question his brother's honour.
I experience pain each time my uncle comes to see me.
I feel caged, like an animal waiting for slaughter.
I am filled with guilt and shame;
and I feel abandoned, yet I am surrounded by family and friends.
Hakim is gone, now that he knows that I am pregnant.
The verdict that killed my faith in love is in your holy book.
Faith in you..., submission to you... feels like... is self betrayal.
O Allah, giver and taker of life.
You admonish all who believe to turn towards you in order to attain bliss.
I have done nothing my whole life but turn to you.
And now that I pray for salvation, under my veil, you remain silent like the grave I long for.
A picture with a smile - and perhaps, a tear.
"Charity Hospital"
The Woman - whose sin was motherhood.
His morning promenade.
"Awkward ass."
"Pardon me, you dropped something."
"John"
Five years later...
"Put the quater in the gas meter."
"You know what streets we worked today?"
All's well...
Job number 13.
The woman - now a star of great prominence. Professor Guido, impressario.
"Read what the critics say... wonderful!"
Charity - to some a duty, to others a joy.
Enter - his brother.
" You wicked boy."
"Go lick'im."
"If your kid beats my brother, then i'm going to beat you."
"Remember - if he smites you on one cheek, offer him the other." A successful retreat.
"Oh, well, I guess he's not in.".
"This child is ill.
Get a doctor at once!"
"I must go now, but I'll return."
The country doctor.
"Say 'ah'."
"Louder!"
"Are you the father of this child?"
"Well - pràctically."
"Explain yourself."
"This child needs proper care and attention."
"I'll attend to the matter."
Convalescence The proper care and attention. Country Orfan Asylum
"Ask him where the kid is."
"Ask him if he's got any belongings." " Tell him it's none of his business."
Night.
"You don't charge for a baby in arms?"
$1000 Reward Lost child wanted...
Dawn.
Dreamland.
Off for a spin.
Sin creeps in.
Welcome to our city.
The trouble begins.
"Vamp him."
Innocence.
Getting flighty.
Her sweetheart arrives.
Jealousy.
In the great Gold Rush, Alaska was the hope and dream of men, the ruthless siren of the Far North, beckoning thousands to her icy bosom.
Beckoning thousands to her unknown regions.
Chilkoot Pass was the great barrier to the gold fields.
Over this Pass men faced untold misery and hardship.
Many lost their lives.
Some fell by the wayside, others lost courage and turned back.
But the brave went on.
Far into the icy north, deep into the silent nowhere, came an undaunted lone prospector.
And somewhere in that nowhere was another lone prospector.
With cheerful optimism our little Columbus descended, then stopped, stepped, slipped and slid.
"Now let me see," thought the little fellow.
"Before I know where I am, I must get there."
There in that frozen wilderness a dream came true, and a lone voice shrieked into the solemn sky,
"Eureka!
I've found it, a mountain of gold!"
But the elements laughed, roared and thundered.
In that raging nowhere was a lone cabin, and another lone man, Black Larson, an unmitigated, predatory scoundrel.
Out of the lashing storm came the Little Fellow to find shelter and perhaps a little hospitality.
There he sat, resting his weary bones as the icy wind howled through the knothole.
"Come here," said Larson.
"What are you doing?"
"Eating, obviously."
"Get out."
"Go on!"
"Get out!"
The wind also was giving Big Jim his troubles.
Big Jim was the noble type. He had suffered.
Oh, how he loved to suffer. He suffered about everything.
"Get out," said Black Larson.
"Or I'll fill you both full of lead."
"Now then, the pair of you, get out!"
"Out!"
That kind of noise Jim don't tolerate.
"I'll stay right here, understand?"
"Right here," said Big Jim.
"Yes, sir, he'll stay right here," said the Little Fellow.
"Understand?
We stay right here."
And stay they did, for days and nights.
Two men walked and never talked, hunger gnawed their bones.
"I must have food!" yelled Big Jim.
"I must have food!"
"What are you eating?" Said Black Larson.
"Open your mouth!"
"Liar!
It's that candle."
"That?" said the Little Fellow. "How revolting."
"If I thought you were holding out on me, I'd slit your gizzard!"
"One of us must brave that storm, if we're to get food."
"Come here, the pair of you."
"We'll cut the cards and the low man goes."
"You're the man," said Jim.
"Goodbye, good luck."
"Don't forget to bring home the bacon."
Somewhere in that nowhere, the law was looking for Black Larson.
Desperate with hunger and here it was Thanksgiving Day.
Nevertheless there was something to be thankful for.
"Not quite done yet, give it two more minutes."
"Come on, come on," said Big Jim.
After scouring the country for food, the Little Fellow had to admit he had seen nothing, not even a field mouse.
From the pangs of hunger,
Big Jim was becoming delirious, hysterical.
In fact he was a pain in the neck.
"Food, food!" he thundered.
"I can put another shoe in the pot."
"No, no, anything but that!"
Poor Jim, he couldn't take it.
"What's the matter?" Said the Little Fellow.
"I thought you were a chicken."
"Well, build up the fire," said Big Jim.
"What's the matter with you?" Said the Little Fellow.
"Come, my pretty bird," said Big Jim.
"Don't be childish."
"Hey, quit it. Don't be foolish, it's me!"
"You!" said Jim.
"I'm sorry.
I must be crazy."
"You're telling me," said the Little Fellow.
"You go inside.
I'll take the gun in case you lose it."
Chicken or no chicken, the Little Fellow looks appetizing to Big Jim.
Meanwhile Black Larson stumbled onto Big Jim's mountain of gold.
Then came the parting of the ways,
Big Jim to his mine, our hero to his fate.
"Goodbye," said the Little Fellow.
"It's been a great pleasure knowing you."
Treachery awaited Big Jim at his mountain of gold.
Big Jim looked deep into the eyes of Black Larson and saw there the soul of a skunk.
Caught in a maelstrom of desperate deeds,
Black Larson swept on to impending doom.
And out of a dream in that frozen waste, a city grew.
And humanity warmed it with living, loving and desiring.
Georgia.
Jack was a ladies' man.
Georgia was quick and impulsive, proud and independent.
In the evening Georgia worked as a dancehall girl.
Jack had lots of appeal for Georgia.
Perhaps that's why she resented him.
Out of the night came the Little Fellow, towards the dancehall, that beacon light of pleasure, that retreat of lost dreams.
"Georgia, why aren't you nice to Jack?"
"I believe he really likes you," said the girl.
"He likes everybody," said Georgia quite audibly.
"I'm bored with this place," she continued.
"I'd give it all up if I could find someone honest and worthwhile."
"Don't worry, I'll find him someday."
Then she turned and looked and looked and looked.
"Kinda fresh, ain't ya?" Thought Jack.
"Get down off that high horse."
"Me and you are gonna dance."
"Hey there, pan out a tune."
"Just a moment, I said we're gonna dance."
"I beg your pardon," said Georgia.
To show her utter contempt for Jack, she picked out the most deplorable looking tramp in the dancehall.
"Hey you, come here."
"Yes, you.
Do you want to dance?"
"You see, I'm very particular about whom I dance with."
And there he stood, the dauntless cavalier, guarding... her sanctuary.
"If you wanna make a hit with your lady friend,"
"you should put your hat on straight, like this!"
"Take that you... Ouch!"
"Huh! Very good."
"Didn't know me own strength," said the Little Fellow.
Hank Curtis' cabin was a stone's throw from the dancehall.
Hank was a mining engineer who lived alone and occasionally went on long expeditions into the Far North.
Hank was kind and human, and our hero cold and hungry, and the beans smelled good and the coffee was steaming hot.
So the Little Fellow devised a way of getting breakfast.
Big Jim recovered from the blow he received from Black Larson but lost his memory.
Hank's partner arrives.
Both are ready to leave on a long expedition.
Hank informs his partner that the Little Fellow is to look after the cabin while he's away.
"Goodbye," said Hank. "And don't forget to feed the mule."
Since that night in the dancehall the Little Fellow hadn't seen Georgia, but an incident was to bring them together again.
There she stood, her loveliness lighting the room, filling his soul with the music of romance for which he was so ill-fitted.
As she introduced her friends, his heart began to sing.
As they warmed up by the stove, he excused himself to get firewood.
And in that cabin his secret was revealed, his love for Georgia.
And the girls giggled and laughed, perhaps in order to hide their pity.
For in the world of the dancehall it wasn't wise for the girls to reveal their hearts.
And so they thought they'd have a little fun with him.
There in the gloaming they sat, their faces alight with mischief, but all the while his heart was singing.
And so she fooled and flirted and stroked his hair.
He knew she was fooling, but he was happy.
For she was near him, holding his hand, smiling at him.
"Nice place you have here," said Georgia.
"I hope you will invite us again."
What if she were fooling?
He was enjoying the warmth of her attention.
And the lady was enjoying the warmth of his chair.
And now she was leaving.
The light of her loveliness would be gone.
And he would be left with an emptiness, to return to his bleak, lonely existence.
"Pardon me," said the Little Fellow,
"But, uh..." He was lost for words.
"Would you really like to come again?"
"Of course," said Georgia. "What do you say, girls?"
"We'll come for dinner New Year's Eve," said the ladies.
"Very well," said Georgia.
"We'll come to dinner New Year's Eve."
Of course at that moment Georgia would forget her gloves!
For the next few days the Little Fellow hustled and shoveled in order to buy that New Year's dinner.
The eve of a new year. New hopes and new dreams.
And there was Georgia, caressing him with her smiles and tender glances.
And the girls called for a speech.
But he was too happy to speak.
All that mattered was Georgia was there.
Georgia!
So he muttered and stuttered and finally said,
"I can't make a speech but I'll do a dance."
And a dance he did, with the rolls.
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And never brought to mind
And days of auld lang syne
For auld lang syne My dear
For auld lang...
In the midst of all their revelry the vague memory of a promise crept into Georgia's mind.
"Let's go up and visit the Little Fellow," she said.
"We'll have some fun with him," said Jack.
"We'll send Georgia in first, then give him a scare."
"Oh, forget it," said Jack.
"How about giving me a little attention?"
A day or so later in the Recorder's office,
Big Jim tried to convince the assayers that he had a mountain of gold.
"Where is this place?" they said.
But Big Jim's memory had failed him.
All he knew was that it was near the cabin.
"The cabin, that's it!"
"F I could find my way to the cabin I could find the mine."
"But I can't remember."
"Hey!" said Jack, "Georgia's been looking for you."
The Little Fellow knew otherwise.
How dare that cad mention her name so lightly?
For two pins he'd give him another thrashing.
However being a little underweight he would ignore the insult.
But it was true. Georgia had been looking for him.
Georgia had written him a letter.
And as he went looking for Georgia, so Big Jim went looking for him.
"You, you!" said Big Jim.
"You!
The very man I've been looking for!"
"The cabin, the cabin!
Where is it?"
"Answer me, I say!"
"Can't you speak, man?
Tell me!"
"Where's the cabin?
"At last I shall find my mountain of gold."
"To your feet man, quick!"
"You're coming with me!"
"Take me to the cabin and I'll make you a millionaire!"
"Georgia!
Just a moment," said the Little Fellow.
"Georgia, you don't have to explain. I understand."
"I love you. I'll take you away from this life."
"I'm going away, and when I return,"
"I shall come back."
Exhausted and footweary, they arrived at the cabin.
"Ah!" said Big Jim, "it won't be long now."
"Bring in the eats and tomorrow we'll start for the mine.
"Here, take a swig of this. It'll put hair on your topcoat."
"My, this is a heavy lamb chop," said the Little fellow.
Then fate - it's always fate - played its little joke, and again the elements laughed, roared and thundered, but through it all our heroes soundly slumbered.
Then came the dawn.
The Little Fellow awoke, blissfully ignorant of what happened the night before, but feeling definitely conscious of "the morning after".
"Oh well, may as well tidy up and get breakfast."
"This is the worst liver attack I've ever had."
"Feel that rocking?"
"It's the stomach."
"It's not the stomach."
"Let's go to the other side."
"We'll see how far it will go over."
"Something must be missing underneath."
"I'll go outside and see what it is."
"Now," said Big Jim, "don't get excited."
"Take it easy, don't move, don't breathe!"
"I said don't breathe, stupid."
"You can be most annoying at times."
"If you'll only be cool, be calm," said Big Jim,
"We have nothing to worry about."
"Now show a little character! Where's your willpower?"
"Now listen, I've got a very good idea."
"Hold your hands like this, then I can get out first."
"You see what I mean?" Said Big Jim.
"Your mind is chaotic. You have no psychology."
"You have no control."
And Big Jim discovered his claim!
"Now we shall be rich," said Jim.
"We shall be millionaires!"
And so they were.
Now they were homeward bound and they were leaving the hardship and toil of Alaska to live in the land of milk and honey.
To live, laugh and indulge themselves in the lap of luxury.
They were famous, and sought after by the press.
In their cabin deluxe they were welcomed and waited upon.
The reporter wanted to write the Little Fellow's life story,
"From Rags to Riches", and he graciously consented.
And Big Jim was manicured.
"Not the nails," said he, "the corns."
The reporter thought of a good idea, to have the Little Fellow pose in his mining clothes.
It would make a human story.
Georgia...
There she was in the steerage. Neither knew of the other's presence.
Georgia overheard the officer say there was a stowaway aboard.
"You!" said Georgia.
"I thought I'd never see you again."
And then she mistook him for the stowaway.
The officer was going to put him in irons.
But Georgia pleaded for him and said she would pay his fare.
"Heck!" said the Captain. "That's no stowaway."
"That's Big Jim's partner, the multimillionaire."
Then of course there were apologies.
The Little Fellow gathered himself together.
James, the valet, was told to prepare for an extra guest.
"Pardon me," said the reporter, "but who's the lady?"
"Oh, you don't say! Well, congratulations."
"This will make a great story, and with a happy ending."
And so it was.
A happy ending.
The Sorcerer
Dinarzade
Achmed
Peri Banu
Aladdin
The Witch
Great was the might of the African Sorcerer
In the city of the Caliph they were celebrating the ruler's birthday
The Great Caliph
"A magic horse, Exalted Caliph, which flies through the air"
Princess Dinarzade, the Caliph's daughter
Prince Achmed, her brother
"I will not part with this horse for mere gold!"
"So choose any of my treasures"
"May I have whatever I desire?"
"I swear it-by the Beard of the Prophet!"
The Story of Prince Achmed
"How can one bring the horse back down to earth?"
"The lever at the head drives it into the air..."
"...and the lever at the tail brings it to earth"
"Does the Prince know this?"
Far from his homeland he landed on one of the magic islands of Waq Waq
The Prince was young, and brave and eager for adventure
"Who are you, maidens?"
"We serve the Princess Peri Banu, ruler of the spirit land of Waq Waq"
"Stay with us, handsome stranger"
On a neighbouring island lay a magic lake
...where every night the exquisite Peri Banu and her attendants bathed
"Give back my cloak of feathers!"
"Come with me to my beautiful homeland"
Thus was the Princess Peri Banu taken from the land of spirits
The horse carried them to far away China
"Do not be afraid of me"
"I am yours to command to the end of time"
"You do not know the power of the spirits of Waq Waq!"
"They will kill you!"
"Allah's mercy will protect us if you will be my wife"
Meanwhile, the Sorcerer searched for his magic horse
"We will find our home and you will forget all about Waq Waq"
"I will follow you!"
"The Prince sends you this garment"
"He bids me lead you to him"
Adventures in China
The Emperor of China
The Emperor's Jester
Hither the Sorcerer brought Peri Banu to sell her to the Emperor
The Emperor smiled upon Peri Banu
"Kill her, or take her to wife!"
"Now, my brave Prince, I shall return to your sister"
In this mountain dwelt the Sorcerer's greatest enemy the Fire Mountain Witch
"How dare you come to my magic mountain?"
"The African Sorcerer brought me hither"
"He is my greatest enemy!"
"And we are friends"
The Bridegroom
"Help me free Peri Banu"
"I fear no spirits!"
"With these weapons you can conquer the spirits"
The Bride
Far below, at that moment, the wedding of Peri Banu
"We must stop the wedding"
The spirits of Waq Waq look for their mistress
"Take me to Waq Waq"
THE GATES OF WAQ WAQ OPEN ONLY TO THE ONE WHO THE MAGIC LAMP OF ALADDIN POSSESSES
Aladdin and the Magic Lamp
"I am Aladdin"
"Where is the Magic Lamp?"
"Do you not have it?"
"I will tell you"
"I was a poor tailor in the city of the Caliph"
"One day I was visited by a mysterious stranger"
"Behold Dinarzade, the daughter of the Caliph"
"You shall have her, once you do something for me"
"He led me to a high mountain"
The Magic Lamp
"Fetch the Lamp"
"Give me the Lamp!"
"First let me out!"
"Then die!
I have other ways to obtain the Lamp!"
"I languished long in the dark cave until I succeeded in lighting the Lamp"
"What is your command, O Master?"
"I am your servant, I and all the Spirits of the Lamp"
"Take me home"
"Now I knew I could win the Princess Dinarzade"
"In a single night I built her a splendid palace"
"Next morning the astounded Caliph visited the enchanted building"
"So she became my wife"
"The Caliph is my father, Dinarzade-my sister"
"Tell me, what happened further?"
"One day everything vanished - the palace, Dinarzade and the Lamp"
"I fled before the fury of the Caliph"
"I set out to sea"
"A fearful storm blew up"
"And so you found me"
"Do you know who did this to you?"
"The African Sorcerer!"
"He loved Dinarzade"
"Hurry, Achmed, and free Peri Banu"
"The spirits want to kill her, because she left to follow you"
"The Sorcerer has stolen the Magic Lamp"
"Only the Lamp can open the gates of Waq Waq"
"Kill the Sorcerer and the Lamp is yours!"
"Kill him!"
"I will try"
"Your enemy is dead!"
The Spirit Battle of Waq Waq
The spirits rose up against their faithless mistress
"Prince Achmed stands before the gates!"
"Bring out Peri Banu!"
"Summon the Spirits of the Lamp, Aladdin!"
Yet the spirits of darkness came before him
Aladdin was overwhelmed
"The Lamp!"
The Witch intervened
Now legions of benevolent spirits streamed out of the Magic Lamp
"Behold! The palace!"
"Return and seek happiness in the land of mortals"
"Dinarzade must be in the palace"
The towers of the Caliph's city soon appeared before them
"Aladdin's palace has returned!"
Meanwhile, the call to morning prayer sounded from the minarets
who the hell is he?
what the... who are you?
#7:
At the Mercy of My Friends
Who could that have been?
Dr. Tanaka?
Doc? what are you doing?
I'm beat and so hungry.
That interview went on for ever. what a waste of time.
I feel your pain, but dealing with stuff like that is just part of the job.
My brain knows that, but my stomach doesn't. I'm starving.
I said I'm starving.
Masuda!
Tony Stark just passed us!
Yes, that's his car.
where the heck is Stark going at this time of night?
Do you smell what I smell ?
Sure do!
I love that smell !
It's the smell of a big scoop!
Follow that smell !
All set. I'm ready to shoot.
Make sure you catch those Kodak moments.
You bet!
Masuda, are you okay?
what just happened?
-Not sure. Let's just get out of here.
Mr. Stark!
He's gone!
where could he be?
Nanami.
Look at that.
That's strange!
I've got a bad feeling about this.
I think we should call the cops.
I agree. It 's getting too dangerous.
This is Nanami Ota from the Tokyo Journal I need to report some...
Dr. Tanaka!
wake up.
Stark?
where are we?
who knows?
From what I see, I'd say we've been kidnapped.
But if so, why's that door open?
No guards either. It doesn't add up.
well, now, I guess that answers the guard question.
So, Doc, any idea where the heck we might be?
I'm guessing we're still near Japan on one of those islands that's used as a landfill .
we've got our very own trash island. Not the best vacation spot.
what's going on?
what the hell is this crap?
Couldn't they just have taken my wallet instead? Never heard of a reactor thief.
Are you all right?
well, that depends on your definition of all right.
I'd be dead in a few minutes without my reactor.
Since I'm still alive, I'm guessing they've replaced my Arc Reactor with this pacemaker.
who could 've done this to you?
Not sure. But whoever it is, they obviously want me to stick around a little longer.
Yinsen!
It's been a while, hasn't it, Stark?
I knew it!
You've been alive this whole time.
well, it depends on how you look at it.
The Yinsen you knew is dead.
what does that mean?
The man you see here now is part of the Zodiac.
I don't believe that. You'd never join Zodiac.
You're the one who told me to use my abilities for peace.
what the...
Yes, I was the one who took this from you. Your life is in my hands.
I gave you life once. why not take it back, huh?
That pacemaker I put in you will only last 24 hours before it stops.
I'll give you till then to decide whether or not you want to join the Zodiac.
Please. No one can create amazing weaponry like you can.
The Zodiac needs someone with such a talent.
Anyway, why not go back to what you're really good at, Tony?
Cut the crap!
I'll never go back to being that person again.
Never say never.
well, then, you've got 24 hours to decide.
I should warn you, don't waste your time trying to escape.
why would Yinsen do this?
I remember you telling me about him before.
You said he changed your life.
He did. He didn't just save my life that day, he saved my soul, as well .
The way I live my life now, I owe that all to him.
The world
needs you, Tony.
Use all of your wealth and knowledge to finish what we've started. It is your destiny.
You see, Yinsen hated violence as a means to an end.
So it's inconceivable that he would join the Zodiac. It makes no sense.
It's best not to dwell on that now. we need to figure out a way to escape.
Right. we need to get back to the Station. I have spare reactors there.
Is that...
Yeah, but it's worthless.
No reception, huh?
But we've got more than just your cell phone here.
Look at all this material we can use.
How resourceful Tethering my cell phone to connect to the Internet, huh?
Yeah, we should be able to connect with the outside world now.
The word, "Impossible " only exists in the dictionary for fools .
We've blocked all wireless signals within a 10 km radius of the island.
Call me when you figure out how to fix that.
Hold on!
Tell me, Yinsen!
what exactly happened to you? why?
I don't think you have time for small talk . your time is precious, make the best of it.
Tony Stark.
You're brilliant when it comes to dealing with any type of situation.
But that will get you to see things as they really are.
Uncover the real you and realize that you are destined to create weaponry.
Just as altering genes can change people physically,
I'll tap into the core of your psyche, Stark.
You'll be back to your old self in no time.
All I have to do is show you something that'll trigger the process.
Mr. Stark, you should rest.
Let's keep going. I'm done for either way.
we have to do whatever it takes to get off this island.
Dr. Yinsen, give me an update.
Everything's going fine. I'm reviewing all the data right now.
I'll send my analsis as soon as I'm done.
What about Stark?
Let's just say that he's running out of time.
All we need now is a bottle of champagne for the launch.
well, Doc, we did it!
Let's get the hell out of here.
It's best you lie down.
I feel weak. I'm sorry.
without my reactor, I feel worthless.
well, that just isn't true. Not based on what I've seen.
In spite of being weakened, you've kept seeking out solutions.
That's very impressive. I really mean it.
Even more so than when you're successful in everything.
Then I should try to get beaten up more often, shouldn't I?
But that can wait.
So what's next?
I saw a yacht hidden in that cove over there.
It's probably Yinsen's. And that's our ticket home.
But what if we get attacked like last time?
Unless we have a weapon...
Yeah, but I wouldn't create a weapon.
why not?
I have to show Yinsen that I'm not the same man he once knew.
Nanami, wake up!
Nanami!
Look at you two!
Pull your self together!
we have a guest!
So not just Mr. Stark?
Dr. Tanaka, too?
That's right. Lab 23 has reported that she's missing.
I'd like for you to tell me everything you saw that night.
There was an incident reported this morning about radio interference activity coming from a ship.
Right here. And this is the pier where Mr. Stark's car was found.
Now, do you remember which direction the boat you saw was heading?
well ...
Maybe this might help ?
what is that?
I have no idea, but this thing fell on us when we were following Mr. Stark's car.
Great job!
You were ready for those Kodak moments!
You finally earned my respect!
Thanks, Nanami.
where did he...
He's taking too long this time. what's he up to?
Scorpio, fire on Stark.
what the hell has he done?
It's a hologram!
Our cover's blown. Keep running!
He's had his chance. End this.
Once you're cornered, the old you will come back to us again.
Look at your ankle . Can you walk ?
Mr. Stark, there isn't much time before he catches up to us. Go without me.
The world really needs you!
You have to survive.
So please go!
I can't. I need to fulfill my dream.
Your dream?
Yes, to live in a world at peace.
A world without violence. That's my dream.
I need your help in order to make that world a reality.
You should be safe here.
Not nearly as sorry as I am.
Because of me, you're being chased by that giant scorpion.
No, that's not true.
Because of you, I now have a dream.
well, that's a first. I never heard you talk about your self before.
And I'd love to hear more, but...
Damn Mech!
This could work.
Hey, sweet cheeks!
The real Tony Stark!
That's it!
Kill your enemy!
Immerse your self in blood,
Stark, so you can revert back into the warmonger you once were!
It's about time we start seeing the real Tony Stark!
Go on, obliterate the enemy!
Blast him to hell !
Don't worry. This was all just a test.
That was quite impressive, jamming the signal against us.
You're definitely not the Tony Stark I once knew.
Next time will be different.
Boy, do I owe you one.
No, on the contrary, I owe you one.
I think we're even.
Captain Sakurai!
So it was you?
If you want to thank someone, you should talk to that reporter that's always chasing you.
Nanami?
I can see it. Look!
It 's our rescue ship!
Tell them to turn around.
I think I'd rather spend a little more time with you.
I've never seen such a beautiful sunset.
It seems so pure because there's no one on this contaminated island.
You know, I wish the whole world could see this one sunset.
That would be another dream of yours?
When you have a bad feeling about something, you hope that it won't come true.
I couldn't believe that Tony Stark got kidnapped!
I've got to find out what happened to him exactly .
Dr. Tanaka was with him.
I must get this interview!
Wait. Who's that little girl standing next to him?
Next time on Iron Man: Daughterof the Zodiac.
Next Episode: #8: Daughterof the Zodiac
Oh, my, is she his secret daughter?
This could be a huge scoop!
The Western and Atlantic Flyer speeding into Marrietta, Ga., in the Spring 1861.
There were two loves in his live.
His engine,
And--
"Fort Sumter has been fired upon."
"Then the war is here."
"Yes, dad, and I'm going to be one of the first to enlist."
"Aren't you going to enlist?"
"Your name?"
"Johnnie Gray."
"Occupation?"
"Engineer on the Western and Atlantic Railroad."
"Don't enlist him.
He is more valuable to the South as an engineer."
"We can't use you."
"William Brown."
"Bartender."
"If you lose this war don't blame me."
"Did Johnnie enlist?"
"He didn't even get in line."
"He's a disgrace to the South.
"Why didn't you enlist?"
"They wouldn't take me."
"Please don't lie.
I don't want you to speak to me again until you are in uniform.
A year later.
In a Union encampment just North of Chattanooga.
General Thatcher, and his chief spy, Captain Anderson.
"I Know every foot of this railroad from Marietta to Chattanooga, and with ten picked men I cannot fail."
"We will enter the South as civilians coming from the neutral state of Kentucky to join the southern cause."
"At Big Shanty we will steal the train while the passengers and the crew are at dinner, and proceeding North we will burn every bridge, cutting off the supplies of the army now facing you."
"Then the day you steal the train I will have General Parker advance to meet you."
"As soon as I arrive I will let you know how seriously father is wounded."
"Big Shanty.
Twenty minutes for dinner."
"Three men stole my General.
I think they are deserters."
"I'm afraid they have us greatly outnumbered."
The Southern army facing Chattanooga is ordered to retreat."
In the enemy's country, hopelessly lost, helplessly cold and horribly hungry.
"At Nine o'clock tomorrow morning our supply trains will meet and unite with General Parker's army at the Rock River bridge."
"Then the army, backed by our supply trains, will advance for a surprise attack on the rebels left flank."
"Once our trains and troops cross that bridge, nothing on the earth can stop us."
"This girl was in the baggage car when we stole the train, so I thought it best to hold her."
"We had better stay here until daybreak to see where we are."
"It was so brave of you to risk your life, coming into the enemy's country, just to save me."
After a nice, quiet, refreshing night's rest.
"We've got to get back to our lines somehow and warn them of this coming attack."
"I will get that spy before he reaches the Southern lines.
You follow with the supply trains as planned."
"We must pick up more firewood."
The Rock River bridge.
The Northern division nearing the bridge to meet the supply trains.
"That bridge is not burned enough to stop you, and my men will ford the river."
Heroes of the day.
"Is that your uniform?"
"I had to wear it to get through the lines."
"Take it off!"
"Enlist the lieutenant."
"Soldier."
When acclaiming our modern heroes, let's not forget The News Reel Cameraman... the daredevil who defies death to give us pictures of the world's happenings.
And there are other types of photographers.
Take your tintype, Mister?
They make fine ash-trays!
I make them look just like you, Miss.
Do you know who that is?
Maybe it's Lydia Pinkham.
What are you doin'... giving' me a sleigh-ride?
No charge. It's a present.
I'd like to have you sit for another portrait when you get off.
I wont' be through for three hours.
I'm a photographer. Could I get a job here?
Get a job here... with that cocktail shaker?
You'll have to buy your own camera before they'll give you a trial here.
Don't close up! I'll be right back!
None of your business! I'm waiting to see the boss!
Well, I'm the boss!
Well, make me an offer.
The Grand Central Warehouse is on fire!
You ought to go photograph the fire, too.
They'll buy any good film so photograph anyting that's interesting.
It's your chance to break in!
I'll bust in all right! Watch me!
Up there there's a fire down here, the said..
In which house?
No! It's not in a which house. It's in a warehouse!
Now, where is it?
Where's the which house?
I mean, which's the warehouse?
Which warehouse, where?
Within an hour he was photographing everything from soup to nuts.
Mosty the nuts.
Aren't the Yankees playing today?
Sure in St. Louis!
Don't be discouraged.
No one would ever amount to anything if he didn't try.
You must always grind forward, never backward.
I'll make good next time!
Tomorrow's Sunday.
Maybe you'll let me take you for a nice long walk.
I'm sorry, I have a sort of date.
But give me your phone number I may call you.
I'll be waiting.
From the peek of dawn on Sunday morning.
My date's off, and-
I'm sorry if I'm a little late.
This is the young man who is to take Sally walking.
This is my dressing room!
Shut up or it'll be your coffin!
Will you keep out of my undershirt?
Hey! What is this, a suit or a bib?
The Big Sea Lion!
I'll show you some real fancy diving!
Let's get out of here and go walking on the beach.
Help! I've been robbed
Hello, Sally! Come on, I'll drive you home.
But we couldn't have him in here with us.
There's never room for three.
I'm a little damp so I'll go home..
I'm sorry you got so wet.
It was worth it to be near you.
Where do you live and where do you work?
Did you ever find that flame you were looking for?
Oh, she's so beautiful!
I'll try your reflexes to see if you're goofy.
Monday morning.
There'll be nothin' for you! Beat it!
Randall talking.
This Chinese celebration may be interesting.
Send a man down.
Chinatown is celebrating a holiday.
It may be worth taking. Go on down.
I'll make good this time, Sally.
Now, see! You kill-a de monk!
Pay jim for that baboon or I'll run you in!
It's yours. You bought it.
Get it out of the way!
If the Wung Fa Tong stars anything you know what to do!
I took the whole blamed war!
I got some great pictures of that Tong War all right.
Pretty short war!
I guess I forgot to put film in the camera.
Say, how did you get wise to that Tong War?
Miss Sally told me.
Did you give him the tip, young lady?
It's all your fault that this fool has been hanging around here!
Don't leave me because of me.
I'll never bother any of your again.
Tueasday morning.ý The Westport Yacht Club Regatta
Did you change this film box in Chinatown?
Look out you don't get thrown out when I make this turn.
You're awfully brave to have saved me.
What else could a fellow do?
Wednesday morning.
That little cameraman left this film here.
He said you can have it for nothing.
It's the Tong War!
That's the best camera work I've seen in years!
Get that man here quick!
I'll never be able to thank you enough.
Everybody talking about you!
They're all waiting to give you a great reception!
THE CIRCUS
"So you missed the hoop again."
"Father, I couldn't help it."
"For that you don't eat tonight."
"And you're supposed to be funny!"
"Look at that house; empty!"
Around the Side Shows hungry and broke.
"Here you are, sir."
"Count it."
"Is it all there?"
"Say, gimme that money!"
"How d'you get out of here?"
"Rotten!"
"Get off!"
"Where's the funny man?"
"Bring on the funny man!"
The Funny Man.
Meal-time after the Show.
"Father won't let me."
"Do you want a job?"
"Be here in the morning, and we'll try you out."
Early the next morning.
"Run along home!"
"I live here."
"Excuse me, my cane."
The Tryout.
"Go ahead and be funny."
"That's awful!"
"Put on the William Tell act."
"Now then, watch this and see if you can do it."
"Go ahead and try it."
"Put on the barber-shop act."
"Now I must hit you."
"Now hit me!"
"I can't see."
"Just a moment!"
"We haven't talked terms yet."
"Get out and stay out!"
"Show's starting!"
"Aren't you coming in?"
"You're not leaving?"
"You see, we couldn't come to terms."
"Thank you for the egg."
The Show on.
Trouble with the Property Men.
"How about our back pay?"
"Get to work!"
"We quit!"
"They've quit."
"Get anybody!"
"Don't touch that button!"
"He's a sensation, but he doesn't know it."
"Keep him on as a property man."
The Circus prospered, but not the property man.
And the girl led the same hard life.
"Keep him busy and don't let him know he's the hit of the show."
A Sick Horse.
"Blow this pill down the horse's neck!"
"The horse blew first --"
"Open the door, quick!"
"I told you the lions were dangerous!"
"Where's that pill?"
"Come here!"
"I've got to see a doctor!"
"It's a shame the way they make you work --" "And you the hit of the show."
"Why of course!"
"All the crowds, all the applause is just for you."
"I knew it!"
"If you strike that girl, I'll quit!"
"And what's more I want what I'm worth --"
"I'll give you fifty dollars a week."
"Sixty!"
"I'll double it!"
"Nothing less than a hundred."
The Next Show.
The success of the Tramp made life easier for the girl and himself.
"Oh, Merna, you must have your fortune told!"
"I see love and marriage with a dark, handsome man who is near you now."
A New Added Attraction, Rex, a tight-rope walker.
"Pardon me."
"Go right ahead."
"I'll give you Five Dollars for it."
"It's happened; I'm in love!"
"He's a tight-rope walker."
"Hurry up, you're on!"
The Act Over.
"What's the matter?" "You hardly got a laugh!"
"This is my friend."
"I don't like tight-rope walkers."
Time brought many changes to the Circus; New Hopes and New Ambitions.
His New Ambition.
"Never mind the rope." "You'd better try and be funny again or you'll go!"
The next performance- and not a smile.
"I've had enough of this;" "You get one more chance."
"Where's Rex?"
"Rex, the tight-rope walker, hasn't shown up."
"Is Rex here?"
"You can do the act, can't you?"
"You'll do it or quit!"
"I'll do it; find his clothes!"
"There's the clothes!"
"You follow her!"
"He'll kill himself."
"That's all right;" "I've got him insured."
"Take your time, there's another act to go on."
"Why, what is the meaning of this?"
"I am taking his place on the rope."
"You'll get killed."
"Oh, no, I have a charmed life."
"I'll give you five dollars if you'll do it."
"Not a word to anybody."
"Please don't do this."
"You've forgotten your tights."
"You're on!"
"You're through!"
That Night.
"I've run away from the circus."
"I'll never go back."
"Can't you take me with you?"
"I've got an idea."
"You stay here."
"Have you seen Merna?"
"She's run away --"
"I can do nothing for her -- --"
"Now, there's one way out."
"She's there now?"
"Take me to her!"
The Next Morning.
The Circus ready to leave.
"So you've come back -
- You -- !"
"You're speaking to my wife!"
"Will you go on with the show?"
"-- -- if you take him."
"The end wagon for you."
"Come in with us."
- Nice day' isn't it?
- Yes, isn't it!
It's swell.
It's perfect.
- Just like you.
- Ah' shut up!
You know' it's a lucky thing I didn't go out on my yacht today.
- I wouldn't have met you.
- Have you a yacht?
Have I? A regular floating palace!
You know' I had to put straps on it for people to hang on to...
I have so many friends.
I never heard of straps on a yacht.
Well, ya see, I got the idea... when I was going to work every morning... on the subway to Wall Street.
Are you in Wall Street?
Am I!
Say, I've got 80 acres right in the center of the financial district.
Why, if it was out in California, I'd subdivide it... and I'd buy you the whole world.
- My name's Jim. What's yours?
- I'll bet it's Mary Smith.
- I'll bet it isn't.
Well, Mary... you found your little lamb.
Now I'm gonna follow you wherever you go.
Gee, we're alone!
And our day is almost over.
Oh, it isn't over.
It's just beginning.
- For I'm going to make you a promise.
- Promise what?
That we'll never be lonesome anymore.
If I had known when I first saw you... that you were only a telephone operator instead of a swell...
I'd have proposed to you right on the spot.
And if I had known that you were just a punch presser...
I... I would have accepted.
Gee, it's funny how lonesome a fella can be... especially with a million people around him.
You know, you just can't be happy in a hotel room... especially when all your friends... have homes and kiddies.
All my life I've wanted a little white house... out in the country, with blue shingles.
I don't like blue shingles.
But you like the white house.
And I'd paint the shingles any color you like.
- Lavender?
Or pink?
Oh, Mary, I'd rather have them blue.
Then they'd be just the color of your eyes.
Of course, you could have them black, or brown, or green, or... any color you like, just so long as you're there.
Gee, that's a pretty name!
- But Sergeant, I —
- Calm yourself, baby!
I'll get to you in a moment.
Now tell me where you found him.
A jane was hurt down at the roller coaster.
This monkey tried to run over me about it!
- Disturbing the peace, eh, kiddo?
- Oh, listen to me, Sergeant.
That's what I was trying to tell this man:
that it was my girl that was hurt.
I was trying to get to her to help her.
So it was your girl that was hurt, eh?
What is her name?
- Mary, sir.
- Mary what?
You see, we only met today.
- Picked her up, eh?
- Oh, no, sir.
You wouldn't say that if you saw her.
She's not that kind of a girl.
She's a good kid, a sweet kid.
That ain't much of a description.
You're officially charged... with picking up girls and resisting arrest.
- Take him away.
- I wish I could make you realize, sir... that you've got to let me go.
I don't know that girl's name, but I love her.
And if I don't get to her, I'll lose her.
And I'm gonna marry her... if she'll have me.
Isn't that thrilling!
- Do go on!
- Yes, I'll go on... and I'll tell you what I think of you.
You don't know when a man's sincere and when he's not.
What a great policeman you are!
You're so used to dealing with lousy, rotten people... you're rotten yourself!
Run along to your little Mary, sonny.
I hope you find her.
Do you — do you mean it?
Sure I mean it.
Don't mind me. I'm just playful today.
Now run along.
As for you, you big ham, you go jump in the lake!
Hey, you go jump in the lake!
I'll be loving you always
With a love that's true always
When the things you've planned need a helping hand
I will understand always
Always Days may not be fair always
That's when I'll be there always
Not for just an hour
Not for just a day
Not for just a year but always
Lonesome me
Poor little lonesome me
So near and yet so far
From happiness
How I pray
We'll meet again someday
To love and laugh
Well, we finished earlier than Ike and I expected.
- Are you going anywhere?
- No, I don't think so.
So the next time, I changed to another tailor, but found out that he was no better than the first.
I bought some pretty expensive cloth and took it to him and you should've seen the mess he made of it
I told him I wouldn't pay for the thing, but the trouble is, he's got my material.
Well, I left the suit with him and it's been there ever since.
- Good evening Miss White. And how are you?
- I'm all right, thanks.
- I haven't seen you for a long time.
Have you come to take Frank for a walk.
Yes - That's right. - Well, I must push along.
- Good-night.
- Good-night Frank.
- Well dear.
- I've been waiting here half an hour for you.
- Good-night Sean.
Good-night George.
- Sorry sir. Full up. You'll have more room upstairs.
I think I told you, there's more room upstairs!
Sorry Sir. Full up here. There's more room up...
HEY!
Frank. I've lost one of my gloves. I think I left it at the other table.
- Yes, thanks.
Thought so, there's a hole in two fingers.
Would you like a pair of nail scissors for Christmas?
- Funny, aren't you?
- Oh Miss, Miss!
It's no good being impatient, you'll have to wait your turn.
What's the matter with you today?
Got out of bed the wrong side?
-I don't like waiting about for you.
Oh, don't you? ... Oh, Miss...
Do you expect the entire machinary of Scotland Yard to be held up to please you?
You and your Scotland Yard If it weren't for Edgar Wallace nobody'd ever heard of it.
Funny, aren't you?
Anyway, what's the hurry? We're only going to the pictures, we've got all evening.
- Well, I don't think I want to go to the pictures.
- Oh, and why not?
-I've seen everything worth seeing.
- You haven't seen "Fingerprints". I'd like to see that.
Still it's about Scotland Yard ... might be amusing. They're bound to get all the details wrong.
I don't see why. I did hear they'd got a real criminal to direct it.
- So as to be on the safe side. - Oh, oh Miss!
Oh, blast...
Well, I've ordered.
- I'll go to the pictures with you, if you like.
- uh, changed your mind.
Have you got an ashtray Miss?
I never seem to get an ashtray where I sit.
Frank, Frank. I've changed my mind again.
- About going to the pictures.
- You mean you don't want to go again? - No, not particularly.
- I don't know , I just don't want to.
- Isn't that enough?
- No, it's not enough ... oy, Miss!
- I'm going to get the bill.
I'm about fed up with you. lf you don't want to go, I do.
- Oh all right, I'll come too.
- oy, Miss!
Oh, don't let's have a row. I'm sorry. I know I've been rather beastly today.
- Miss!
- Frank, I've said I'm sorry.
Here, that will cover it.
Hold on. I live here.
Then you needn't come any further.
Oh, no now I said that I'd see you home, and I will.
But I'm only just around the corner. Do you know Whites? The newsagent?
- Yes? In the Kings road? Yes.
- That's my father.
No! Yes.
Now isn't that fine?
Then we're neighbors.
- Have you ever seen an artist's studio?
- No, I'd love to.
- Come up and see mine. - Oh, I can't now.
Another time.
- Why not now?
- Why, it's so late.
- Are you frightened?
Then why not now?
No, really. Thanks awfully. I must be getting home.
- You are frightened.
- I'm certainly not ... take more'n a man to frighten me.
Yes...that's what I thought....at first.
- What is the time?
- Not very late.
- Come on. What's the harm.
Oh, no harm really. Besides, I always think a girl knows instinctively when she can trust a man.
Yes, of course she does. Do you trust me?
- Alice?
May I call you Alice?
- If you like.
- Oh Mr. Crewe. Before you go in, could I...?
- Excuse me, miss.
That chap's nothing but a sponger. Always pestering people up and down this street.
Well, here we are.
I'm right up there. Top! Excuse me a minute, will you?
I say, I'm awfully sorry. I won't be a minute. You start walking up.
That's all right.
Oh good evening. Sorry to disturb you. About this note, did he leave any message?
No, he wouldn't leave any message.
-Have you seen him before.
- Yes, the same gent what called here several times.
Thanks very much.
Bit of a climb, wasn't it?
What a lovely room. Did you do it all yourself?
Hardly. I say, do you feel cold?
I think I'll light the fire.
- I say. That's good, isn't it? - Oh that?
Yes, that's a new one, just finished.
- How do you hold this?
Oh, that.
That's easy. I'll show you.
Oh Lord, not like that. Let me show you.
You take this and hold it like that, you see...
Then you get the brush and hold it there.
You try.
- Oh, look what I've done.
- Ooo, yes
- Draw something Alice.
- Shall I?
Rotten.
Never mind. We'll finish this masterpiece together.
Now you hold the brush. Steady.
There we are.
You are awful.
There. Already a pick ahead of me.
I'll go and get those drinks....
Right you are.
I say, how would I do for one of your models?
That's an idea.
- Let's see it on you.
- Do you mean, put it on?
Yes, why not?
- Oh, it's so strong!
Oh no, I don't think so. Besides I have to go home soon.
Pity. I would have like to have sketched you in it.
- Would you have really?
- Yes, but perhaps you are right.
I bet it would.
- Shall I really try it on?
- All right.
- Think this will be big enough for me.
- What? - I said, do you think this will be big enough for me.
- Go on, play something.
- Wait a minute, how does that thing go?
I know.
And that's a song about you my dear.
You haven't said how you like it.
- I can't do it up. -Wait a minute... where is this trouble?
- I can't do it all up. - Never mind.
- Wait a minute, it isn't quite right.
Put your hands there.
- I better go.
- I say.
- Please give it to me.
- All right, come on out.
Don't be silly Alice. Don't be silly.
No, no, let me go!
No, no.... loud scream!
- Mr. Crewe! - Mr. Who? - No!
It's only b... - All right. Don't you worry.
... seven or eleven?
- 31.
- 31, I said.
- No, no, 31.
- Ah good. Just take a look around, will you?
- Right you are sir.
- Alice, wake up. Anyone'd think you hadn't been asleep all night.
What do you think! ? There's been a murder last night, round the corner.
They tell me the police are round there now.
We'll all be murdered in our beds, soon, I'm sure we will ... 'cause I don't think the police are what they were.
...morning, Alice. 'eard about the murder?
- Yes, I heard.
- Do you remember Frank's telephone number dear?
- No, but here, you'll find it in the book.
- I mean, some murders are so different to others aren't they?
- ... pushed his lady friends under the water when they was having a bath
What was his name... you remember...
I think that was ever so beastly pure gave me the shivers
...after I read about it, I didn't dare 'ave a bath for a month.
... an' for weeks after that I only used to 'ave a rinse down. What was his name?
... you remember, Smith, wasn't it?
What's wrong Alice? You don't look very cheerful this morning.
-You do look a little bit peeky, I must say.
- Dad, Alice, breakfast. Good-morning, Mr. White.
I couldn't look bak'n in the face after what happened last night ... and under our very noses.
Mind you, I don't think, meself, it's all together the police's fault.
What I mean is, they 'ave to wink at some things. I mean it's one thing to buy chocolates out of hours, but it's quite another to stick a knife into a gentleman.
I must say I feel the same way about that too.
A good, clean, honest whack over the 'ead with a brick is one thing.... ...something British about that. But knives? ... No. ...
Now, mind you a knife is a difficult thing to handle.
I mean any knife (mumble, mumble) knife ... (mumble,mumble) ... knife ...
(mumble, mumble) a butcher's knife... - Alice, cut us a bit of bread, will you?
I mean, in Chelsea you mustn't use a ... KNIFE!
- Dear, you ought to be more careful. You might have cut somebody with that.
Customer.....
- No news of the murder yet?
Good-morning.
- Well, I must be going. I can't stand here gossiping all day like some people.
Chatter, chatter, chatter.... give 'em a chance to talk about other people's business, and they'll take it.
- What's the matter Alice?
Had another row with Frank?
- Another customer Alice.
- Good morning, Alice.
- I say, have you 'eard about our murder?
- Yes, they put me on it.
- Did they?
That's good isn't it?
Well, I hope you get him Frank!
- If they do, that will mean promotion, won't it? - D'you reck'n you'll get him soon?
- Well, uh, I... I don't know.
-Well, I came in here to phone. - That's all right.
Come here a minute will you?
- Well I must be going now. Good-bye, Mrs. White, good-bye, Mr. White.
Now you two.
- Sssshhhh..... Be careful...
Why don't you tell me?
Look ... you know where I found that?
It's the only piece of evidence that you were there. I'm keeping it back at present.
For God's sake, say something!
- If you're not using the phone...uh, may I?
I ... uh... I want to get on to Scotland Yard.
- I say.
- I want the best cigar in the shop.
Certainly sir. Perhaps you'd like to telephone while I get it down?
- No thanks, that can wait.
- What does he mean?
- Very well sir. Now...uh, what sort of a cigar would you like sir?
I' ve got 'enry Clay or Corona, Corona?
- Corona.
- Any news of the murder.
- No, nothing yet.
- Have you heard anything?
- No, no news.
- Are you ... uh ... quite sure?
- What the hell business is it of yours, anyway?
- You know, I looked everywhere for that other glove last night.
But, of course, you detectives are better trained at finding these things.
- Ah, here we are sir.
- Excuse me, will you?
Thank you. ... Oh, they look good.
- They ought to. I've had ' em for years.
Is it ... all right sir?
- Yes, I thought the top was broken, but it's all right.
- Have you a light?
- Yes, here you are.
- How silly of me, hadn't noticed it.
- Uh ... all right sir?
- Oh, ha...of course ... sorry.
Extraordinary actually........
I say......would you pay for this?
Is this gentleman a friend of yours, Frank?
Well, we're not exactly friends. At least ... not yet.
But we're going to do a little business together, aren't we, Frank?
I'll look after the shop, Father. You go and finish your paper.
Oh....all right my dear, all right.
Rather unfortunate that poor man died around the corner last night.
Look here you....
Perhaps it's rather fortunate, that your little secret only came into the hands of a man like me.
D'you know, there are some men who would make money out of a thing like that.
What a chance for blackmail. Oh, oh that's awful.
I couldn't do a thing like that.
Morning, Miss. Two of each there.
By the way. You're a detective. Let me give you a tip.
Don't wave important clues in telephone boxes. They've got glass doors.
You know ... uh... detectives in glass houses shouldn't wave clues.
Come on, out with it. What do you want?
What do I want?
Oooooh, well ... uh ...
Couldn't we discuss that over breakfast?
Mother this is a friend of Frank's. Mr. ...?
- Tracy.
- Pleased to meet you.
- Mr. Tracy, would you like something to eat?
- Thank-you.
- Lovely weather, we're having.
- Yes, splendid.
- Who did you say that man was?
- He's a very important friend of Frank's.
I'll get the breakfast for him.
- Here! Aren't we rude? Won't you take my chair?
- Oh, thanks.
- Did you see, or hear anything during the night?
- What time did you go to bed?
- About half past ten, sir.
- Did you write this?
- How old would you say this man was.
- I'm afraid I couldn't tell you, sir, he had his hat on.
- Did you notice anything particular about his clothes?
- Well, ah ... he had a black hat and a loose kind of collar... 'nd a tie ... and that's about all, I think.
- Was he dark or fair?
- Well, you couldn't say he was a blond and you couldn't say he was a brunette. He was a bit of both, you know, kind of mousey.
- Except when he spoke to you, he went like this.
- All right. Give me records.
- Well, bring him along.
Let's hear what he's got to say. - Understood?
- Right, get along with it..
- That'll do to go on with.
- How much longer is that man going to stay?
Don't tell me he'll be here to dinner.
- Don't make things awkward mother. It means a lot to to me and Frank.
- Well, I don't see why they should carry on their business in my parlour.
- But I don't like that man ... and the sooner he goes the better.
..., you are very clever. I can see that all right.
- Frank?
Just a minute will you?
A pal of yours at the Yard, said he thought you might be here.
- Oh, all right.
Well, I thought you wouldn't mind if ...
Who?
- Any news Frank?
- Alice ...
lock that door.
As you were saying ... rather unfortunate the way that poor man round the corner... uh... died last night.
On the other hand, perhaps it's fortunate.
For us, that is... that a suspicious looking man, with a criminal record, was seen hanging around the place.
- You....
Look here, don't you try and swing this thing on me. That won't get you anywhere.
- Also rather unfortunate, that Scotland Yard, are at present looking for that man.
- I say, Frank!
- Just a minute Alice.
- But there's one thing you seem to have forgotten....
- Oh, and what's that?
- Before we get to any hanging, I shall have quite a lot to say.
And the first thing I shall say is, that she was there too.
- Oh, you will, will you?
Isn't there one thing you seem to have forgotten, that our word's as good as, or perhaps a bit better than that of a jailbird.
So we'll face that when the time comes.
Meanwhile, we'll just sit quietly here until the squad van arrives.
- That surprises you doesn't it?
- No, it doesn't surprise me in the least.
When it comes, the surprise won't be for me.
- Very well then, we are both satisfied.
- Yes, we're both satisfied.
It's my word, against hers.
- Frank, you can't do this.
- Why not?
- Well, because...
- Now, now, don't interfere, Alice, I know what I'm doing.
You don't, you don't.
- Please Frank.
- Oh, for God's sake, be quiet Alice.
- Why can't you let her speak.
- You mind your own business.
In any case, she'll speak at the right moment.
- Look here Frank. Why can't we, both of us, chuck the whole thing now?
I've got nothing against you. You've got nothing against me.
Except, of course, I ... I had some cash from you, but ... I wasn't serious.
Well, look here, have it back now.
Well can't you see, that she wants to chuck it up too? And so do I, you know.
Look here, Miss. You tell him.
Tell him that he's playing with fire ... and ...
And we shall, all of us, burn our fingers.
I'm not bad really ...
I... only, things have gone wrong lately, and one's got to live, you know.
All right then. It's still my word against hers.
[bell rings]
Oy!
You men meet me in the back, Frank, follow me!
I say, it's not me you want..... It's him.....ask him.
Why his own....
Not very often I see you so early in the day as this.
- Called to see Frank? - No.
No, I want to see lnspector Walls, please.
-Then you'll have to fill out one of these forms, you know. - All right.
- Do you know something about this?
- Yes.
George, just a minute.
Take this along to inspector Walls.
Well I suppose you're going to tell him who did it, Miss.
- You can come along now - Here you are, Miss.
- Come in, please.
Won't you sit down?
You've something to tell us about this case.
- Well, what is it?
Well, you see. I know who did it.
Is this worthwhile sir, now that everything has been cleared up?
Let's hear what she's got to say.
What I was going to say is this...
I'd better say, what I have to say now...
I would rather not wait ...
What I wanted to say is ...
- I was the one ...
- One moment please.
Hello. Yes, yes ...
Yes, hold on ...
Will you deal with this young lady,
I shall be busy for a minute.
This way Miss, please.
Alice, whatever made you come here?
- You don't know.
He tried ... oh, I can't tell you.
It's too terrible. I was defending myself.
I didn't know what I was doing and then...
- Ha, ha! So you found him, Miss. Did she tell you who did it.
You'll want to look out, or you'll be losing your job my boy.
I suppose we'll soon have lady detectives up in the Yard, eh.
And I shall be all right on the dole, won't I.
Is this a carjacking?
- Are you carjacking me?
- I'm the devil.
Before you were born, your mom and I sold your soul to the devil.
- You gonna tell Andi?
- I'm not gonna tell Andi!
If she knows, she'll never go out with me.
You could make her go out with you, Damien.
You're just gonna bring escaped souls back to hell. That's cool, right?
- How am I supposed to capture 'em?
- This will help... a vessel, hand-crafted in the bowels of perdition by the iniquitous and the vile.
- That'll work. - A word of caution...
I don't accept failure.
You finally found the one thing that you're good at.
You sent an escaped soul back to hell.
- Come on, come on.
Those are huge on you.
- All right, feel that?
- Nope, not a thing.
This is gonna work great.
- All right! Now run, rabbit.
- All right, wait, give me a head start.
Steady...
Oh, Sock!
- Below the waist!
Say... let's try again. Here, here.
This 2 pants thing doesn't work!
Let's try again here.
Sock, you're makin'me mad!
Oh, my god, mom!
- You're back!
- Hi, sweetheart!
Oh, ribs, sweetie! Ribs, ribs.
Oh, sorry. How was Vegas?
Mom, did you see me shoot Ben in the butt?
I did. Good shootin', Bert.
- Very good shot. - Hey, Ms. Wysocki.
Um, mom...
Who's the, uh, cowboy?
Um, Bert, there's something I have to tell you.
Uh, this is Morris.
And we have some wonderful news.
Will you stop checking the time?
Am I that boring?
No, I told you I have to leave in 10 minutes.
I'm gonna be super late. And it's definitely not boring.
I'll tell you when 10 minutes is up.
Hey, what?
Oh, my gosh, this is beautiful!
You were gonna give it to me as a present? That is so sweet!
Yeah, you... you like it?
I love it. It's perfect.
Oh! Thank you, thank you, thank you!
- Sock, what are you doing?
I need you to get rid of this, OK?
Sock, are you all right?
My mom came home from Vegas today.
You shot your mom with a BB gun?
No, Sam, of course not.
I might have shot an Asian cowboy, though.
Yeah. And I think I punched him in the eye.
I don't know. It's all a big blur.
- Will you rub my head?
Thank you. That feels good.
Sock, what the hell is going on?
My mom get married.
And now I have nobody, except for you two.
Would somebody get me a six pack?
It's what my mom would have done.
Oh, hey, you're up.
Sock, why is my alarm clock going off at 4:30 in the morning?
Yeah, I couldn't sleep, either.
But, um, since we're both awake, do you want to talk?
Do we have to do this now?
Can you believe she married a guy named Morris?
Morris, Sam.
I mean, I don't even think he's a real cowboy.
You know, I mean, how long has she even known this guy, a week?
Now she's going to shack up with a total stranger.
Yeah, good idea, mom.
She's absolutely going to regret this.
Oh, blue tie. Definitely better than the red.
Sometimes, if you love somebody enough, you have got to let them hit rock bottom.
Even though I might want to kick Morris' ass to the curb right now,
I'm gonna stand strong, and I'm gonna be firm.
You know, my mom and I are a team, and teammates do not go out and get married behind each other's backs.
That's one thing I know.
So I'm gonna take the one thing away from her she loves the most... me.
I'm not gonna move back in until she admits she made a mistake.
I can't work. I'm too upset.
Sock, come on, it'll be good for you. It'll take your mind off of things.
OK, but I need a push.
Sam, I am a wall of misery, all right?
You're gonna have to do a little better than that. Let's go.
Sock? !
Oh, my god, Sock, are you OK?
Hey, did you just fly in here?
Sam moved me with his mind.
The devil must be screwing with me.
What do you think it means?
It might have something to do with the soul.
That... was wicked.
Let's do it again. Ben, help me with the tree.
Sam, get back over there.
Hey, do you know where Sock is?
I need him to fake a seizure for me.
That is an unusual request.
Yeah, well, Ted saw Sock fall into the Christmas tree.
He's terrified of a workman's comp lawsuit.
Terrified Ted is always a good time.
- Sock's in house wares.
- Great, thank you.
There's something about the sea air.
Maybe it's because all of life came from the sea.
It's primordial. Clean, fresh.
And almost entirely covers up the stench of that decomposing corpse down there.
- A vagrant, I think.
No one of consequence.
Where's its head?
Removed, and partially eaten by one Phillip Carmona.
Hell's latest overachiever.
- Eaten?
In life, Carmona was a cannibal.
Had a predilection for eating the brains and the heart.
- So the soul ate its heart, too?
He got scared away.
Look, he always finishes his meals and he always eats at night.
Now you just follow the corpse, you'll find your soul.
Excuse me a moment.
You're gonna be sorry when I'm famous, Rachel.
Rachel, how can you date an accountant?
- Great titles, man.
They're about my ex.
Her name was Rachel.
Not a nice girl, I take it.
She left me for following my dream, the dream of rock and roll.
You're probably drinking a lot more than usual.
You gotta numb the pain, bro.
Jerry Belvedere.
AR for popblast records.
Ryan Milner. My stage name's Ryan.
- No last name.
You know, Ryan, I bet you and I can make a deal that'll be extremely beneficial to the both of us.
Mr. Belvedere, can I talk to you for a second?
What does it look like?
You're setting that guy up so you can buy his soul.
Come on, just leave him alone. He's pathetic enough as it is!
Oh, wow, Sammy, maybe you're right.
If I'm hearing you correctly, you're basically calling me a morally bankrupt, evil being.
Yes, more or less.
Then this makes perfect sense.
Hey, uh, I gotta get going.
Wait, wait, wait, is that her?
Yeah, yeah, she's just... We're gonna hang out.
Oh, OK, well, bring her over here. What's the big deal?
I mean, we're friends, right?
So, why can't I meet your girlfriend?
I mean, unless you're trying to hide her from me.
- Why would I do that?
- Too late.
- Hi, cutie!
- Hi, I'm Cady.
Uh, Andi.
- Yeah, all good things.
- Oh, good to hear.
That's a nice necklace.
Oh, thank you. Sam got it for me.
Yeah, actually, he showed it to me... once.
Andi used to play soccer in high school, like you.
- You guys... did that...
- Well, enjoy your lunch.
And your necklace.
- No, she doesn't hate you.
- Come on, Sam, it's obvious.
Did you guys have a thing?
All right, this... this is my fault.
All right, the necklace you're wearing was actually one I had originally bought for her.
- Uh, a few weeks ago?
- And then you gave it to me?
Yeah, but to be fair, I didn't plan on giving it to you.
I... I just, I got caught when you found it and I made a rash decision. I...
So why did you keep it?
I... I don't have an answer.
That's weird, Sam.
- Cady...
- Don't follow me.
Next time I buy a present for a girl...
I need you to punch me in the junk. Hard.
- That's the only way I punch.
- Not now, Sock!
- Cady's mad at me,
Andi's all pissed off. I don't...
Will you listen to this guy?
Oh, wah, I have 2 chicks fighting over me!
Why am I so loveable?
Enjoy it, Sam.
Or at least, you know, try and flip it into a three-way.
- That's what I'd do.
- Hey, this guy Ryan's pretty lame.
This CD is for all the dreamers who dream of the rock and roll dream, so dream on.
I gotta... I gotta side with the devil on this one.
- Some people just belong in hell.
- No, I feel bad for him.
The devil's gonna sucker him into a deal and he'll be just as screwed as I am.
What can you do?
I mean, if the guy wants to sell his soul to the devil,
- it's not your problem.
- But I could at least warn him.
If somebody had stepped in before my parents sold my soul...
Devil says something about the soul eating after dark.
- Don't we have to get to the morgue?
- No, we have time. We can stop
- at the marina along the way.
- Then can we swing by my mom's house, too?
I kinda want to egg her bedroom window.
Well, this is where he was.
Maybe he's playing in another spot.
Yeah, but know where?
I mean, we can't look on every corner...
I think I know where he might be.
Looks like the devil got to him first.
Pike Arena?
That's huge.
Devil said follow the body.
Carmona only feeds at night.
Pretty good, right?
- Look it.
- Jose Miller. Not bad, yeah.
How'd you get Josie to give you her ID badge?
It's part of some memory trinkets I stole from her.
She took so much and gave back so little. So Jose Miller it is.
Well, as long as that thing gets us into the morgue,
- where the body is, who cares?
- It's almost 6:00.
We need to be ready when the soul comes back to feed.
Let's see what we're saddled with this time.
Nice. A spear gun. Very James Bond.
You say this job isn't cool.
Evening, lieu-tective.
Just gotta get these experts in for a dental match on a certain Jonathan Deere.
So he always finishes his meal?
Yeah, we gotta find the headless body.
Which one do you think it is?
It's gonna be this one.
Yeah, well, Carmona didn't come back for seconds.
Oh, uh, we're from, uh, downtown.
Downtown branch, and we're actually taking over the case.
It's a jurisdictional thing.
- Juris... jurisdictional.
- What case are you talking about?
Actually, that is a need to know.
We wish we could do something about it, but we can't.
It's just... whoa.
This ID is expired.
And the picture is pasted on.
- OK, but could I possibly have the ID back?
- No, I... keep it!
I thought you said that jurisdiction thing always works.
Why do you always have to point out my flaws, Ben?
So what do we do now?
We'll just stop the soul before he ever gets to the body.
There's only 2 ways in.
Let's seal up the doors so we know which way Carmona's coming.
OK, good one.
All right, come on, Carmona.
Whoa, sorry.
Oh! It's my mom.
Hurts, doesn't it?
All right, be cool. All right, be cool.
Look, it's him, it's the soul. It's him.
On three! 1, 2, 3!
It's locked, it's locked.
Boy, you spook easily. Huh.
- It's just rubber.
- So it was you, right?
Use your words, Sammy. What was me?
- You got Ryan a concert.
- Oh, wow, this came out pretty sharp.
Yeah. The umlaut was my idea.
- You made him sell you his soul?
- Not yet, but I will.
It's a classic "first taste is free" gambit.
Ryan gets his gig, tastes a little fame, and then while he's on that endorphin high,
I slap that contract right in front of him.
- Never fails.
- That really works?
We're talkin'about rock and roll, man.
The devil's music. Comin'down the crossroads.
Sell your soul for rock and roll, baby.
It's not funny. He's gonna spend eternity in hell!
Oh, you're right, you're right. It's never a laughing matter, Sammy.
But, hey, let's talk about you.
What's up with that cannibal of yours?
Why haven't you caught him?
- I don't know where he is.
- Talk to the mother.
- Carmona has a mom?
And you know moms.
- They love talkin'about their kids.
- Even when the kid's a people eater?
Well, it's just more to talk about.
Hi, Mrs. Carmona.
We were wondering if we could talk to you about your son.
Wait, wait, wait, you don't understand!
Why don't you vultures leave me alone!
But we're not vultures, Mrs. Carmona.
My son didn't do any of the things they said.
- He was a good boy.
- Oh, I'm sure he was.
He was our favorite camp counselor.
You knew him at Camp Soaring Arrow?
Yes, we did know him at Camp Soaring Arrow.
The memories are flooding in.
You know, toasting marshmallows and panty raids and learning how to use your...
- Archery.
- Bow and arrow.
You like my son?
Yeah, we thought your son was great.
- Would you boys like some pie?
Here's the picture of Phillip in the school play one Thanksgiving.
- He's the kid dressed in brown?
He played gravy.
Oh, here he is in the pee wee football.
And this is Phillip in his high school graduation.
Such a sweet boy.
- You and your son were close, huh?
- He was my best friend.
That's nice. That's how it's supposed to be.
Yeah, it's true. Yep, you're right.
So what was Phillip like away from camp?
Where did he like to go?
Was there any special place he liked to hang out?
- Or hide out, maybe.
- Well, not really.
Mostly he liked to hang out with me.
Sometimes right after the sun goes down, I imagine I see him, out there at the end of the driveway, or over in the backyard.
The other night,
I could have sworn I saw him sitting on the swing.
It seemed so real.
Bye bye, Mrs. C. Have a good day.
He just comes here to hang out with his mom.
Well, can you blame the guy?
I mean, that... that, my friends, is a real mom.
A beautiful, selfless, kind-hearted woman who built her entire life around her son.
Even though he was a crazy-assed convicted cannibal.
Gets me, right here.
Right... right here.
Is it... where's your heart?
OK, Ryan, sound check on mic.
- Tommy, how was that?
- Great, Ryan, let's take five.
All right. Thank you, gorgeous.
- Hey, from the record company, right? - You're friends with Jerry?
Yeah, yeah, that... that's me.
- Awesome.
Listen, Ryan, did you sign any contract or make any promises...
I can't believe it. Tomorrow night, every seat's gonna be filled.
Ryan!
Did you sign anything?
What... no, man.
I didn't get any paperwork yet.
But don't worry. When I do, I'll sign it. No questions.
No, no, I'm trying to tell you to not sign a contract with... with the record company.
- Dude, what are you talkin'about?
- This isn't what you think it is.
Did Jerry mention anything about what you might sacrifice for this deal?
But I'll do anything.
Jerry is the devil, and he's trying to get you to sell your soul, OK?
Get out of here, man, are you crazy?
How did you sell out this entire arena when nobody's even heard you before?
- they like my songs.
- How did they even hear your songs?
I mean, come on, doesn't it bother you that this all happened so easily?
He's the devil, and if you go through with this, you're gonna spend eternity in hell when you die.
- Who cares?
- Who car... are you insane?
Yesterday, I was nothing. My wife left me.
My friends thought I was a failure.
But today, I'm a rock star, man.
You got it?
I'm a rock star!
They were all wrong.
I'll worry about my soul when I'm dead.
I just wanted to see if this car had heated seats.
I always wanted to try heated seats.
- Please get out of my car.
- Fine, fine.
After the way you helped me out with Ryan, I owe you one, buddy.
How did I help you out?
Well, you remember when I told you that that first time is for free gambit never fails?
Usually the sticking point is when I reveal that I'm the devil.
You know, that freaks some people out.
But this time I mixed it up a little bit. See, I had you deliver the news.
You're utterly unthreatening.
When you say "devil", it sounds sorta cute.
So now that he's over the initial shock, I can step in and close the deal.
I just wanted to tell you that I appreciate it.
Just thanks again, buddy.
Hey, Josie.
Why were you at the coroner's office?
I got a call from my grandmother.
She thought my uncle Hector was hit by a car.
Turns out, he's OK, the whole thing was a false alarm.
Write it down.
You guys just happened to go to the morgue the same night my old ID badge shows up.
Inexplicable, but true.
Why would I want to use your ID, Josie?
I look nothing like you.
Where were you when you heard about your uncle?
I was at Sock's house playing nintendo.
- You sure about that?
- Positive.
Nintendo at Sock's. Ben was racking up points.
He almost didn't take the call about uncle Hector.
And you didn't use my ID to get into the morgue?
Why would I use your ID?
I... sorry, I...
Uncle Hector, Nintendo, I look nothing like you.
- Booya.
- "Booya."
That means you're not gonna fool us with any of your lawyer mumbo jumbo legalese.
What would I want to trick you about?
What is it that you're so excited to be throwin'in my face?
I get very excited about confirming the truth. It sets me free.
The truth that you three tell in exactly the same words,
- exactly the same way.
I'll find out what you're up to.
Then I'll show you "Boo-yah."
Oh, do it.
I dare ya, show me your booya!
- Hey, I wasn't sure you'd come.
- Yeah, me, either.
- Yeah, of course.
I don't know what to say to you, Sam.
You don't have to say anything. I'm a jerk.
You saw that necklace and I freaked out.
I'm sorry. I should have just told you the truth.
It wasn't about the necklace, Sam.
Look, I can get over the fact that you bought a present for another girl.
It's just... I don't know that you can get over it.
Yeah, I can.
It just seems to me like maybe you still have feelings for Andi.
And if you do, just tell me.
Yeah, I'm gonna be sad, but
I'm not a consolation prize.
Cady...
I don't think that about you, all right?
I'm with you. Not her, OK?
Oh, come on, man. Just answer the phone.
It's like 6 times she's called already.
Just talk to your mom!
What if she's trying to apologize?
She's not calling to apologize, Sam.
All right, she's calling to get me to accept her dumb decision about Morris.
And I don't accept him.
I reject him. Right, until she rejects him, too,
- we got nothin'to talk about.
- What if she never rejects him?
I mean, have you thought about that?
I mean, you might not have a choice here.
I do have a choice, Ben. I have a very good choice.
- Sock, what are you doing?
- Starving, Sam.
I'm gonna go in there, I'm gonna talk to Mrs. Carmona.
Sweet little Mrs. Carmona, see if she has any more pie.
What about the soul?
The soul's supposed to show up any minute now.
Mrs. Carmona.
Hi, it's Sock. Remember me?
I was just, uh, driving by, and I thought I smelled some of that delicious pi...
Pie?
Oh, no. Mrs. C?
You... sicko, sociopathic, bastard.
- How could you?
- I was hungry.
All she had was pie.
She loved you... through everything.
She supported you completely!
And you killed her because you didn't want to eat delicious pie?
You could have eaten anyone!
She was loving, and sweet, and you chewed her up like she was nothing!
I'll go get a table.
Listen, I should never have given anyone that necklace.
No, listen, I'm the one that should be apologizing, OK?
I was a jerk. I deliberately provoked that fight, OK?
I should have just... kept my cool.
Good. We both can admit we're awful people.
I don't think I'm awful.
Nothing.
We just... cleared up the whole necklace incident.
We're all going to be friends, yay.
Do you want to be friends?
'Cause that's not what it sounds like.
You know what, you need to let that go.
He's seeing somebody else. I'm not getting in the middle of that.
I wouldn't let you get in the middle of it, Andi.
That just serves as further proof that we can't trust a word out of Sam Oliver's mouth.
Liars. All three of 'em.
You're just mad 'cause they outsmarted you.
They did not outsmart me. And I'm not mad.
- I'm furious.
- Would you look at this? - Promotional coasters.
The devil's really doin'it up.
OK, guys, can we get a toast here?
To Mrs. Carmona.
Loving mother who deserved much better than being eaten.
I gotta say, cannibal soul, scariest soul we've ever captured.
Cannibal soul vs. fire soul, fire soul wins every time.
Well, maybe from a distance, yeah.
But, you know, get them in a cage match, cannibal soul gets in close, face is gone.
OK, cage match.
Cannibal soul vs. crazy dog monster soul.
That's interesting, man. I like that.
And cannibal soul wouldn't eat the dog, 'cause it's a dog, obviously,
- and it's not a man, so...
- But, I don't know, Benji.
If I got hungry enough, I would definitely eat a dog.
Would you eat a man?
It depends on what man we're talking about.
I mean, if we're talking about George Clooney, then, yeah.
Because he's gorgeous and I hate him.
So that proves my point right there. Scariest soul of all time,
- cannibal soul.
- Yeah, I agree.
How bad do you think he'd scare this guy?
- Doh, Sam!
- That hurts.
Come on, come on, come on.
OK, OK, OK. Safety meeting first.
Sam, make sure you release the soul from the vessel.
- Sock brings Ryan down here.
- Bet your ass I will.
I'm gonna dangle this bacon. I'm gonna make sure that guy turns into a crazy eating thing.
Rock star poops his pants out of fear, refuses to sign his soul over to the devil, we all go home happy.
All right, bring it.
Yo, Ry-on.
Is that how you say it?
Ry-on?
- Rian.
- Rian, all right.
Hey, listen, Ryan,
I came to the show tonight with 10 very open-minded young ladies who are just dying to meet a real star.
- Well, let's go!
There's a star right here!
Just under here.
Hey, Ryan.
Where are... all the open-minded ladies?
We're about to show you what's going to happen if you sign your soul away to the devil.
He's actually an escaped soul from hell, and in a second, he's going to turn into a monster.
You guys are nuts.
- No, whoa, whoa.
- Come on, let me out.
Listen to me.
You sign that contract, you're gonna spend the rest of eternity with monsters like this.
- Why isn't he eating the bacon?
- We should have cooked it.
Benji, get it right in his face.
You're making us look bad.
That's Canadian back bacon!
Don't be a jerk!
These people kidnapped me. You need to call the police.
- Shut up, and eat the bacon!
- Hey, hold on, relax.
- Everybody just relax, all right?
Move out of the way.
- You don't scare me.
Performing in front of thousands of people tonight, now that's scary.
By the way, did you catch the show?
I thought it went really good.
- I need you to move.
- Fellas, listen.
Tonight, the audience and I were like one.
We connected.
Just like I'm gonna connect with you, because my music has a simple message...
Oh, sweet muscular Mary!
Oh, my god, my hand!
- My hands!
- Sock, call 9-1-1!
I'm gonna go after it!
- No, don't...
Sammy!
- My hand!
Well, that worked.
Brought you flowers, 'cause...
Didn't know what else to get you. Hey, they put it back on, that's great.
- You... in pain?
- I can't feel my hand, bro.
In here, wreckage.
Listen, Ryan, I want to apologize.
Things got way, way out of hand back there. And I...
Dude, what are you talkin'about?
- I was in shock.
I don't remember what happened to my hand.
I don't remember anything after the second encore.
Doc says a bear probably chomped it.
Listen, Ryan...
About the contract...
Dude, I can't even get Jerry on the phone.
I killed at that concert last night, and today, nothin'.
Like I don't even exist.
You're right, man. He is the devil.
Now I got nothin'.
Rachel!
- What are you doin'here?
You came back?
Actually, I just wanted to make sure you weren't gonna die or anything.
I'm out of the life, baby.
I can't rock out no more.
I don't need crowds of adoring fans anymore, Rachel.
I just need you.
Concert of one.
I just don't know if I can believe you, Ryan.
You've told me a thousand times you were gonna give up rock and roll for me.
Yeah, but now I have no feelings in 4 out of my 5 fingers.
- Really numb?
- Bear chomp.
I'm just gonna get this all out, OK?
Cards on the table.
I may... have reacted poorly... before.
I thought that you were being impulsive by getting married, and I wanted you to see that you were making a mistake.
OK, but now I can see that maybe that is something you need to be happy.
So I am willing to accept Morris into this family... and forgive you
for marrying him without my blessing.
- Thank you, bert.
Great. All right, let me go unpack my schnibs.
Oh, Bert, you can't unpack.
No, I have to. I have a ton of laundry for you to do.
No, Bert...
Only Morris and I are going to live here now.
- Bert,
- you're a man now.
You're 25.
You need to leave the nest.
No, mom, that is not you talking right now.
That is him, all right?
You are not my dad, guy!
This isn't Morris talking.
Now, this time apart has made me realize that we'd both be happier if there was some distance between us.
It's hard, but I know it's what's best for us.
It's what's best for you.
I am going to go into my room and give you a few minutes to cool off.
When I return, you'll have come back to your crazy senses.
You turned my room into a pottery studio?
- Oh, um, sorry.
- No, no, no problem.
OK. Thank you.
Uh, Sam said you wanted to talk to me.
Yeah, listen,
I just feel like you and I got off on the wrong foot, and, I don't know, I kinda feel like I'm getting this... vibe, I guess from you, like, who is this chick hanging out with my friend Sam?
I don't blame you, 'cause... 'cause you don't know me.
So let me tell you this story. When I was in high school,
I had this boyfriend, and we were madly in love.
And then he suddenly dumped me for this other girl.
Totally broke my heart.
Well, I didn't take it very well.
Yeah, I got this giant knife and I went to this girl's house and was gonna find her, but she wasn't there, so I just slashed her tires.
But I've been through therapy, and I have found a way to control my emotions, pretty much.
So anyway, hope that lets you know a little bit more about me.
And one of these days,
I'd really like to hear one of your stories.
Hey, big shot.
That's you,
Feelin'pretty good about yourself, huh?
- You really put one over on me.
Oh, Ryan's soul.
I had it all lined up.
Primed to take it, then you stole it right out from under me.
You beat me to the punch.
I underestimated you, Sammy. Big time.
You're quite the sly fox.
I know you want to gloat about it right now.
Admit it. I won't be mad.
Yeah, it feels pretty good.
Send an evil soul to hell, save a good soul from being damned, I like it.
Yeah, there you go, see?
Plus, you got the best of me.
Now, don't tell me that doesn't give you a rush.
I guess you can't win 'em all.
Oh, yeah. I guess not.
You said you wouldn't be mad!
No, this isn't me mad, Sam.
This is me disappointed.
You should see me when I'm mad.
It's really something.
OUR DAILY BREAD
You must get this amount or it will be serious.Your Father
"First call for lunch in the dining car"!
Your handkerchiefs are under your shirts.
Use a clean one every day.
Don't stay out late at night
Don't take up with strangers. Remember we are depending on you to do your best.
Was that the first call for luncheon?
Guess so.
It's the first one I've heard, ma'am.
Maybe I made a mistake sending' Lem to Chicago...alone.
I raise wheat to sell, not to play with!
Every grain counts!
Give us this day our daily bread....
Get to work, Kate... that fan's for the files!
If the files are as hot as I am, they need it!
Can you beat it ?
He's praying !
Betcha two bits he's gonna take a chance on the hash !
I'd like some corned beef hash and coffee, please.
You win!
It was my fault...for putting 'em there.
No.. pa is Scotch Ma is Canadian and I'm plain American.
Lonesome in the big city, aint it ? What you doin' here?
I'm down here to sell our wheat crop.
Well, old wheat king, how about some bread pudding for desert?
I always do that at home. It makesMa's work easier.
Living on a farm must be wonderful!
I'm certainly glad to have met you!
CROP ESTIMATE PUTS CORN PRICE UP, WHEAT DOWN.
No letter from Lem yet. I'm worried, Mother.
Lem's doin' what's right...
You keep forgettin' our boy's a grown man now.
maybe you're right, but I can't help thinkin' of him as a little shaver.
Just the same, if he don't sell right, I'll never be able to make both ends meet!
How does he rate a private breeze?
How old is this fish anyway ?
Don't ask me Mister! Look in his mouth!
Figurin' how much it'll cost to take her out tonight, Buddy?
I sold the wheat today... I hope Pop won't be mad.
He sent you to sell it, didn't he?
But i didn't get his price.
It was droppin' so fast I was afraid to hold out any longer.
I'd rather be deaf than blind, wouldn't you ?
I can see you'd be nice company.
What do you do with your evenings?
You'll never know!
You shouldn't 'a done that! Fighting over me!
I'd fight anybody who tried to lay a hand on you!
on the one o'clock train.
Cut short the side order, Kate...
the boss is givin' you the eagle eye!
There's something I wanted to ask..
I wanted to ask... If you...
like like..
like living in the city?
Guess one place is good as another.
It's all a wash-out, If you ask me!
Give my love to the cows and the chickens!
I'll wait a minute.
YOUR WEIGHT and YOUR FORTUNE.
If you marry the one you are thinking of all will be well.
I left something behind... got to get it.
If we get married right away we can be home by morning.
Just married a sweet girl waitress in big resyaurant 69 00:30:55,050 -- 00:31:00,706 Know you will love her.
Bringing her home tomorrow.
Your Son
Good girls ain't that free and easy about getting married. The boy's been roped in!
Oh, Lem, it's wonderful to have a home and a mother and father...
And a man of my own a real two-fisted guy...
Ma ...this is Kate!
This is the prettiest bridal bouquet I ever saw!
You're Marie, ain't you?
If I catch you playin' with wheat again, I'll whip you!
Father... here's Kate.
How much did you get for the wheat?
Didn't I tell you not to sell under $1.15?
If you'd been tending' to my business 'stead of your own, you'd 'a waited.
Change your clothes and get to work!
The harvesters are comin' in the mornin'!
Don't mind Father.... he's upset.
And he never can bear to be crossed.
I want to talk to you!
I'd like to know what you expected to get out of marrying' Lem.
What any other wife expects. I married Lem because I...
..I love him..
Women like you love for what they can get out of it But you'll get nothing from me!
You certainly smeared it that time! Now I'll never give Lem up! ...
I am going to make a man of Lem Tustine in spite of you!
.. And if you think he'll let me go away without him guess again!
My son does what I say and so will you!
Your... father... hit me!
I can't strike my own father!
And this is our honeymoon!
I got some surprise for you!
Lem's went an' married a city girl!
Good looker?
The old man's like a mad bull...
tryin' to bust it up An' last night, she slept in the bedroom alone 'an he slept in the loft!
I'm gonna have first look!
Maybe I'll help the old man bust it up! .
Well, Pa-in-law, where's the blushing' bride?
Get busy!
Do somethin' to earn your keep!
How do you like bein' here?
Bein' here's all right...
I don't think much of the company.
Don't waste any more time...
we got to get started.
Aw, she don't weigh no 187 pounds!
I don't want anything to eat.
Looks like you've popped into a hornrt's nest.
You said it!
There's your chance, Mac... to check up on that weighing' machine!
Kate... we can't go on like this...
I didn't think anybody could ever come between us......
Kate, Let's forget this quarrel and be happy.
I love you... you're my wife.
This aint the bridal suite.
You mind your own business!
that goes for all of you!
And if anyone wants an argument, I got two good ones!
Hailstorm Sweeps Canada
There's a hailstorm comin'!
We'll have to work all night to save the crop!
Divide the men in two shifts, Mac... double pay for overtime! ...double pay for overtime!
HAILSTORM SWEEPS CENTRAL CANADÁ WHEAT CROP RUINED
I cut my hand on the machine.
Say, are you crazy?
A girl like you buryin' yourself in a dump like this!
What's the matter with you hicks?
Don't people ever fall in love out here?
You didn't look exactly lovin' when you ran out of that room tonight.
Why don't you chuck all this... come away with me when we finish the harvesting'...
I'll treat you right...
and that's more than old Tustine will ever let Lem do!
I always knew you wasn't a good woman!
I'm goin' to find Lem now...and tell him what kind of wife he's got
What's the use of talkin' to that old devil?
I know how to get even with him...
The storm'll be here in no time...
I used to think the country was clean, that men out here were decent...
But you're all alike...cheap sports!
You all talk big when you want something!
If that's the way you feel about it, I'll give you somethin' more'n talk!
I don't want anything from you! I can fight for myself!
You agreed to work all night!
We've changed our minds.
We're quitting' now!
My father says he caught you and Mac planning to run away together.
Haven't you anything to say?
Not a thing... you can believe it or not!
If I thought it was true...
Yeah?
Run to Papa?
I'd smash Mac so's he'd never come hanging around my wife again!
You got to learn any man can get a wife!
But it takes more'n a license and a wedding ring to hold her!
I guess our marriage was a mistake.
I'll shoot the first man that leaves my farm!
Listen to me Kate.
I've settled your score with the old man!
I've called the men out... and we're leavin'the wheat to rot in the fields.
I'm leavin' with the men in ten minutes and you're comin' with me...
..If you don't I'll say you put me up to ruining' the wheat!
Are you comin'?
Yes...yes ..but I've got to have time to pack.
Here's somethin' Mac forgot!
We're waitin' for Kate ...she's comin' with me!
I thought I could help you by staying, then you believed that lie about me and Mac.
Mac tried to get me to go with him but I wouldn't.
Maybe with me gone, They'll work and save the wheat
I never loved anybody but you, Goodbye, Kate.
Father... it's Lem!
FATHER!
Son, you know I... I wasn't meaning' to shoot you.
There's some things worse'n shooting.
One of 'ems the hell.. ...you been putting Kate and me through.
...Now I'm going to find Kate and take her away...
I been wrong, Lem, and I'm sorry Don't leave us!
Let me find Kate and beg her to stay.
No...
I got to find her myself.
I won't try to stop you again, boys.
You can go whenever you want to.
We ain't goin' to leave till your wheat's in!
You're on the wrong road.
There's only more farms like ours that way That's the road to the station.
Let me give you a lift, Kate.
Remember when we first came along this road how happy we were?
When I got your note Kate, I went crazy...
Father, here's Kate.
Can you forgive me... Kate?
Come back with us... to your home.
THE END
The scorpion is an arachoid species found in various parts of the world
Its tail comprises five prismatic joints
The pincers, recalling those of the larger crayfsh are instruments of aggression and information
Its tail ends in a sixth joint a sac from which poison is injected by barbed sting
A lover of darkness, it burrows under stones to escape the glare of the sun
Antisocial, it ejects the intruder on its solitude
Such lightning strikes, such virtuosity in attack
Even a rat, for all its fury, falls prey to it
Some hours later
Perhaps I just happened to fall?
We saw nothing
is there any news, yes or no?
Yes, the Majorcans are here
Quick, to arms!
To the rear!
What about Péman?
I'm done for
So are we, but we're going
Yes, but you've got accordions hippopotamuses, wrenches mountain goats, and...
Bollocks!
Let's go ...and paintbrushes
This stone, on the site where the Majorcans died marks the founding of the city of Imperial Rome
Once mistress of the pagan world, now secular seat of the Church
Aspects of its stoutest pillar, the Vatican
The landlord's terms are very favourable. We can move in at once
Longing to see you, very soon now. Your loving cousin
But the hurly-burly of modern life has overtaken the Imperial City
Sometimes on Sundays...
Various picturesque aspects of the great city
Bandaged?
Yes, it's been sore for over a week ls Daddy home yet, Mummy?
Yes, he's in the dispensary
Then he'll dress for the party
We went out together this morning and engaged four of them
The little moustached one sang like the rest
Only a pianist is lacking
But our priest is a fine violinist I think the musicians we have will be enough
Six of them placed near the microphone will make more noise than sixty ten kilometres away I know sound gets lost in the open air but we could bring the guests in close
Get a move on. The Majorcans will be arriving at nine
Filthy swine!
Keep your trap shut!
Want us to work you over?
Here's a taste of the rough stuff!
Enough is enough; let me show you who you're dealing with
Let's have a look, then
The International Goodwill Society hereby appoints you its special delegate
This document testifies to our faith in you
We pray that you will prove worthy of this trust we place in you and successfully complete your goodwill mission
On your spirit of self-sacrifice and your proven valour depend many lives
Children, women, old men
The honour of our Fatherland rests on the outcome of this noble enterprise
At his magnificent Roman estate, the Marquis of X prepares for his guests
The Minister of the lnterior is on the telephone
You are entirely to blame!
You compromised me, too
Do you realize that not one child survived?
Many women and old men perished, too
You're bothering me about a few brats?
Filthy ruffian, you've dragged me down with you!
Dishonoured me!
You can die for all I care!
Then listen to my last words...
Are you sleepy?
I was just falling asleep
Where's the light switch?
At the foot of the bed
Your elbow's hurting me
Move your head closer,; the pillow is cooler on this side
Where's your hand?
That feels so good
Let's just sit here and not move
No, I was falling
I've been waiting so long for him
What joy! What joy in having killed our children
My love... my love...
Just as these feathers fell, but a long way away the survivors from the Château de Selliny emerged to return to Paris
120 days earlier, four godless and unprincipled scoundrels had, driven by their depravity, shut themselves away to indulge in the most bestial of orgies
To them, the life of a woman mattered no more than that of a fly
They took with them eight lovely adolescent girls to serve as victims for their criminal desires plus four women well versed in debauchery whose narrative skills would serve to stimulate their already jaded appetites whenever interest flagged
Here are the survivors of these orgies, leaving the Château de Selliny
First and foremost of the four instigators, the Duc de Blangis
CITY LIGHTS
"To the people of this city we donate this monument; 'Peace and Prosperity'."
"Did you pick it up, sir?"
"Wait for your change, sir."
Evening.
"Grandma."
Night.
"Tomorrow the birds will sing."
"Be brave!
Face life!"
"No, I'll end it all!"
"I'm cured. You're my friend for life."
"We'll go home and get warmed up."
"Any news?"
"Only that your wife sent for her baggage, sir."
"Good!"
"Here's to our friendship --"
"No, I'll live!"
"James - the Rolls-Royce.
We'll burn up the town!"
Early morning; homeward bound.
"Be careful how you're driving."
"Am I driving?"
"I like your car."
"Then keep it, it's yours."
"Where's my friend?"
"Let him in, he's my guest!"
"Let's buy some flowers."
"Here's ten dollars."
"I haven't any change, sir."
"James!"
"Take these inside; I'll be right back."
"Thank you for your kindness, sir."
"May I see you home again?"
"Whenever you wish, sir."
The sober dawn awakens a different man.
"I'm out to everybody!"
"Whoever he is, get rid of him!"
"-- and then he brought me home in his car."
"He must be wealthy."
"Yes, but he's more than that."
That afternoon.
"My friend!"
"Come on home, I'll give you a swell party."
The party.
The morning after.
"I'm sailing at noon, so hurry!"
"She has a fever and needs careful attention."
Determined to help the girl, he found work.
FINAL NOTICE Madam: You are owing $22.00 rent.
Unless paid by tomorrow morning, we shall take possession.
"Grandma, he's coming today!"
"Grandma, what's wrong?"
"Grandma, I wish you'd meet him; you're never here when he calls."
Lunch time.
"Have you seen the soap?"
"Be back on time!"
"To play the part of a gentleman without the millionaire was difficult, but he did his best."
VIENNA DOCTOR HAS CURE FOR BLINDNESS
Thousands journey from all parts of the world.
FREE OPERATION FOR POOR
Miraculous Work Of Surgeon Astounds Medical Profession
"Wonderful!
Then I'll be able to see you."
"For me?
Read it please."
"Now don't worry, I'll pay it the first thing in the morning."
Late.
"You're late for the last time!"
"Get out!"
"Do you want to make some easy money?"
That night.
"Remember, we split fifty-fifty;
and you promise you won't hurt me."
"Be careful, the boss might hear us."
TELEGRAM
EDDIE MASON MAIN STREET ARENA
GET OUT OF TOWN THE COPS ARE AFTER YOU
JIM
"I've got to beat it; boss!"
"Do you want to fight for a fifty dollar purse?"
Winner take all.
"You'll fight him!"
"That's my lucky rabbit's foot."
"Let's take it easy and we'll split fifty-fifty."
"Winner take all!"
Still hoping to get money for the girl, he wandered the city.
Back from Europe.
"Now don't worry about the girl, I'll take care of her."
"Will a thousand dollars be enough?"
"Police!
Help!"
"He has been robbed, search that man!"
"Where did you get this money?"
"Tell him you gave me that money."
"Who is this man?"
"This is for the rent."
"And this is for your eyes."
"I must be going."
"How can I ever thank you?"
"You're not going away?"
"For awhile."
"But you're coming back!"
Autumn.
"I'd like to order some flowers."
"Why, what's the matter, child?"
"Nothing, only I thought he had returned."
"I've made a conquest!"
"You?"
"You can see now?"
"Yes, I can see now."
THE END
"Among the rugged peaks that frown down upon the Borgo Pass
"are found crumbling castles of a bygone age."
I say, driver, a bit slower.
We must reach the inn before sundown.
And why, pray?
It is Walpurgis Night, the night of evil.
Nosferatu.
On this night, madam, the doors, they are barred and to the Virgin we pray.
I say, porter.
I'm going on to Borgo Pass tonight. No, no, please. Put that back up there.
The driver, he is afraid. Walpurgis Night.
Good fellow, he is.
He wants me to ask if you can wait and go on after sunrise.
Well, I'm sorry, but there's a carriage meeting me at Borgo Pass at midnight.
Borgo Pass? Yes.
Whose carriage?
Count Dracula's.
Count Dracula's?
Castle Dracula?
Yes, that's where I'm going.
To the castle?
No. You mustn't go there.
We people of the mountains believe at the castle there are vampires!
Dracula and his wives. They take the form of wolves and bats.
They leave their coffins at night and they feed on the blood of the living.
Oh, but that's all superstition.
When it is gone, they leave their coffins.
Come. We must go indoors.
But wait!
I mean, just a minute, I...
What I'm trying to say is that I'm not afraid.
I've explained to the driver that it's a matter of business with me.
I've got to go. Really.
Wait. Please.
If you must go, wear this, for your mother's sake.
It will protect you. The coach from Count Dracula?
Hey, driver!
I say, driver, what do you mean by going at this... I am Dracula.
It's really good to see you.
I don't know what happened to the driver and my luggage and...
Well, and with all this, I thought I was in the wrong place.
I bid you welcome. Listen to them.
Children of the night.
What music they make.
The spider spinning his web for the unwary fly.
The blood is the life, Mr. Renfield.
I'm sure you will find this part of my castle more inviting.
Well, rather. It's quite different from outside.
Oh, and the fire, it's so cheerful.
I didn't know, but that you might be hungry.
Thank you.
That's very kind of you, but I'm a bit worried about my luggage. You see, all your papers were in...
I took the liberty of having your luggage brought up.
Thanks. I trust you have kept your coming here a secret.
I've followed your instructions implicitly.
Excellent, Mr. Renfield.
And now, if you're not too fatigued,
I would like to discuss the lease on Carfax Abbey.
Oh, yes. Everything is in order awaiting your signature.
Well, here. Here's the lease.
Why, I hope I've brought enough labels for your luggage.
I'm taking with me only three boxes.
I have chartered a ship to take us to England.
We will be leaving tomorrow evening.
Everything will be ready.
I hope you will find this comfortable.
Thanks. It looks very inviting.
Oh, it's nothing serious. Just a small cut from that paper clip.
This is very old wine.
I hope you will like it.
Aren't you drinking?
I never drink wine.
And now I'll leave you.
Good night, Mr. Renfield.
Master, the sun is gone!
You will keep your promise when we get to London, won't you, Master?
You will see that I get lives?
Not human lives, but small ones with blood in them.
I'll be loyal to you, Master.
I'll be loyal!
Must be a Scandinavian ship.
That's what it looks to me like. Here now, here now, get back.
Nobody goes aboard this here boat but the authorities.
The captain dead, tied to the wheel.
Horrible tragedy, horrible tragedy.
Master, we're here!
You can't hear what I'm saying, but we're here!
They must have come through a terrible storm.
Why, it's come from that hatchway!
Why, he's mad! Look at his eyes.
Why, the man's gone crazy.
Violets!
Flower for your buttonhole, sir. Flower for your buttonhole, sir.
Flower for your buttonhole, sir.
Flower for your buttonhole. Here's a nice one.
And after you deliver the message, you will remember nothing I now say.
Obey.
Dr. Seward?
You're wanted on the telephone.
Thank you.
Well, excuse me, dear. Oh, Father, if it's from home, will you say I'm spending the night in town with Lucy?
All right, dear.
Pardon me.
Yes? I could not help overhearing your name.
Might I inquire if you are the Dr. Seward whose sanitarium is at Whitby?
I'm Count Dracula.
I have just leased Carfax Abbey. I understand it adjoins your grounds.
Why, yes, it does. I'm very happy to make your acquaintance.
May I present my daughter Mina?
Count Dracula.
Miss Weston.
And Mr. Harker.
Count Dracula's just taken Carfax Abbey.
Oh, it'll be a relief to see light in those dismal old windows.
It will, indeed. You'll excuse me, I'm wanted on the telephone.
The Abbey could be very attractive, but I should imagine it would need quite extensive repairs.
I shall do very little repairing.
It reminds me of the broken battlements of my own castle in Transylvania.
The Abbey always reminds me of that old toast about lofty timbers.
"echoing to our laughter "as though the dead were there."
Nice little sentiment.
But there's more, even nicer.
"Pass a cup to the dead already, "a round for the next to die..."
Oh, never mind the rest, dear.
To die, to be really dead, that must be glorious.
Why, Count Dracula!
There are far worse things awaiting man
than death. It reminds me of the broken battlements of my own castle in Transylvania.
Oh, Lucy. You're so romantic.
Laugh all you like. I think he's fascinating.
I suppose he's all right.
But give me someone a little more normal.
Like John?
Yes, dear, like John.
Castle. Dracula!
Transylvania.
Well, Countess,
I'll leave you to your Count and his ruined abbey.
Good night, Lucy. Good night, dear.
The fog seems to be closing down a bit, sir.
Another death.
Dead.
Dr. Seward, when did Miss Weston have the last transfusion?
About four hours ago.
An unnatural loss of blood, which we've been powerless to check.
On the throat of each victim, the same two marks.
He probably wants his flies again!
No, Martin, please!
Please don't, Martin!
Oh, Martin, please!
Please, Martin!
No, Martin! Oh, Martin, please!
Here, give it to me now!
No, no, no, Martin! Please!
No, Martin! Martin, don't!
Don't throw my spider away from me.
Oh, Martin. No.
Ain't you ashamed now? Ain't you?
Spiders now, is it?
Flies ain't good enough?
Flies?
Poor, puny things.
Who wants to eat flies?
You do, you loony.
Not when I can get nice, fat spiders!
All right. Have it your own way.
Read, dummkopf, where I have marked.
Gentlemen, we are dealing with the undead.
Nosferatu?
Yes, Nosferatu, the undead, the vampire.
The vampire attacks the throat.
It leaves two little wounds, white with red centers.
Dr. Seward, your patient, Renfield, whose blood I have just analyzed, is obsessed with the idea that he must devour living things in order to sustain his own life.
But Professor Van Helsing, modern medical science does not admit of such a creature.
The vampire is a pure myth, superstition.
I may be able to bring you proof that the superstition of yesterday can become the scientific reality of today.
But, Professor, Renfield's cravings have always been for small living things.
Nothing human.
As far as we know, Doctor.
But you tell me that he escapes from his room.
He is gone for hours.
Where does he go?
Well, Mr. Renfield, you are looking much better than you did this morning when I arrived.
Thanks, I'm feeling much better.
I am here to help you.
You understand that, do you not?
Why, of course. And I'm very grateful.
Keep your filthy hands to yourself!
Now, now, Renfield.
Oh, Dr. Seward, send me away from this place.
Send me far away.
Why are you so anxious to get away?
My cries at night, they might disturb Miss Mina.
They might give her bad dreams, Professor Van Helsing.
Bad dreams. That sounded like a wolf.
Yes, it did. But I hardly think there are wolves so near London.
He thinks they're wolves.
Me, I've heard them howl at night before.
He thinks they're talking to him.
He howls and howls back at them.
I might have known. I might have known.
We know why the wolves talk, do we not, Mr. Renfield?
And we know how we can make them stop. You know too much to live, Van Helsing.
Now, now, Renfield.
We'll get no more out of him now for a while.
Take him away, Martin.
On your way, old fly eater.
I'm warning you, Dr. Seward.
If you don't send me away, you must answer for what will happen to Miss Mina!
All right, Martin.
Come along, now, come along.
What was that herb that excited him so?
Wolfsbane.
It is a plant that grows in central Europe.
The natives there use it to protect themselves against vampires.
Renfield reacted very violently to its scent.
Seward, I want you to have Renfield closely watched by day and night, especially by night.
Yes, Master.
Master, you've come back.
No, Master, please!
Please don't ask me to do that!
Don't! Not her!
Please don't, Master!
Don't, please!
Oh, don't!
I lay in bed for quite a while, reading.
And just as I was commencing to get drowsy, I heard dogs howling.
And when the dream came, it seemed the whole room was filled with mist.
It was so thick,
I could just see the lamp by the bed, a tiny spark in the fog.
And then I saw two red eyes staring at me, and a white livid face came down out of the mist.
It came closer and closer.
I felt its breath on my face, and then its lips.
Dear, it was only a dream.
And then, in the morning, I felt so weak.
It seemed as if all the life had been drained out of me.
Darling, we're going to forget all about these dreams, think about something cheerful, aren't we?
Oh, certainly, Professor.
Think for a moment.
Is there anything that might have brought this dream on?
Doctor, there's something troubling Mina, something she won't tell us.
And the face in the dream, you say it seemed to come closer and closer?
The lips touched you?
Is there anything the matter with your throat?
Oh, no, but I...
Permit me.
No, please!
How long have you had those little marks?
Marks?
Mina, why didn't you let us know?
Do not excite her.
When, Miss Mina?
Since the morning after the dream.
What could have caused them, Professor?
Count Dracula!
It's good to see you back again, Doctor.
I heard you have just arrived.
And you, Miss Mina. You're looking exceptionally...
Pardon me, Dr. Seward, but I think Miss Mina should go to her room at once.
Professor Van Helsing, I don't believe it's as important as you seem to think it is.
Excuse me. Count Dracula, Professor Van Helsing.
Van Helsing.
A most distinguished scientist whose name we know, even in the wilds of Transylvania.
I had a frightful dream a few nights ago, and I don't seem to be able to get it out of my mind.
I hope you haven't taken my stories too seriously.
Stories?
In my humble effort to amuse your fiancÃ©e, Mr. Harker,
I was telling her some rather grim tales of my far-off country.
Why, John!
I can quite understand Mr. Harker's concern.
I'm afraid it's quite serious.
My dear, I'm sure Count Dracula will excuse you.
You must go to your room as Professor Van Helsing suggests.
Oh, but, really, Father, I'm feeling quite well.
You had better do as your father advises.
Miss Mina? May I call later and inquire how you're feeling?
Why, yes. Thank you.
I'm sorry, Doctor. My visit was so ill-timed.
On the contrary, it may prove to be most enlightening.
In fact, before you go, you can be of definite service.
Anything I can do. Gladly.
A moment ago,
I stumbled upon a most amazing phenomenon, something so incredible, I mistrust my own judgment.
Dr. Seward, my humble apology.
I dislike mirrors.
Van Helsing will explain.
For one who has not lived even a single lifetime, you are a wise man, Van Helsing.
Whew. What on earth caused that?
Did you see the look on his face?
Like a wild animal!
Wild animal?
Like a madman!
What's that running across the lawn?
Looks like a huge dog!
Or a wolf?
A Wolf?
He was afraid we might follow.
Follow?
Sometimes they take the form of wolves, but generally of bats.
But what's Dracula got to do with wolves and bats?
Dracula is our vampire.
But surely, Professor...
A vampire casts no reflection in the glass.
That is why Dracula smashed the mirror.
I don't mean to be rude, but that's the sort of thing I'd expect one of the patients here to say.
Yes, and that is what your English doctors would say, your police.
The strength of the vampire is that people will not believe in him.
Professor, vampires only exist in ghost stories.
A vampire, Mr. Harker, is a being that lives after its death by drinking the blood of the living.
It must have blood or it dies.
Its power lasts only from sunset to sunrise.
During the hours of the day, it must rest in the earth in which it was buried.
But then, if Dracula were a vampire, he'd have to return every night to Transylvania, and that's impossible.
Then he must have brought his native soil with him, boxes of it.
Boxes of earth large enough for him to rest in. Renfield?
Did you hear what we were saying?
Yes, I heard something.
Be guided by what he says.
It's your only hope.
It's her only hope.
I begged you to send me away, but you wouldn't.
Now it's too late. It's happened again.
Take her away from here.
Take her away before...
No, no, Master! I wasn't going to say anything!
I told them nothing!
I'm loyal to you, Master.
What have you to do with Dracula?
Dracula?
I never even heard the name before.
You will die in torment if you die with innocent blood on your soul.
God will not damn a lunatic's soul.
He knows that the powers of evil are too great for those of us with weak minds. Oh, Mr. Harker! Mr. Harker, it's horrible!
Oh, it's horrible!
Dr. Seward!
Miss Mina, out there dead!
Thank heaven she's alive. Thank heaven for that.
Alive, yes, but in greater danger, for she's already under his influence.
It's horrible, Van Helsing, horrible!
Incredible. Incredible, perhaps, but a fact. We must face it.
We must cope with it. "Further attacks on small children committed after dark
"by the mysterious woman in white took place last night.
"Narratives of two small girls, each child describing
"a beautiful lady in white who promised her chocolates, "enticed her to a secluded spot
"and there bit her slightly in the throat."
Ghosts.
Vampires.
And then, Miss Mina?
Well, how could she know anything about the woman in white?
It's bad enough for her to read it in the newspaper...
Please, please, Mr. Harker.
And when was the next time you saw Miss Lucy after she was buried?
I was downstairs on the terrace.
She came out of the shadows and stood looking at me.
I started to speak to her.
And then I remembered she was dead.
The most horrible expression came over her face.
She looked like a hungry animal. A Wolf.
And then she turned and ran back into the dark.
Then you know the woman in white is...
Miss Mina, I promise you that after tonight she will remain at rest, her soul released from this horror.
If you can save Lucy's soul after death, promise me you'll save mine.
Darling, you're not going to die, you're going to live.
No, John. You mustn't touch me.
And you mustn't kiss me ever again.
You make him understand. I can't.
Professor?
It's all over, John.
Our love, our life together.
No, no, donâ€™t look at me like that.
I love you, John.
But this horror, he wills it.
Miss Mina, you must come indoors.
You know what you're doing to her, Professor?
You're driving her crazy!
Mr. Harker, that is what you should be worrying about.
The last rays of the day's sun will soon be gone, and another night will be upon us. Dr. Seward, I'm taking Mina with me to London tonight or I'll call in the police.
But, John...
Mina, please get your bags packed.
Seward, I must be master here or I can do nothing.
Right.
Miss Mina, both this room and your bedroom have been prepared with wolfsbane.
You will be safe if Dracula returns.
She'll be safe, all right, because she's going with me.
Mina, I'll be waiting for you in the library.
Oh, John!
Father, talk to him.
Please don't let him go.
Oh, Briggs-
Miss Mina is to wear this wreath of wolfsbane when she goes to bed.
Watch her closely, and see that she does not remove it in her sleep.
I understand, Professor.
And under no circumstances must these windows be opened tonight.
Very well, sir. You will recollect that Dracula cast no reflection in the mirror.
And that three boxes of earth were delivered to him at Carfax Abbey.
Quite. And knowing that a vampire must rest by day in his native soil,
I am convinced that this Dracula is no legend but an undead creature whose life has been unnaturally prolonged.
Well, Dr. Seward, what about it?
Is Mina going with me or not?
If you take her from under our protection, you will kill her.
Now, John, please, please, be patient.
Mr. Harker, please, come here.
Well.
John, I know you love her, but don't forget she's my daughter, and I must do what I think is best.
Mr. Harker,
I have devoted my lifetime to the study of many strange things, little-known facts, which the world is perhaps better off not knowing.
I know, but, Professor, all I want is to get Mina away from all of this.
That will do no good.
Our only chance of saving Miss Mina's life is to find the hiding place of Dracula's living corpse and to drive a stake through its heart.
Isn't this a strange conversation for men who aren't crazy?
Renfield, you're compelling me to put you in a straitjacket.
You forget, Doctor, that madmen have great strength.
Dracula has great strength, eh, Renfield?
Words, words, words.
Oh, Martin. Didn't I warn you to keep a strict watch?
What? Again?
Yes, sir. At once, sir.
Yes, sir. Right away, sir.
Here. The doctor's pet loony is loose again.
He came and stood below my window in the moonlight.
And he promised me things.
Not in words, but by doing them.
Doing them?
By making them happen.
A red mist spread over the lawn, coming on like a flame of fire.
And then he parted it.
And I could see that there were thousands of rats with their eyes blazing red, like his, only smaller.
And then he held up his hand, and they all stopped.
And I thought he seemed to be saying,
"Rats. Rats. "Rats!"
Thousands, millions of them.
"All red blood,
"all these will I give you
"if you will obey me."
What did he want you to do?
That which has already been done.
Strike me down dead, Doctor.
He's got me going. Now he's twisted and broken them iron bars as if they was cheese.
Dracula is in the house.
In the house?
Doctor, this time he can do no harm. We are ready for him.
Martin, come with me. I'll show you where we can put Mr. Renfield where he won't escape again.
All right, but I have me doubts.
Come along, old fly eater.
Now, you mustn't get out of it this time. I'm awfully sorry to have to look you up, but you've got to stay in your room.
Van Helsing.
Now that you have learned what you have learned, it would be well for you to return to your own country.
I prefer to remain and protect those whom you would destroy.
You are too late.
My blood now flows through her veins.
She will live through the centuries to come, as I have lived.
Should you escape us, Dracula, we know how to save Miss Mina's soul, if not her life.
If she dies by day.
But I shall see that she dies by night.
And I will have Carfax Abbey torn down stone by stone, excavated a mile around.
I will find your earth box and drive that stake through your heart.
Come here.
Your will is strong,
Van Helsing.
More wolfsbane?
More effective than wolfsbane, Count.
Indeed. Open the windows, Briggs, and let in some air.
The odor in the room from that horrible weed is stifling.
I can't stand it.
But the Professor gave orders.
Oh, never mind the Professor now.
Now, please, go back to bed at once. I'm going to call your father.
What is it, Briggs?
Oh, I don't know, Mr. Harker.
I felt strangely dizzy.
And when it cleared away, Miss Mina was up and dressed and out on the terrace.
And I can't get her to go to bed.
Well, let me see her.
Tell her I'm here. John.
Oh, John, I'm so glad you're here.
Well, what have they been doing to me, dear?
Locking me in my room.
And the horrible smell of that awful weed.
It's been like a nightmare.
What's been the matter?
Mina.
You're so... Like a changed girl.
Oh, you look wonderful.
I feel wonderful. I've never felt better in my life.
Oh, I'm so glad to see you like this.
I've been awfully worried about you.
Mr. Harker. You better bring Miss Mina inside.
That's all right, Briggs, now that I'm here.
Run along, Briggs.
John. Look, the fog's lifting.
See how plain you can see the stars?
Millions of them.
I've never seen them so close.
Why, it looks as if you could reach out and touch them.
Would you like me to get you a hat...
Why, what's the matter?
Oh, nothing. Nothing at all.
Come.
Seward, that which I feared from the beginning has happened.
What? Dracula boasts that he has fused his blood with that of Miss Mina.
In life, she will now become the foul thing of the night that he is.
But Van Helsing...
No, no, come, Seward.
Come, there's not a moment to be lost.
Oh, but I love the fog.
I love nights with fog.
But only yesterday you said you were afraid of the night.
But, darling, I could never have said anything so silly. I couldn't.
I love the night.
That's the only time I feel really alive.
There's that bat again.
Look out. He'll get in your hair.
My, that was a big bat.
You will what?
Oh, I didn't say anything.
Yes, you did. You said, "I will."
Oh, no, I didn't.
John, come.
There must be some way, some way to save her.
- There is only one...
- John. That funny little old professor, he has a crucifix.
Now, I want you to get it away from him and hide it.
But why, dear?
Oh, he'll be wanting to protect me again from the night or Count Dracula or whatever it is.
Well, I don't know. He may be right, Mina.
Your eyes.
They look at me so strangely.
Mina.
Mina, you're...
No, Mina, no! Give me that.
What's the idea? Have you gone crazy?
What are you trying to do?
Frighten her to death? No, I was trying to save her.
Save her?
That's a fine way.
It's all right, darling.
Oh, John, darling, you must go away from me...
The cross, put it away.
After what's happened, I can't bear to look at it.
What's happened? I can't tell you.
I can't. Ah, but you must. You must tell me.
Oh, John.
You can believe everything he says.
It's all the truth. Dracula, he...
Dracula?
Well, what's he done to you, dearie?
He came to me.
He opened a vein in his arm and he made me drink... What is it? Who is it, Martin?
It's that big gray bat again, sir.
It's no use of wasting your bullets, Martin. They cannot harm that bat.
No, sir.
They're all crazy.
They're all crazy, except you and me.
Sometimes I have me doubts about you.
Yes.
Come, Mr. Harker. Master! Master, I'm here!
Where else would he be going but to Dracula?
What is it, Master?
What do you want me to do?
Look, here's an opening.
I didn't lead them here, Master.
I didn't know. I swear.
I'm loyal to you, Master.
I'm your slave. I didn't betray you.
Oh, no, don't!
Don't kill me! Let me live, please!
Punish me, torture me, but let me live!
I can't die with all those lives on my conscience!
All that blood on my hands! Mina! Mina!
He'll kill her if we don't get to her. We must not be too late.
We have him trapped.
Day is breaking.
We have him trapped.
He's killing her. Mina! Mina, where are you?
Mina, where are you?
Mina.
Mina!
Harker!
Harker! Yes?
Here. Here, Harker. I have found them.
Get me a piece of stone, anything.
It will help me drive the stake through their hearts. Is she... How is she?
She is not here.
Thenâ€œ. Then she may be alive.
Mina! Mina!
John, darling.
I heard you calling, but I couldn't say anything.
We thought he'd killed you, dear.
The daylight stopped him.
Oh, if you could have seen the look on his face.
There's nothing more to fear, Miss Mina.
Dracula is dead forever.
No, no, no.
You must go. But aren't you coming with us?
Not yet, presently. Come, John.
Mr Carl Laemmle feels it would be a little unkind to present this picture without just a word of friendly warning-
We are about to unfold the story of Frankenstein-
A man of science, who sought to create a man after his own image, without reckoning upon God-
It is one of the strangest tales ever told-
It deals with the two great mysteries of creation:
life and death-
I think it will thrill you-
It may shock you-
It might even horrify you-
So if any of you feel that you do not care to subject your nerves to such a strain, now is your chance to, er---
Well, we've warned you-
..dona eis, Domine:
et lux perpetua luceat eis.
Amen- Down
Hurry, hurry-
- We've no time to lose- Careful!
Here he comes!
He's just resting- Waiting for a new life to come-
Here we are-
Look, it's still here-
Climb up and cut the rope-
No! Go on
- It can't hurt you-
Here's a knife-
Here's the knife-
Here I come-
The neck's broken - The brain is useless!
We must find another brain-
That'll do, gentlemen- And in conclusion, ladies and gentlemen, here we have one of the most perfect specimens of the human brain ever to come to my attention at the university-
And here, the abnormal brain of the typical criminal-
Observe, ladies and gentlemen, the scarcity of convolutions on the frontal lobe as compared to that of the normal brain, and the distinct degeneration of the middle frontal lobe-
All of these degenerate characteristics check amazingly with the history of the dead man before us, whose life was one of brutality, of violence and murder-
These jars will remain here for your further inspection-
Thank you, gentlemen- The class is dismissed- Herr Victor Moritz-
Victor-
I'm so glad you've come- What is it, Elizabeth?
Oh, you've heard from Henry- Yes
- The first word in four months-
It just came-
Victor, you must help me- Of course I'll help you-
I'm afraid-
I've read this over and over again, but they're just words that I can't understand-
Listen-
"You must have faith in me, Elizabeth - Wait-"
"My work must come first, even before you-"
"At night, the winds howl in the mountains-"
"There is no one here-"
"Prying eyes can't peer into my secret-"
What can he mean?
What does he say then?
"I am living in an abandoned watchtower close to the town of Goldstadt-"
"Only my assistant is here to help me with my experiments-"
Oh - His experiments- Yes, that's what frightens me-
The day we announced our engagement, he told me of his experiments-
He said he was close to a discovery so terrific that he doubted his own sanity-
There was a strange look in his eyes- Some mystery-
His words carried me right away-
Of course, I've never doubted him- But still, I worry - I can't help it-
And now this letter - All this uncertainty can't go on - I must know-
Victor, have you seen him?
Yes - About three weeks ago-
I met him walking alone in the woods- He spoke to me of his work, too-
I asked him if I might visit his laboratory-
He just glared at me and said he would let no one go there-
His manner was very strange- Oh, what can we do?
If he should be ill! Now, don't worry-
I'll go to Dr Waldman, Henry's old professor in medical school-
Perhaps he can tell me more about all this-
Victor, you're a dear-
You know I'd go to the ends of the earth for you-
I shouldn't like that- I'm far too fond of you-
I wish you were-
Victor- I'm sorry-
Good night, Victor- And thank you - Thank you-
Good night - And don't worry - Promise?
Victor! What is it?
I'm coming with you- You can't!
I must - I'll be ready in a minute-
Herr Frankenstein is a most brilliant young man, yet so erratic-
He troubles me-
I'm worried about Henry- Why has he left the university?
He was doing so well and he seemed so happy with his work-
You know, his researches in the field of chemical galvanism and electrobiology were far in advance of our theories here at the university-
In fact, they had reached a most advanced stage-
They were becoming dangerous-
Herr Frankenstein is greatly changed-
You mean changed as a result of his work?
Yes - His work-
His insane ambition to create life-
Please tell us everything, whatever it is-
The bodies we use now, dissecting them for lecture purposes, were not perfect enough for his experiments, he said-
He wished us to supply him with other bodies, and we were not to be too particular as to where and how we got them-
I told him that his demands were unreasonable, and so he left the university to work unhampered-
He found what he needed elsewhere- Oh
- The bodies of animals-
Well, what are the lives of a few rabbits and dogs?
You do not quite get what I mean-
Herr Frankenstein was interested only in human life-
First to destroy it, then re-create it-
There you have his mad dream-
Can we go to him?
You will not be very welcome-
What does that matter?
I must see him-
Dr Waldman, you have influence with Henry - Won't you come with us?
I'm sorry, but Herr Frankenstein is no longer my pupil-
But he respects you- Won't you help us to take him away?
Very well, Fraulein- I've warned you-
But if you wish it, I will go- Fritz!
Have you finished those connections? Yes, they're done-
Well, come down, then, and help- We've lots to do- Look out!
If this storm develops as I hope, you will have plenty to be afraid of before the night's over-
Go on, fix the electrodes- This storm will be magnificent-
All the electrical secrets of heaven-
And this time we're ready- Hey, Fritz? Ready-
Why, what's the matter?
Look-
There's nothing to fear - Look-
No blood, no decay-
Just a few stitches-
And look - Here's the final touch-
The brain you stole, Fritz- Yes-
Think of it - the brain of a dead man waiting to live again in a body I made with my own hands-
With my own hands-
Let's have one final test- Throw the switches- Good-
In 15 minutes, the storm should be at its height-
Then we'll be ready- What's that?
There's someone there- Shh!
Quiet-
Send them away! Nobody must come here-
Here - Cover this-
Whoever it is, don't let them in-
Leave them to me-
Of all the times for anybody to come!
Now! I'll show them, messing about at this time of night - Got too much to do-
Wait a minute! All right, all right!
Wait a minute, I'm coming-
It's Dr Waldman, Fritz- You can't see him
You won't get in- Henry!
Frankenstein!
Henry! Frankenstein!
Open the door! Let us in!
You must leave me alone now-
It's Elizabeth!
What do you want?
Open the door!
You must leave me alone- At least give us shelter-
What's this nonsense of locked doors?
Henry!
Elizabeth, please, won't you go away?
Won't you trust me just for tonight?
You're ill - What's the matter?
Nothing - I'm quite all right - Truly I am-
Can't you see I mustn't be disturbed?
You'll ruin everything- My experiment is almost completed-
Wait a moment - I understand-
I believe in you- But I cannot leave you tonight-
You've got to leave!
Henry, you're inhuman - You're crazy!
Crazy, am I?
We'll see whether I'm crazy or not-
Come on up-
You're quite sure you want to come in?
Very well-
Forgive me, but I'm forced to take unusual precautions-
Sit down, please-
You too, Elizabeth - Please-
A moment ago, you said I was crazy-
Tomorrow, we'll see about that- Don't touch that! I'm sorry, Doctor, but I insist-
Doctor Waldman, I learnt a great deal from you at the university about the violet ray, the ultraviolet ray, which you said was the highest colour in the spectrum-
You were wrong-
Here, in this machinery, I have gone beyond that-
I have discovered the great ray that first brought life into the world-
Oh - And your proof?
Tonight you shall have your proof-
At first I experimented only with dead animals, and then a human heart, which I kept beating for three weeks-
But now I'm going to turn that ray on that body, and endow it with life-
And you really believe that you can bring life to the dead?
That body is not dead-
It has never lived-
I created it
- I made it with my own hands from the bodies I took from graves, from the gallows, anywhere-
Go and see for yourself- You too-
Dead, hey?
Quite a good scene, isn't it?
One man crazy, three very sane spectators- Yes!
Test the batteries-
Look - It's moving-
It's alive
- It's alive!
It's alive
- It's moving
- It's alive!
It's alive!
It's alive!
Now I know what it--- Henry is well, but he's very busy-
It's alive!
Henry, in the name of God!
In the name of God?
!
He said he would get in touch with you soon-
Don't worry about him, Baron- He'll be home in a few days-
You two have it all arranged, haven't you?
You think I'm an idiot, don't you?
But I'm not-
Anyone can see with half an eye that there's something wrong-
And I've two eyes, and pretty good ones at that-
Well, what is it?
You're quite mistaken, Baron-
What's the matter with my son?
What's he doing?
He's completing his experiments-
Why does he go messing around an old ruined windmill when he has a decent house, a bath, good food and drink, and a darned pretty girl to come back to?
Baron, you don't understand- I understand perfectly well-
There's another woman, and you're afraid to tell me-
Pretty sordid experiments these must be
- Huh!
Oh, but you're wrong! And how do you know?
If you please, Herr Baron, the burgomaster-
Well, tell him to go away- But he says it's important-
Nothing the burgomaster can say can be of the slightest importance-
Good day, Herr Baron - Fraulein-
Well, what do you want?
If it's trouble, go away- I've trouble enough-
Oh, there's no trouble, sir- What do you mean,"no trouble"?
There's nothing but trouble-
I brought you these flowers- Thank you, Herr Vogel-
Both in my private and official capacities as burgomaster---
Yes, yes, yes, we know all about that, but what do you want?
What I really want to know is when will the wedding be, if you please-
Unless Henry comes to his senses, there'll be no wedding at all-
But the village is already prepared- Well, tell them to unprepare-
But such a lovely bride---
Such a fine young man, the very image of his father-
Heaven forbid- But, sir, everything is ready!
I know that!
Don't keep on saying so, you idiot!
There's nothing to cry about-
Good day, Miss Elizabeth- Good day, Herr Moritz-
Good day, Herr Vogel-
Good day, Herr Baron-
And good riddance to you-
There you are - Huh! You see how it is-
The whole village is kept waiting, the bride is kept waiting, and I am kept waiting
- Henry must come home, if I have to fetch him myself-
No, no, Baron
- What about his work?
Stuff and nonsense- What about his wedding?
There is another woman--- and I'm going to find her- Come and sit down, Doctor-
You must be patient-
Do you expect perfection at once?
This creature of yours should be kept under guard-
Mark my words, he will prove dangerous-
Poor old Waldman-
Have you never wanted to do anything that was dangerous?
Where should we be if nobody tried to find out what lies beyond?
Have you never wanted to look beyond the clouds and the stars?
Or to know what causes the trees to bud?
And what changes the darkness into light?
But if you talk like that--- people call you crazy-
Well, if I could discover just one of these things - what eternity is, for example -
I wouldn't care if they did think I was crazy-
You're young, my friend- Your success has intoxicated you-
Wake up and look facts in the face!
Here we have a fiend whose brain---
Whose brain must be given time to develop-
It's a perfectly good brain, Doctor-
Well, you ought to know- It came from your own laboratory-
The brain that was stolen from my laboratory was a criminal brain-
Oh, well- After all, it's only a piece of dead tissue-
Only evil can come of it-
Your health will be ruined if you persist in this madness-
I'm astonishingly sane, Doctor-
You have created a monster and it will destroy you-
Patience, patience-
I believe in this monster, as you call it-
And if you don't, well, you must leave me alone-
But think of Elizabeth - Your father-
Elizabeth believes in me-
He never believes in anyone-
I've got to experiment further-
He's only a few days old, remember-
So far, he's been kept in complete darkness-
Wait till I bring him into the light- Here he comes
Come in-
Sit down
- Sit down!
It understands-
Watch-
Take care now, Frankenstein - Take care-
Shut out the light-
Sit down-
Go and sit down-
It understands this time
- It's wonderful- Frankenstein, where is it?
Aagh!
Quiet, you fool!
Get away with that torch-
It's a monster- Quiet
Fetch the rope, quick-
Stop pushing-
- Quiet!
Stop that! You'll have the whole countryside on us!
- Leave it alone- Listen
- What's that?
Who's there? It's Fritz! Come on, Doctor - Quick, hurry- Get back-
Come on, quickly- He hated Fritz- Fritz always tormented him-
Come, pull yourself together-
What can we do?
Kill it, as you would any savage animal-
We must overpower him first- Get me a hypodermic needle-
It's murder- It's our only chance-
- Hurry- Got it?
Yes, here it is-
Yes- Aagh!
You stand there - When he goes toward you, I will make the injection in his back-
Back! Dr Waldman
- Dr Waldman!
No, I'm all right - It's nothing-
See who's at the door-
Elizabeth and your father are coming to see you-
Keep them out- Too late!
They must not see that- Here, quick, give me a hand-
Quick!
Henry, hurry, get that blood off your face before your father and Elizabeth get here-
Well, er---
Pretty sort of place for my son to be in, I must say-
Is that the front door?
Yes, this is it-
Right-
I don't like it, but--- here goes- There doesn't seem to be anybody in the place-
God---
What a-- - What a forsaken place-
Are you trying to burn it down, eh?
What's that for, eh?
Well, what's the matter with you?
You look as if you've been kicked by a horse-
Why---
He can't be disturbed just now-
Oh, can't he? Huh!
I'll soon settle that nonsense-
Victor, where is he?
This place seems to drive everybody crazy-
Oh, heavens--
- What's that?
I beg your pardon - I am Dr Waldman-
Oh, are you?
I'm Baron Frankenstein-
Perhaps you know what all this tommyrot's about-
I--
- I'll be shot if I do!
I advise you to take Henry away from here at once-
Well, what do you suppose I'm here for?
Pleasure?
Nah-
Where are you, my dear?
Oh, there you are-
Let's see what's up the awful stairs-
I don't know how the deuce I'm going to get up 'em, but--- Leave them alone-
Henry- Elizabeth-
Victor!
Dr Waldman!
Come quickly-
My dear, what have they done to you?
Poor Fritz--
- It's all my fault---
Get him on the sofa-
Have you got any brandy?
Quick, quick, quick-
Here, I'll do that-
My boy--
- Now, now---
Now drink - Drink this-
There - There, that's better-
I'm going to take you home with me, Henry-
No, I can't - My work - What will happen to the records of my experiment?
We will preserve them- And---
I will see that it is painlessly destroyed-
Yes, yes - Leave it all to me-
Poor Fritz
- All my fault-
There, Henry- You can't do any more now-
You must come home until you get well again-
You'll soon feel better when you get out of here- It's like heaven being with you again-
Heaven wasn't so far away all the time, you know-
I know
- But I didn't realise it-
My work - Those horrible days and nights-
I couldn't think of anything else-
Henry, you're not to think of those things any more-
You promised- All right-
Let's think about us- When will our wedding be?
Let's make it soon-
As soon as you like-
For three generations, these orange blossoms have been worn at our weddings-
Your great-grandfather wore this, Henry-
Looks as good as new now, hey?
- Here is one to make the best man look still better- 30 years ago, I placed this on your mother's head, Henry-
Today, you'll make me very happy by doing the same for Elizabeth-
And I hope, in 30 years' time, a youngster of yours will be carrying on the tradition-
And now, how about a little drink, eh?
My grandfather bought this wine and laid it down-
My grandmother wouldn't let him drink it- Bless her heart-
Here's to your very good health-
Well, are you all full?
Yes? Come along-
Here's a health to a son of the House of Frankenstein-
A son to the House of Frankenstein-
Here's a jolly good health to young Frankenstein-
Young Frankenstein-
Give the servants some champagne- This stuff's wasted on 'em-
Well, well, well-
Go on, mop it up- It'll do you good- House of Frankenstein- To the House of Frankenstein-
Now then - Now be off about your business-
Listen to 'em!
The boys and girls of the village are out here- It's extraordinary how friendly you can make a lot of people on a couple of bottles of beer-
Tomorrow they'll all be fighting-
They're calling for you, Baron- Hey-ho-
Well, I suppose I'd better show myself- Quiet!
Thank you all very much indeed-
I'm very pleased to see you all, and I hope there's plenty of beer-
There's lots more where that came from- You stay here, Maria- I'll just take a look at my traps-
Then we'll go to the village and have a grand time, huh?
You won't be long, Daddy?
Oh, no-
If Franz comes by, tell him I'll be back soon-
Daddy, won't you stay and play with me a little while?
I'm too busy, darling-
You stay and play with the kitty, huh?
Bye, Daddy- Goodbye-
Be a good girl now-
Come on, kitty-
I'm Maria-
Will you play with me?
Would you like one of my flowers?
You have those, and I'll have these-
I can make a boat-
See how mine float?
No! Henry- Elizabeth!
No, you're hurting me!
How lovely you look- But you shouldn't be here-
I must see you for a minute-
What's the matter?
Could you leave us for a moment?
Why, of course-
Why, what is it?
I'm so glad you're safe-
Of course I'm safe-
But you look worried - Is anything wrong?
No, forget my foolishness-
It was just a mood- There's nothing the matter-
Of course there isn't!
Henry, I'm afraid - Terribly afraid-
Where is Dr Waldman?
Why is he late for the wedding?
He's always late - He'll be here soon-
Something is going to happen-
I feel it - I can't get it out of my mind-
You're just nervous-
All the excitement and preparation-
No - No, it isn't that - I've felt it all day-
Something is coming between us-
I know it
- I know it!
Sit down and rest - You look so tired-
If I could just save us from it- From what, dear?
From what?
If I could just get it out of my mind!
I'd die if I had to lose you now, Henry-
Lose me?
Why, I'll always be with you-
Will you, Henry?
I love you so-
Sure - How beautiful you look-
Henry!
What's that? !
Henry!
Dr Waldman!
What about Dr Waldman?
Henry, don't leave me!
No, darling, you stay here- Henry!
Dr Waldman's been murdered in the tower-
The monster-
He's been seen in the hills, terrorising the mountainside- He's in the house-
He's upstairs! It's in the cellars- It's Elizabeth!
Come on- Elizabeth!
That's Maria! Silence!
Don't let him come here- No, no, no, darling - It's all right-
Don't let him come here- It's all right, darling - It's all right-
Oh, look!
Silence!
Silence!
Maria
- She's drowned-
- But she has been murdered- Silence!
I'll see that justice is done-
How is Elizabeth now?
I don't know-
She's still in a daze - Just looks at me and says nothing - It's maddening-
Easy, old man - She'll be all right-
Our wedding day- Steady-
Your wedding will be postponed a day at most-
I wonder- What do you mean?
There can be no wedding while this horrible creation of mine is still alive-
I made him with these hands, and with these hands I will destroy him-
I must find him!
I'll go with you-
No - You stay here and look after Elizabeth-
In your care- Quiet!
Quiet!
Ludwig-
You will search the woods- Those are your group-
We'll get him!
Quiet!
Herr Frankenstein-
You will take to the mountains- Those are your people-
I-- - I will lead the third group by the lake-
And remember--- remember--- get him alive if you can, but get him!
Search every ravine, every crevasse, but the fiend must be found!
Are you ready?
Light your torches and go!
Frankenstein, mountains!
Ludwig!
Lake party, this way!
Come on, boys!
Keep together-
You search there- The rest, come with me- Look lively!
Herr Frankenstein! Come on, men!
Herr Frankenstein!
This way!
Which way did he go?
Which way did he go?
Tell me! Tell me!
Over there-
You stay here and take care of him-
The rest, follow me- Come on!
Come on, quick!
No, come back! Turn the hounds loose! There he is!
Herr Frankenstein!
Herr Frankenstein, where are you?
I think he's up there
- Come on, follow me-
Hello!
Fire
- Fire!
Help!
Listen- Help!
It's Frankenstein-
That way!
Come on, hurry!
Look, they're there!
The murderer-
He can't get away! Aaagh! Have you got it?
Frankenstein!
Frankenstein-
Bring him down to the village and let's take him home-
Burn the mill!
Burn the mill!
Come on, hurry- Quiet, quiet-
Well, go ahead and knock-
Well, well, well, what's all this?
What do you want, hey?
If you please, Herr Baron, we thought that Mr Henry could do with a glass of his great-grandmother's wine-
Fine old lady, my grandmother-
Very foreseeing of her to prevent my grandfather drinking this-
Mr Henry doesn't need this-
As I said before, I say again, here's to a son to the House of Frankenstein-
Yes, indeed, sir - We hope so, sir-
Just you wait a little while, The nasty man in black will come
Stop singing that awful song
Don't you hear me?
Always that awful song
Just you wait a little while, The nasty man in black will come
I told those kids to stop singing that awful song
But they keep singing it over and over
As if we haven't heard enough of that murderer
Oh, leave them be
If they're singing, at least we know they're okay
Yes, I guess you're right
10,000 Marks Reward WHO is THE MURDERER?
Since June 11, little KLAUS KLAWlTZKY and his sister KLARA have disappeared
Evidence leads us to believe the children were victims of a similar crime committed last fall against the DOERlNG sisters
What a pretty ball!
Elsie Beckmann
Did Elsie come with you?
No, she didn't
A thrilling new chapter!
Passionate, moving, sensational
Just a moment, Mr. Gehrke
-Tell me, Mr. Gehrke.
Have you seen Elsie?
Didn't she just come up the stairs?
No, she isn't here yet
She won't be long now. Good-bye, Mrs. Beckmann
Good-bye, Mr. Gehrke
Extra! Extra! Extra!
New crime!
Because the police have not published my first letter
I am writing today directly to the NEWSPAPERS
Continue your investigations
Everything will happen just as I have told you.
10,000 MARKS REWARD Who is the murderer?
Christ! Here we go again.
It's horrible 10,000 Marks The lettering is too small
We can't read it
Hey, you, read it out loud
-"The unknown murderer".
-Let him read! Hey! Quiet!
"The terror in our town has found a new..."
Certain evidence leads us to believe that the murderer is the same one who has already killed eight children
We must remind you again that a mother's first duty is to guard her children from the danger which always threatens
Also, the danger is often hidden in some attractive bait
Candy, a toy, and fruit can be the murderer's weapons
True, true!
Come on! Come on! Read, read on
Okay, okay. "The anxiety of the general public is very high because the police have not yet completed their investigations
But the police are faced with an almost impossible problem."
"The criminal has left no clue. Who is the murderer?"
What is he like?
Where is he hiding?
No one knows. Still, he is one of us
Is it your neighbor?
Yes, that's right
Why look at me when you say that?
-You know very well. -What do I know very well?
-Think about it. -What are you saying?
I saw you go up those stairs behind that little girl
You are crazy, you dirty swine!
Who's a swine?
Or a man who chases little girls?
You bastard!
Gentlemen! Gentlemen!
I'll see you in court. I'll see you in court
Now, now, gentlemen!
Slanderer!
Trying to ruin my reputation
Slanderer! Terrible man!
The police listen to him! They're searching my house!
How awful! What a shame!
Searching a man's house because of an anonymous letter
Mr. Jager, calm down! We're only doing our job
When we are so upset?
Scared about the children
Look, that's why the police must follow every clue
Any man in the street could be the guilty one
Can you please tell me what time it is?
Yes, my child
Now, my child, go home. Where do you live?
What's it to you where the kid lives?
Why were you bothering that kid?
But - but
- I did nothing!
What do you want with me?
Just you wait and see
Let me go! It's an outrage!
-It's an outrage!
Don't get so excited
Punch him in the face!
-Bothering children. -Acting like a big shot!
Let me go! I did nothing!
You wanted to get her alone, didn't you?
Yes, then kill her like all the others, right?
It's the murderer! It's him! Hold him!
No police around when you need them. Officer, officer!
Move along please, move along now. Don't block!
You can catch pickpockets but you'd better get the murderer
Is he the murderer?
Move along now.
Come on, get a move on
MURDERER writes TO NEWSPAPERS
It's a terrible scandal
This will have a bad effect on public opinion, lnspector.
But, sir, we cannot stop the murderer from writing letters!
This man is a mental case
He gets a kick from seeing himself in the papers
We immediately got in touch with the newspaper
They sent us the original letter. The lab is working on it
Of course, you can't get good fingerprints from a postcard which went through so many hands
We'll compare the results with our archives
We must try everything to find a clue or a lead
Then, we'll send the letter to the graphologist
The very particular shape of the letters... do you follow me?
indicates in this man a very strong and pathological sexuality
Some of the broken letters reveal an actor's personality which can be indolent or even lazy
In the whole, the handwriting shows clear signs of insanity
Yes, lnspector, certainly. You and your men are very good
But, nevertheless, results, we must have results
Results!
Minister, my men are only getting 12 hours sleep a week as well as searches on the spot, Minister
They start their shift already tired
Don't forget, this job is nervously trying especially when the success rate is so low
The homicide officers work restlessly
They're always on alert following any clue, even the slightest one that may lead us to our man
Minister, consider their findings on the scene of the crime
We find, for instance, behind a hedge a little white paper bag
Clearly it held the candy
In a corner, we found some crumbs and some sugar grains
Within a radius of 2 kilometers, we have searched in all the candy shops to find out where the bag came from
But in vain
Every day the search widens
but, of course, no one remembers anything
Nevertheless, we keep on searching, getting nowhere without much hope of finding a solution.
What good is that?
I know you're trying but an unknown murderer terrorizes the town
A town of four million and your police are failing
Minister, you don't seem to understand the difficulties
Only on the way home of the missing child we got fifteen different testimonies
Just listen: "Testimony 1478 in the Beckmann murder case..."
-You know nothing. -More than you, Sir!
Gentlemen!
Can't you agree what color hat that little girl wore when you saw her?
Of course, lnspector, it was red
-lnspector, it was green.
-lt was a red hat!
It was a green hat!
Stop! It's hopeless.
Thank you, gentlemen
-Of course, lnspector if you listen to a color-blind man!
The police have investigated over 1,500 clues
Documents fill 60 volumes.
We have all available men
We have systematically combed all adjoining areas
Every thicket, every piece of undergrowth, every bush in every hole, we might find something
We sent out police dogs. The best trackers are on the scent to no avail.
Since the murderer's first crime police have inspected all the flop-houses every night and checked the identity of every vagrant
Such measures hurt our popularity and make people nervous
But we watch all railway stations and raid the underworld hangouts
Despite all this, the police haven't succeeded in finding anything
The police.
Let me go, you dirty bastard!
Please let me go, won't you?
You son of a bitch! Let go!
Let her go, you filthy pig!
Quiet!
The head cop!
You'd like that, wouldn't you?
Police orders: nobody leaves.
Get your papers ready
Quiet! C'mon kids, let's not be stupid
It's Fatty Lohmann!
Loh-mann, Loh-mann, Loh-mann!
Loh-mann! Loh-mann!
Quiet! Quiet!
You'll wear yourselves out
It would be better if you got the murderer
Yes! Much better!
Quiet!
Be reasonable!
Spread out. All of you spread out.
C'mon, papers out!
-I haven't got any. -Show me your papers
Please let me go, lnspector
Show me your papers
-I think we know each other. -Yes, we do
To the headquarters!
With all this mess, not a client!
Don't make any trouble. No papers and you go to headquarters
I am innocent
Don't talk nonsense
Quiet! Show me your papers
Don't push. It's everybody's turn
-Have you got your papers?
-I can't go around with my birth certificate.
That's asking too much
-Don't mess with me. -That's asking too much, lnspector
Headquarters for you
Look here, it's disgusting
Poor workmanship, old boy. You've had it. To headquarters
Better luck next time, Willie
Shut your face!
Next
Fancy boy
Pop Lohmann's got him
"Unsolved burglary at a fur shop."
Well, I guess I'd better take you down to headquarters
But... my papers are in order
No luck, huh?
Papers
I have none
Headquarters
No luck
Next, come on, let's go
This is wrecking our business, Sarge, trouble every night
You can't have ten minutes peace anymore.
Give us a break!
It's no joke for us either, out every night
Of course, but you're drivin' away my clientele and the guy you're looking for ain't here
Do you know how mad everyone is about this guy who's causing a raid every night?
'Specially the girls.
Sure, they solicit but believe me, everyone is a little mother at heart
I know a lot of crooks, get sort of tender when they see kids
If they catch that bastard they'll wring his neck
Ready to go, Sarge?
So it's the Crocodile tonight. Two loads for the nick
What's keeping Schranker?
Is it three o'clock yet?
I'll find out
Hello, the exact time, please.
Two minutes to three
There are more police on the street tonight than whores
Wherever you spit, cops
Even when you've got a broad, they don't leave you alone
They've gone nuts. All they think about is the murderer
I have a little six-year-old and every night I have to look under the bed and in the closet to see if the murderer is hiding there
You can't even do your job. The police are everywhere
There's no privacy anymore.
I'm fed up with it
Tell us something new
What's keeping Schranker?
Maybe he's been caught
Not him. He did a bank job in London. Scotland Yard trapped him
There he was, hands up, back to the wall, millions of cops around two seconds later there were two corpses and he'd beat it!
The best man between Berlin and San Francisco
Six years they've looked and they haven't caught him yet
Haven't caught him yet, but dogs can kill wolves
Shut up
The suspense is killing me. He's always right on time
God be praised!
At last!
Well, hello! You've finally come. Good afternoon
Are you crazy?
Close the curtains
Gentlemen, the meeting can now begin
According to regulations, I confirm that the leadership of every organization in our union is represented
I assume you are all authorized to vote on behalf of your members
Good. Let's not be held up by procedure
We all know why we are here.
Some non-member is screwing up our affairs.
Daily raids by the police for the child murderer interfere with our business.
We can't put up with this pressure any longer in every hotel, cafe or pad
This state of affairs must not be allowed to continue
We have to put things right again or we'll all be ruined
Our funds are exhausted.
We'll have to use money allocated for our colleagues' wives who are being "hosted" by the state
Furthermore, our reputation is suffering
Gentlemen, the cops are looking for the murderer in our ranks!
When I run into a cop while on business, he knows the risk and so do I.
If one of us dies, OK, that's a risk one takes
It can happen. But you and I are not on the level of this murderer
Absolutely!
We are doing our job, we have to make a living
But this monster has no right to live. He must disappear!
He must be eliminated, without pity, without scruples
Gentlemen, our members have to carry on normal business without being handicapped by nervous policemen
I ask you for advice
I suggest a closer watch on lD cards, systematic searches and police raids.
More raids, and much tougher ones
Spies. We need spies among the police to give us warnings
The girls must take a little more notice of the cops
We get into trouble because one of the girls has talked too much to her cop boyfriend.
Now the girls have to tell us what gives
We must be allowed to search any house, apartment, back yard in order to find a clue
We have contacts, we have to make a statement to the press we have to tell them that we condemn the bastard too
We should make it known that he isn't in the underworld
I'm sure it's a man who looks like he wouldn't hurt a fly
In his normal state, he might even play marbles with the kids or cards with his wife.
Otherwise, murderers like Grossmann or Haarmann couldn't live for years like they did without their neighbors suspecting them at all
We have to get that across to the public. They must help
Don't talk to me about the public helping.
It disgusts me just to hear them talk.
Excuse me, Chief!
But it's the truth. Christ! Help from the public brings no clues!
Just a pile of letters with the most incredible accusations!
Quite true
Calls to the police the moment a garbage man crosses a yard!
But when we need accurate information, they can't remember!
They've seen nothing. That's help from the public for you
You're exaggerating a little, Lohmann
No, he isn't
Most of the people don't feel concerned
The majority of them doesn't realize that a child disappearance is also their problem
I've got an idea!
Let's get one of those guys, a telepath one who finds handkerchiefs and pocketbooks that have been hidden
I don't think the reward is enough
Chief, we have to offer a real fortune for the murderer
None of this is getting us anywhere
-That won't do any good. -What's your idea?
Well, we just can't wait until the police decide to arrest the fellow
The difficulty in solving crimes like this comes from the fact that the criminal and the victim are connected only by chance
An instantaneous impulse is the killer's only motive
We find the victim, we identify him, then we find out when he was last seen.
Then, nothing more
Children disappear and you know what state we find them in
if we find them
And the killer... as we know, in this kind of crime never leaves a mark behind
This is what makes our job so hard and our success so rare
The police have been looking for eight months
Now, they'll catch him only by luck
-We can't wait for that. -We'll be ruined before then
Then what will we do?
We'll have to catch him ourselves
Yes! We must. That's it
There is still one possible way!
The guilty man must have a record somewhere.
A man that disturbed must have come upon the law before.
We've got to contact every clinic every prison, every asylum.
We'll have to make inquiries about everyone freed as harmless but with the same pathological condition as the killer
Every square foot must be permanently watched
From now on, no child takes a step without us being warned
OK, but how do we do it?
There must be people who can go everywhere, not be noticed who can follow children without arousing suspicion who can follow children right up to their front doors
People no one would suspect
But who?
People like that don't exist. Who could do it?
Who?
The beggars. The beggars' union can do it
-Sausage going up. -God! This cheese smells good
That finishes you
Stop snoring!
You'll wake up the lice
2, 4, 6, 8, 10, 12, 14, 16
Now we must take the back yards
Yes, from number 1 to 88
Next
You are responsible for the courtyards in every block, 1 to 88
Right!
-What's next?
-89 to 196 High Street 89 to 196 High Street.
What's your union number?
3, 7, 95, Emil Dustermann 3, 7, 95, Dustermann, Emil
There you are, Emil. Maybe you'll win 15,000
Touch wood!
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen
"When searching homes, we must look for any clue which could establish where the murderer's letter to the papers originated
If there is an old wooden table, if there is a red pencil or writing paper of the same type.
Inquiries must be discreet." Idiot
And here's a list of mental patients who have been let out as cured or harmless in the last five years
Reports from every institute, private and public
And that's a list of their present addresses
Good morning
Does a Mr. Beckert live here?
Does Mr. Beckert live here?
I'm afraid I can't hear you. I'm a bit hard of hearing
As if I couldn't tell. Does Mr. Beckert live here?
Oh, Mr. Beckert... Yes...
But he has just gone out
Too bad, I wanted to see him
I'm from the income Tax office
Oh, good God! Tax people?
Would you like to wait?
Yes, thank you
-Please take a seat. -Thank you
Like something to read?
Thank you. You're most kind
Tell me, Mrs. Winkler, does Mr. Beckert take this paper?
Mr. Beckert?
No, he always borrows mine
Mom! I was looking for you
You don't have to do this! You know why
Good evening. What would you like?
Coffee
No... a vermouth... no, a brandy
There you are
Another one
The bill!
Two brandies. 1.65, please
Thank you very much
Number 24:
Beckert.
He does not take the Courier
A walnut table with a cloth. No red pencil or traces of one
No writing paper.
In the waste basket, a printed ad and a postcard with flowers and "Regards, Paul" on it but no address of sender.
An empty cigarette pack Ariston brand, a bag of candy with the candy store name on it
Wait a moment...
Ariston, did you say?
Ar-is-ton...
That rings a bell...
Ariston
Hello. Get me the file on the Marga Perl murder.
Hurry
That's funny. I've heard that before
It was... it was...
Henry!
Listen a moment. Someone whistling. Can you hear him?
There
He's just stopped.
Did you see him, the guy who was whistling?
-Yes, I can still see him. -Yes? Yes.
He's talking to a little girl and walking her down the street
-After him and don't let him go! -But why?
The day Elsie Beckmann was killed, someone bought a balloon
He was with a little girl and he whistled just like that!
Damn it, man! Are you crazy throwing peels on the ground?
I might have broken my neck! Unbelievable
I should report you to the police, you're a menace to the public
Uncle
They found three cigarettes butts at the scene of the crime.
Aristons!
Yes, the cigarettes are the same, but there's no old wooden table
Of course, he could have written that letter somewhere else
Heavens, the windowsill!
You're right
Just a minute
A red pencil!
God, at last we're getting somewhere
Yes, yes, what?
They have his trial!
-Have they found him?
-The beggars found him
-He was talking to a little girl. -They put a mark on him
Can't you be quiet?
What's that?
They are following the sign. He isn't out of sight for a second
He's being watched
-What is it?
You're all dirty
There, on your shoulder
Here, I'll wipe it off
-What's the matter?
-Come on, let's go
He hasn't come out yet or we would have seen him
He must be in the courtyard, he didn't come out this way
He must be somewhere
Maybe he's hiding inside the building
Closing time!
He mustn't get out with everyone leaving
Christ!
Here come the first ones already
Let's go out in the street
Keep a sharp lookout
Turn off the light or he'll suspect something when he comes back
What time is it?
Nearly 6:30
He must still be in the building, anyway, he didn't come out
Ok, Ok, yes... No, just a moment
The beggars have gone for more help to search the whole area
The murderer must still be in the building
What sort of place is it?
Nothing but offices. I don't know what's in the cellar
There's a branch of the savings bank on the ground floor and from the first to the fifth, nothing but offices above that are lofts
Look at that. It ain't possible
Anyone there?
What next?
Damn carelessness, all that trouble for one door
Yes, good
Looks like that guy is really cornered now
I think we should tip off the cops right away -I agree.
-Now then, listen carefully Hello.
Just a moment. What?
Ok, call me right back
What's the matter?
Are you crazy or something?
The police?
We're going to get that guy ourselves
Listen... now, the time is
8:00
Good. Then at 9:00, 10:00, 11:00!
Good evening. Did you know your gates are not closed?
But that's impossible!
I've only just... But it is
Open up, and no noise!
Are you going to open up?
Come on, get it open
Get a move on!
How many watchmen are there in the building?
Ok, so you don't want to answer?
There are two watchmen on their rounds
Bloody hell!
Damn it
Careful with the lights. And don't walk like elephants
-What's the story?
-He isn't in the basement.
We went through it and found nothing
Friede and Auguste are still going through the boiler rooms
Wait
That's the last one
Go on, get a move on!
Schranker sent me
Good. Listen carefully
It's a new type of time switch
Here's a general plan here.
If the time switches aren't set they automatically go off at the nearest police station. Get it?
Have you got it?
What do you think I am, some kind of a nut?
-He isn't in the boiler room. -Fine
We moved all the coal
Are you nuts?
What if the door is wired up? Want to get the police here?
Well, we have to get in if we're going to search the whole place
But not by the door, you ass! Use the office on the floor above
Go through the ceiling
Right, let's go
Hey! What's up?
Hey! Answer me. What's happening?
Paul - tell us
I heard some banging!
-What did you say?
-What's the hurry?
He's in the attic! I heard him knocking.
He's in the attic!
Keep quiet
Get on with it, then
He must be there
There's the switch
Force the locks
Hurry up!
I've got him.
He's in the attic
I heard someone hammer I told Schranker immediately
He's up there with 8 men.
They'll get him any moment
I just came down to tell you
If I hadn't been alert, we'd have looked for him for hours
Look out!
The watchman!
3... 1... 4 314
Let's get out of here!
The cops will be here any moment.
The watchman rung in
Stop! Quiet! We've got 5 more minutes and 6 more compartments to search.
Carry on. Get on with it. Only hurry!
Out of the way.
You can't do it that way
He's not in here
Next door!
Quicker
Not here either
Come on, keep it up!
Quick!
We've only got about 3 minutes left
Hurry up!
Quickly!
This one hasn't got a padlock, he must be here.
It's locked from the inside, let me do it!
Hurry up, only one minute left!
Here he is, here he is, the dirty bastard!
Get going, hurry up - Everybody out!
Go on - move!
Hurry up, quickly!
Christ! Get out while you can, you fool!
-Anybody left?
-A few up top, they're on the way
No reason for you to wait for them.
With or without that guy
It doesn't matter, get away.
What are they up to?
Christ!
Bloody hell! At last! Thank God!
Hey! He's not down here. Who's pulled up the ladder?
Who's pulled up the ladder?
Bunch of morons
Hands up
How can I put my hands up when I'm trying to hang onto the ladder?
Get out of there
For once, I'm innocent
As a newborn babe
Well, then everything is in order. I can leave then
One minute
Cigarette?
Oh, boy
I'll take your word for it
On condition you tell me who was the man you were looking for and found there?
I don't understand, lnspector. A man, you said?
I know nothing about that. There must be some mistake
I know nothing, nothing at all
Only I don't understand why you are covering up for the gang who left you in the lurch.
Funny friends!
Leaving you right in it and running off.
That won't wash with me, lnspector
After all, I'm not risking very much
Maybe a little bit of damage.
But nothing was stolen
Of course, something was stolen.
Stolen? How much?
If you talk, I'll tell you
I've already told you, I don't know anything
All right. Well, think about it.
It's amazing what one remembers when one is left alone for an hour or two
Take him away!
Send the night watchman in here
Get the watchman Damowitz
Sit down
Now then, you said in your statement - Listen carefully
You may have to repeat it under oath
You clearly heard one of the burglars say to another, "we've found him
I've discovered the guy. He's in the attic." Is that correct?
Yes, lnspector. Yes, I'll swear to whatever you want
Right. You may go home now.
But please be ready to testify
Of course, lnspector. Good day, lnspector
Tell me, is Inspector Lohmann in the building?
He's talking to someone?
No, it doesn't matter.
I'll come up
Hasn't come in yet. You're watching Mrs. Winkler?
Come in
We've surrounded the whole block
If he wanted to get home, he'd run into us
Now you have to wait
I'll be in my office if you have some news
Hell...
I wanted to ask you a favor
Disgusting
I wanted to ask you
Anyway, read a bit of that
-Reports?
-Yes
Burglary in an office block
Bennostrasse?
That's a very quiet neighborhood
Perhaps it's not as quiet as all that
Hell, this is becoming serious
Did they intend to empty the whole place, then?
What can they have been looking for in the coal?
Look at that.
It's incredible
Good Lord!
This is madness!
Ah, now it makes sense. They were after the safe
Good God! What's it all about?
I don't understand it at all
They haven't even attacked that one.
Well, I'll be damned!
Well, what have you got to say?
Nothing stolen, but a man taken
Fantastic!
And Franz the burglar was arrested.
Isn't talking
Frightened, evidently.
Actually, I know him well
He's one who'd rather jump from the fifth floor than get mixed up in a murder
Could we set a trap for him?
Could you help me, Lohmann?
I see what you're getting at
You're wanted for questioning
Four people for me?
Come on
The murder squad? Inspector Karl Lohmann
What do you want with me?
What's the murder squad want?
Yes, old boy, your case has been passed over to me now
What for?
You did your work a little too well
One of the watchmen
Planning and assisting with a murder. It's a bad show, Franz
I can't go on with it.
I don't want to have anything to do with it
I'll tell you everything, everything I know
Very wise, but unfortunately too late
Inspector, it can't be too late...
Please, lnspector
It isn't possible! Listen, I'm going to tell you everything
Even who we were looking for in that damn building
Well, then
The child murderer
The child murderer, lnspector
Wait
This had to happen to me!
Of all people
Now, we're going to have a little talk
If you want to, lnspector
And mind you, don't lie.
OK, let's start
What have you do to with the murderer, and where'd you take him?
Well, lnspector, you know the old distillery of Kuntz and Levy?
-The one that went bankrupt?
-Yes.
Since then the building's been abandoned and nobody cares
Let me go! Let me go!
I've done nothing to you, let me go, you swine!
What do you bastards want with me?
Help! Let me go.
I want to get out.
Get me out of here
Let me out!
You will not get out of here
But gentlemen, I don't even know what you want me for
I beg you, set me free. There must be some mistake
No, no. No mistake. Impossible.
No mistake
Do you recognize it?
It's a balloon like the one you gave
little Elsie Beckmann!
A balloon like that
Where did you bury little Martha?
But I never...
I never even knew her
You never knew her?
And what about this one?
And this one?
You didn't know this one either, huh?
Stop him, stop him...
Don't let him get away
You have no right to treat me this way!
We'll show you what right we have!
You have no right to hold me here
Right?
Someone like you has no rights.
Yes, kill him!
We must treat him like a mad dog.
Crush him!
You talk of rights. You will get your rights
We are all law experts here
from 6 weeks in Tegel prison to 15 years in Brandenburg
You will get your rights, you will even get a lawyer
Everything will be done according to the rule of law
A lawyer?
I don't need a lawyer
Who is accusing me?
You, maybe?
Just a moment.
If I were you, sir, I'd keep quiet
Your life's at stake, in case you didn't know it
I have the dubious honor of being your defense counsel
But I'm afraid it won't be much use to you
But, but...
Do you want to kill me?
Murder me, just like that?
We just want to render you harmless
But you'll only be that way when you are dead
But if you kill me, it'll be cold-blooded murder!
I demand that you hand me over to the police
I demand to be handed over to the jurisdiction of common law
That would suit you, wouldn't it?
Then you'll invoke paragraph 51
And spend the rest of your life in an institution at state expense
And then you'd escape, or else get a pardon, then there you are, free as air, with a law-protected pass because of mental illness, off again, chasing little girls
We're not going to let that happen
We must make you powerless.
You must disappear
Yes, disappear!
I can't help what I do
I can't help it, I can't...
The old story, we never can help it in court
What do you know about it?
Who are you anyway?
Criminals?
Are you proud of yourselves?
Proud of breaking safes or cheating at cards?
Things you could just as well keep your fingers off
You wouldn't need to do all that if you'd learn a proper trade or if you'd work.
If you weren't a bunch of lazy bastards
But I...
I can't help myself!
I have no control over this this evil thing inside me, the fire, the voices, the torment!
You mean to say that you have to murder?
It's there all the time, driving me out to wander the streets following me, silently, but I can feel it there
It's me, pursuing myself
I want to escape, to escape from myself! But it's impossible
I can't escape. I have to obey it.
I have to run... endless streets
I want to escape, to get away
And I'm pursued by ghosts.
Ghosts of mothers
And of those children...
They never leave me
They are there, always there...
Always, except when I do it
When I...
Then I can't remember anything
And afterwards I see those posters and read what I've done
Did I do that?
But I can't remember anything about it
But who will believe me?
Who knows what it's like to be me?
How I'm forced to act...
How I must...
Must...
Don't want to
Must! Don't want to, but must!
And then... a voice screams
I can't bear to hear it
I can't go on
The accused has said that he cannot help himself
That is to say, he has to murder. As this is the case he has pronounced his own death sentence
Someone who admits to being a compulsive murderer should be snuffed out, like a candle
This man must be wiped out, eliminated
Perfect! Just what I think!
I wish to speak
The defense lawyer will speak
Our very honorable president, who is, I believe, wanted by the police for three murders -
That's got nothing to do with it ...claims that because my client acts under an irresistible impulse he is condemned to death
He is right!
He is mistaken. Because it is that very fact that clears him
Just a minute, enough!
Mad old drunk!
Is this very obsession which makes my client not responsible
And nobody can be punished for something he can't help
-Ridiculous!
-Do you suggest that this brute should get off?
I mean this man is sick.
A sick man should be handed over not to the executioner, but to the doctor
Can you promise he'd be cured?
What use are asylums, then?
And what would happen if he escaped?
Yes. Or if they released him as harmless?
And what if the compulsion to kill returns?
Another man-hunt for months
Paragraph 51 again. The asylum, then another escape or release
Then the compulsion all over again, and so on, and on
No one can kill a man who isn't responsible for his actions
Not the state, and certainly not you
The state must see that this man becomes harmless and no longer is a danger to his fellow citizens
You've never had children, huh?
So you haven't lost any
But if you knew what it's like to lose one...
Go ask the parents!
Ask them what those days and nights were like when they didn't know what had happened.
And then when they finally knew
-Ask the mothers!
-She's right!
Do you think they'll have mercy?
-She's right.
-I'll say she is
-No mercy!
No pardon!
-Give the murderer to us
Kill the beast!
-Crush the brute!
-Kill him! Beat him!
All that won't silence me
I won't allow a crime to be committed in my presence
I demand that this man... that this man be granted the protection of the law
I demand that this man be handed over to the police
-To the police!
-Filthy stooge
In the name of the law
In the name of the people
This won't bring back our children
We, too, should keep a closer watch on our children
This way?
- What can I do for you?
- I'd Iike to see Mr Hardy.
oliver NorviIIe Hardy.
Room 1 4. Next to the solarium.
Thank you, Doctor.
Did you wish to see someone?
- I want to see Mr Hardy.
- Oh, he's in room 1 4 on the top floor.
could you tell me where room 1 4 is, please?
Right down to the end of the hall.
Is that the room next to the aquarium?
Aquarium?
Oh, you mean the solarium!
How do you feel?
Fine.
I didn't expect to see you here today.
well, I didn't have anything else to do, so I thought I'd drop in and see you.
You're welcome.
What have you got there?
I brought you some hard-boiIed eggs and some nuts.
Now, you know I can't eat hard-boiIed eggs and nuts.
If you wanted to bring something, why not bring a box of candy?
They cost too much.
What has that got to do with it?
You didn't pay me for the Iast box I brought you.
- Have one? - No.
I'd rather not.
Hard-boiIed eggs and nuts!
Don't put your hand in there, I have to drink that water!
Good morning, good morning, good morning!
And how is my little patient today?
Just fine, thank you, Doctor.
This is my friend Mr laurel.
I hope I find you well.
Thank you, ma'am.
See...
Miss Smith, give this to the patient in room 22.
Yes, ma'am.
How long do you think I'II be in here?
(Doctor) Oh, at Ieast a couple of months.
(OIIie) Gee, that's great. This is the first time I've had such a wonderful rest.
Put that down!
Oh! Oh! Get me...
Get me down! Oh! Oh!
help! Get me down! Oh!
Oh, my leg! Aah! Oh!
Oh, my leg!
Oh!
Oh, my...
Oh, my leg! Get me down!
Hey!
Hey, do something to help me!
- (yells)
- Aah! Get me down!
(OIIie, yelling) Don't let go! Look out, hold it!
Oh-ho!
Get me...!
Oh!
Hey, do something to help!
(OIIie) Don't let go!
Don't let go!
Put that there.
Look what you've done!
Why, Doctor!
You may go.
Get out of here!
Most embarrassing!
As for you, get your clothes on and get out of here at once! Do you understand?
You had nothing else to do, so you thought you'd come around and see me.
Here I was for the first time in my Iife, having a nice, peaceful time,
and you had to come and spoil it.
Get my clothes.
You know you can't get them over that foot!
Get the scissors and cut the leg off.
The leg of the pants!
Get me the scissors.
Hind to front.
congratulate me, Hardy, old thing.
The doctor says I may go home.
That's great.
I'm going home too.
How perfectly ripping!
Oh-ho-ho!
Give me those scissors!
I'm all a-fIutter.
- Hardy, old bean, what do you think?
- What?
I have on your trousers by mistake.
Oh, I say!
Miss wallace, will you refill this, please?
The visitor in room 1 4 sat on it.
He'II sleep for a month.
Wait a minute.
I'II drive.
I'II stay right here.
well, well?
Come on, Iet's get going.
Just there...!
Oh!
Why don't you watch that...!
Mind that one.
Keep on that side.
Look thataway!
Brake!
Turn around there.
- (Horn blaring) - Look where you're going!
Aaah!
Get that car out of here!
Get that thing out of here and pull over there.
I wanna talk to you!
pull over there!
We didn't lie to you, folks.
We told you we had living, breathing monstrosities.
You laughed at them, shuddered at them... and yet, but for the accident of birth... you might be even as they are.
They did not ask to be brought into the world... but into the world they came.
Their code is a law unto themselves.
Offend one... and you offend them all.
And now, folks, if you'll just step this way... you are about to witness the most amazing... the most astounding living monstrosity... of all time.
Friends... she was once a beautiful woman.
A royal prince shot himself for love of her.
She was known as the peacock of the air.
She's the most beautiful big woman I have ever seen.
Why, Hans, how you talk.
I should be jealous pretty soon.
- Don't be silly. - Don't be silly?
I've seen these women making eyes at my Hans.
Of course, I ain't jealous.
Frieda, my dear...
I have eyes for only one woman... the woman I asked to be my wife.
Fräulein Frieda?
Are you laughing at me?
- Why, no, monsieur. - Thanks.
- Why should I laugh at you?
- Most big people do.
They don't realize I'm a man with the same feelings they have.
You are so kind, monsieur.
- Nice. - Don't.
You must come to see me sometime, and we'll have a little wine together.
Thank you, Fräulein Cleo.
You're getting old, Jean.
Probably, last night you had too heavy a dinner, and now your imagination is...
But, Monsieur Duval, at first I could not believe my own eyes.
A lot of horrible, twisted things, you know, crawling, whining, laughing...
Be done, Jean.
What were you drinking last night?
Nothing, monsieur, I assure you.
Monsieur, there must be a law in France to smother such things at birth...
- or lock them up. - All right, Jean.
If there's anything like you say on my grounds, we'll have it removed.
- Come on, let's go. - All of you!
Tout de suite!
Go away, all of you!
Don't you know trespassing is the same as stealing?
I'm sorry, monsieur.
I am Madame Tetrallini.
These children are in my circus.
Children?
They're monsters.
Your circus. I understand.
So you see, monsieur, when I get a chance...
I like to take them into the sunshine... and let them play like... children.
That is what most of them are.
Children.
Please forget what was said, madame.
You are welcome to remain.
Au revoir.
Come, Jean.
Thanks a thousand, monsieur.
A thousand thanks, monsieur.
Shame!
How many times have I told you not to be frightened?
Have I not told you...
God looks after all his children?
- Good evening, Madame Tetrallini. - How are you, Madame Tetrallini?
Big crowd tonight.
There she goes, taking them out to exercise.
Nurse to a lot of mangy freaks.
"Just as they are represented on the banners...
"you will see them on the inside.
"Living, breathing monstrosities.
"Josephine Joseph, half-woman, half-man."
Have a cigar, Joseph.
You dropped your lipstick, Josephine.
Don't get her sore, or he'll bust you in the nose.
Hurry up.
That's a boy.
You're all wrong.
I didn't do it.
What are you trying to do, be funny?
You just don't understand.
A Roman lady...
Getting off the bull and scratching yourself.
Can't a Roman lady itch?
- Why don't you take a bath?
- I did, but it's the bull that needs the bath.
I think she likes you... but he don't.
Those flowers you sent to me, they were beautiful.
But not much beautiful as you.
And Hans, I don't like to ask... but may I have the loan of another 1,000 francs... until my money from Paris arrives?
- With pleasure, Fräulein. - Thank you.
I'll bring it to your wagon tonight.
Forget it.
- Maybe I was just fooling. - Fooling?
"Come, little girl, I want to take care of you."
And I fell for that.
So, you're quitting.
Is that it?
Maybe I'm only fooling.
You are not quitting me!
Because I'm kicking you out!
No, you don't.
I gave you this.
Why, you cheap...
Don't you come around crying tonight, trying to get back in.
I'm through wasting my time and money... on things like you.
Yes. Your time, but my money.
Ungrateful little tramp.
That is fine.
What are you staring at?
Didn't you ever see a lady move before?
I guess you've been listening to every word he said.
That's it.
Go ahead and laugh.
It's funny, ain't it?
Yeah. Women are funny, ain't they?
They're all tramps, ain't they?
Except when you can get money from them.
I'll be...
Who do you think you are, shooting off your head?
This is Phroso you're talking to.
Not any of those thugs you've been chasing around with.
- Now, you listen to me. - I didn't mean you.
- I had to take it out on somebody. - Yeah, you dames are all alike.
You're sharpshooting, you're cheap... and how you squeal when you get what's coming to you.
Easy, kid.
Cut it!
It's my own fault.
What gets me so cockeyed sore at myself... is that I fell for that big hunk of beef.
So you finally got wise to yourself, did you?
The funny thing about you women is most of you don't get wise soon enough.
You wait until you're so old, nobody wants you.
Nobody does, most of the time.
You ought to be tickled to death you're washed-up with him.
You're not so hard to look at.
Give yourself a tumble. You'll make the grade.
- Your breaks is coming. - Coming?
Gone, you mean.
Now you'll sit there feeling sorry for yourself.
No, I ain't.
Don't you ever accuse me of that.
But one thing, don't go out filling your hide with booze, celebrating... 'cause fun what's got that way never done no one no good.
Get me?
I got you.
You're a pretty good kid.
You're darn right I am.
You should have caught me before my operation.
- Hello, Phroso. - Well, well, well.
- Tomorrow night's the big night, Daisy?
- Yes, the sister's getting married.
- And I'm thrilled to death. - She thrills at anything.
- Roscoe's a good kid. - She's only joking.
She'll like him lots after she knows him better.
That reminds me.
Close your eyes, Violet.
Go ahead, close them.
- What did I do?
- Pinched Daisy's arm.
What do you know about that?
Her master's voice is calling.
Getting fresh?
I don't like it one...
Come on, you'll have to hurry.
We haven't much time.
So you were flirting with that cheap clown, were you?
- No, I wasn't. - He was doing a trick with me.
You shut up.
I'm marrying your sister, not you.
- I saw him getting familiar with you. - Come on, Daisy.
No, you don't.
She's going to stay right here.
No, she isn't.
I got to go.
You're always using that for an...
For an alibi.
You don't look at others so much, do you?
Yes, I have seen you.
So that's how it is.
You got to be caught.
Come on in.
Help yourself to a drink.
That is fine.
Feel like eating something?
Prosit.
How many?
I'm not very hungry.
About six.
How do you like them?
Not bad.
But you are strong.
You are squeezing me to death.
And you'll like it.
You are taking my breath away.
You...
Now, here's something for your eye.
But, Hans, my Liebchen, you have not been listening... to a word I have been saying.
- Hans. - Yes, Frieda?
- You have not been listening to me. - Yes, I have, Frieda. I have.
Then what was I saying?
You were saying...
What were you saying?
I was saying, tonight you must not smoke such a big cigar.
Your voice was very bad at tonight's show.
Please, Frieda, don't tell me what I do.
When I want a cigar, I smoke a cigar.
I want no orders from a woman.
This is the first time since we have been engaged... you have spoken to me so.
Why is it?
Friedchen, I'm sorry.
- Here's our coffee. - There it is.
- Five lumps of sugar in each. - What?
Five lumps?
The little ape sent to Paris for this?
Yes, Paris.
We're doing very well.
But I don't like fruit.
You should eat a lot.
It's good for you.
Next time, I tell him I like champagne.
- Who is it?
- It's Hans.
My darling, your basket of fruit was lovely.
But I am... taking a bath now.
- Can't you come back later?
- Yes, Fräulein.
Thank you, dear.
You'll spoil everything if he hears you.
You ain't singing as usual.
This morning I have such a big washing to do.
How's Hans?
I said, how's Hans?
Hans is fine.
Danke, he's fine.
Frieda, something's wrong.
Only...
That Cleopatra woman...
My Hans...
- I cannot tell it. - She's still after Hans, ain't she?
Always she's smiling by him.
Well, if she smiles by somebody I know... she'll have to buy herself a new set of teeth.
Why is it we women always has got to worry?
It's always been that way.
I guess it always will be.
And, by me, she has no shame.
Always, when I can hear it, she says to him:
"Many thanks, my darling, for the flowers.
"Thanks, my darling," for this... and "Thanks, my darling," for that.
Always something he has given her.
Don't you worry, Frieda.
He doesn't love her.
That big horse.
Yes, but she keeps after him.
That's why I worry.
Why not pink tights?
You know.
With spangles all around.
It will show her figure off more.
Nein.
No tights.
Without tights.
You know, that soft, flimsy, what-you-call-it stuff.
Where the figure shows through.
Why not like Lady Godiva?
Ja, that's it.
And I'll hire her to ride the back of my bull.
Dummkopf!
What have you on your shoulder for heads?
Swiss cheese?
- What's the matter, Cleo?
- I think I strained my shoulder last night.
Give a rub, will you?
Farther.
Over.
It's so good to be rubbed.
- Our cards, lady. - What for?
A couple of rubbers from Berlin.
That reminds me. I had a swell dream about you last night.
- You did? - Yeah.
You were standing in a bathing suit on a rock.
You know, like a statue.
The wind was blowing through your hair, the waves were washing around you.
And your figure.
How it stood out.
It looked great.
Say, you have got a good figure.
Do you think so?
- Sure. - Phroso.
Did you try that gag I told you about?
Yeah, I did, and it was a wow.
Get up here, Johnny.
I'll show it to you.
I did what you told me, and it laid them right in the sawdust.
Watch this, Venus.
- Hello, Venus. - Hello, Johnny.
Phroso, what else did you dream?
Then the dream changed.
We was in Paris.
- Paris?
- Yeah, at the opera, right in the front box.
- We were all dressed up. - What did I have on?
And did I look swell.
Everybody was pointing at me.
They were saying, "That's Phroso, the clown."
And was I embarrassed.
- Did they say anything about me?
- Sure.
- What did they say?
